UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
__________________________
FORM 10-K
☒ ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2021
OR
☐ TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT T O SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE
ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from _____________ to _____________
Commission file number 001-40205
______________________
EQUINIX, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Delaware 77-0487526
(State of incorporation) (IRS Employer Identification No.)
One Lagoon Drive, Redwood City, California 94065
(Address of principal executive offices, including ZIP code)
(650) 598-6000
(Registrant's telephone number, including area code)
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class Trading Symbol Name of each exchange on which registered
Common Stock, $0.001 EQIX The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC
0.250% Senior Notes due 2027 The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC
1.000% Senior Notes due 2033 The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Act. Yes  ☒    No  ☐
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act.
Yes   ☐   No  ☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such
reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days. Yes  ☒    No  ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted
pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§ 232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that
the registrant was required to submit and post such files). Yes  ☒    No  ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller
reporting company, or an emerging growth company. See definitions of "large accelerated filer," "accelerated filer," "smaller
reporting company," and "emerging growth company" in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
Large accelerated filer ☒ Accelerated filer ☐
Non-accelerated filer ☐ Smaller reporting company ☐
Emerging growth company ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for
complying with any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act.   ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management’s assessment of the
effectiveness of its internal control over financial reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by
the registered public accounting firm that prepared or issued its audit report. ☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act).
Yes   ☐   No  ☒
The aggregate market value of the voting and non-voting common stock held by non-affiliates computed by reference to the
price at which the common stock was last sold as of the last business day of the registrant's most recently completed second fiscal
quarter was approximately $72.0 billion. As of February 17, 2022, a total of 90,721,039 shares of the registrant's common stock
were outstanding.
DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE
Part III – Portions of the registrant's definitive proxy statement to be issued in conjunction with the registrant's 2022 Annual Meeting
of Stockholders, which is expected to be filed not later than 120 days after the registrant's fiscal year ended December 31, 2021.
Except as expressly incorporated by reference, the registrant's proxy statement shall not be deemed to be a part of this report on
Form 10-K.
TABLE OF CONTENTS
EQUINIX, INC.
FORM 10-K
December 31, 2021
Item PART I Page No.
Forward-Looking Statements 3
Summary of Risk Factors 3
1.Business 5
1A.Risk Factors 17
1B.Unresolved Staff Comments 43
2.Properties 44
3.Legal Proceedings 48
4.Mine Safety Disclosure 48
PART II
5.Market for Registrant's Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity
Securities 49
6.Reserved 50
7.Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations 51
7A.Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk 75
8.Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 77
9.Changes in and Disagreements With Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure 77
9A.Controls and Procedures 77
9B.Other Information 78
9C.Disclosure Regarding Foreign Jurisdictions that Prevent Inspections 78
PART III
10.Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance 78
11.Executive Compensation 78
12.Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters 79
13.Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence 79
14.Principal Accounting Fees and Services 79
PART IV
15.Exhibits, Financial Statement Schedules 80
16.Form 10-K Summary 87
Signatures 88
Index to Exhibits 90
2
Table of Contents
PART I
Forward-Looking Statements
The words "Equinix", "we", "our", "ours", "us" and the "Company" refer to Equinix, Inc. All statements in this discussion that are
not historical are forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as
amended, including statements regarding Equinix's "expectations", "beliefs", "intentions", "strategies", "forecasts", "predictions",
"plans" or the like. Such statements are based on management's current expectations and are subject to a number of factors and
uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements. Equinix
cautions investors that there can be no assurance that actual results or business conditions will not differ materially from those
projected or suggested in such forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including, but not limited to, the risk factors
discussed in this Annual Report on Form 10-K. Equinix expressly disclaims any obligation or undertaking to release publicly any
updates or revisions to any forward looking statements contained herein to reflect any change in Equinix's expectations with regard
thereto or any change in events, conditions, or circumstances on which any such statements are based.
Summary of Risk Factors
Our business is subject to numerous risks and uncertainties that make an investment in our securities speculative or risky, any
one of which could materially adversely affect our results of operations, financial condition or business. These risks include, but are
not limited to, those listed below. This list is not complete, and should be read together with the section titled “Risk Factors” in this
Annual Report on Form 10-K, as well as the other information in this Annual Report on Form 10-K and the other filings that we
make with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (the “SEC”).
Risks Related to Our Business and Our Operations
•The ongoing COVID-19 pandemic could have a negative effect on our business, results of operations and financial
condition.
•We experienced an information technology security breach in the past and may be vulnerable to future security breaches,
which could disrupt our operations and have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operation and financial
condition.
•Terrorist activity, or other acts of violence, including violence stemming from the current climate of political and economic
uncertainty, could adversely impact our business.
•Our offerings have a long sales cycle that may harm our revenue and results of operations.
•Any failure of our physical infrastructure or negative impact on our ability to meet our obligations to our customers or
damage to customer infrastructure within our IBX data centers, could lead to significant costs and disruptions that could
reduce our revenue and harm our business reputation and financial condition.
•We are currently making significant investments in our back-office information technology systems and processes.
Difficulties from or disruptions to these efforts may interrupt our normal operations and adversely affect our business and
results of operations.
•The level of insurance coverage that we purchase may prove to be inadequate.
•The use of high power density equipment may limit our ability to fully utilize our older IBX data centers.
•If we are unable to implement our evolving organizational structure or if we are unable to recruit or retain key executives
and qualified personnel, our business could be harmed.
•We may not be able to compete successfully against current and future competitors.
•If we cannot continue to develop, acquire, market and provide new offerings or enhancements to existing offerings that
meet customer requirements and differentiate us from our competitors, our results of operations could suffer.
•Our results of operations may fluctuate.
•Our days sales outstanding ("DSO") may be negatively impacted by process and system upgrades and acquisitions.
3
Table of Contents
•We may incur goodwill and other intangible asset impairment charges, or impairment charges to our property, plant and
equipment, which could result in a significant reduction to our earnings.
•We have incurred substantial losses in the past and may incur additional losses in the future.
•The failure to obtain favorable terms when we renew our IBX data center leases, or the failure to renew such leases, could
harm our business and results of operations.
•We depend on a number of third parties to provide internet connectivity to our IBX data centers; if connectivity is interrupted
or terminated, our results of operations and cash flow could be materially and adversely affected.
•We have government customers, which subjects us to risks including early termination, audits, investigations, sanctions and
penalties.
•Because we depend on the development and growth of a balanced customer base, including key magnet customers, failure
to attract, grow and retain this base of customers could harm our business and results of operations.
•Industry consolidation may have a negative impact on our business model.
•Our business could be harmed by increased costs to procure power, prolonged power outages, shortages or capacity
constraints.
Risks Related to Our Expansion Plans
•Our construction of new IBX data centers or IBX data center expansions could involve significant risks to our business.
•Acquisitions present many risks, and we may not realize the financial or strategic goals that were contemplated at the time
of any transaction.
•The anticipated benefits of our joint ventures may not be fully realized or take longer to realize than expected.
•Joint venture investments could expose us to risks and liabilities in connection with the formation of the new joint ventures,
the operation of such joint ventures without sole decision-making authority, and our reliance on joint venture partners who
may have economic and business interests that are inconsistent with our business interests.
•If we cannot effectively manage our international operations, and successfully implement our international expansion plans,
or comply with evolving laws and regulations, our revenues may not increase, and our business and results of operations
would be harmed.
•We are continuing to invest in our expansion efforts but may not have sufficient customer demand in the future to realize
expected returns on these investments.
Risks Related to Our Capital Needs and Capital Strategy
•Our substantial debt could adversely affect our cash flows and limit our flexibility to raise additional capital.
•Sales or issuances of shares of our common stock may adversely affect the market price of our common stock.
•If we are not able to generate sufficient operating cash flows or obtain external financing, our ability to fund incremental
expansion plans may be limited.
•Fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates in the markets in which we operate internationally could harm our results of
operations.
•Our derivative transactions expose us to counterparty credit risk.
Risks Related to Environmental Laws and Climate Change Impacts
•Environmental regulations may impose upon us new or unexpected costs.
•Our business may be adversely affected by climate change and responses to it.
•We may fail to achieve our environmental goals which may adversely affect public perception of our business and affect our
relationship with our customers and our stockholders.
4
Table of Contents
Risks Related to Certain Regulations and Laws, Including Tax Laws
•Changes in U.S. or foreign tax laws, regulations, or interpretations thereof, including changes to tax rates, may adversely
affect our financial statements and cash taxes.
•Government regulation or failure to comply with laws and regulations may adversely affect our business.
Risks Related to Our Taxation as a REIT
•We have a number of risks related to our qualification as a real estate investment trust for federal income tax purposes
("REIT"), including the risk that we may not be able to maintain our qualification as a REIT which could expose us to
substantial corporate income tax and have a materially adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of
operations.
ITEM 1.     Business
Overview: Powering the World’s Digital Leaders
Equinix is the world's digital infrastructure company. Digital leaders harness our trusted platform to bring together and
interconnect the foundational infrastructure that powers their success. We enable our customers to access all the right places,
partners and possibilities they need to accelerate their advantage. Platform Equinix combines a global footprint of International
Business Exchange™ ("IBX") data centers in the Americas ("AMER"), Asia-Pacific ("APAC"), and Europe, the Middle East and
Africa ("EMEA") regions, interconnection solutions, edge services, unique business and digital ecosystems and expert consulting
and support. Equinix was incorporated on June 22, 1998 as a Delaware corporation and operates as a REIT for federal income tax
purposes.
Al Avery and Jay Adelson founded Equinix as a vendor-neutral multi-tenant data center ("MTDC") provider where competing
networks could connect and share data traffic to help scale the rapid growth of the early internet. The company’s name, Equinix
(composed from the words "equality", "neutrality" and "internet exchange"), reflects that vision. The founders also believed they not
only had the opportunity but also the responsibility to create a company that would be the steward of some of the most important
digital infrastructure assets in the world. Two decades later, we have expanded upon that vision to build Platform Equinix, with
unmatched scale and reach.
Our interconnected data centers around the world allow our customers to bring together and interconnect the infrastructure they
need to fast-track their digital advantage. With Equinix, they can scale with agility, speed the launch of digital services, deliver world-
class experiences and multiply their value. We enable them to differentiate by distributing infrastructure and removing the distance
between clouds, users and applications in order to reduce latency and deliver a superior customer, partner and employee
experience. The Equinix global platform, and the quality of our IBX data centers, interconnection offerings and edge services, have
enabled us to establish a critical mass of customers. As more customers choose Platform Equinix for bandwidth cost and
performance reasons, it benefits their suppliers and business partners to colocate in the same data centers and connect directly
with each other. This adjacency creates a network effect that attracts new customers, continuously compounds our existing
customers' value and enables them to capture further economic and performance benefits from our offerings.TM
®
®
5
Table of Contents
In 2021, we opened nine new IBX data centers, opened six new xScale data centers via our joint ventures, and entered three
new markets resulting in an increase in our total number of IBX and xScale data center facilities to 240, which includes the MU4
and GN1 data centers which opened in January 2022. 2021 highlights include:
•New data center openings included nine new IBX sites in the following metros: Bordeaux, Frankfurt, Genoa, Milan, Munich,
Osaka, Perth, Silicon Valley and Singapore, with Bordeaux and Genoa being new market entries.
•Six additional xScale sites opened in 2021 in Frankfurt, London, Osaka, Paris, Sao Paulo and Tokyo, bringing the total
number of xScale data centers to eight. xScale data centers serve the needs of the growing hyperscale data center market,
including the world's largest cloud service providers, and are engineered to meet the technical and operational
requirements and price points of core hyperscale workload deployments. xScale data centers also offer access to our
comprehensive suite of interconnection and edge services that tie into the hyperscale companies' existing access points at
Equinix, thereby increasing the speed of connectivity to their existing and future enterprise customers. In xScale sites,
hyperscale companies can consolidate core and access point deployments into one global provider to streamline and
simplify their growth.
•In December, we announced our expansion into Africa through the planned acquisition of MainOne, a leading West African
data center and connectivity solutions provider, with presence in Nigeria, Ghana and Côte d'Ivoire. The transaction has an
enterprise value of $320 million and marks the first step in Equinix's long-term strategy to become a leading African carrier
neutral digital infrastructure company. The acquisition is expected to close in Q2 of 2022, subject to the satisfaction of
customary closing conditions including the requisite regulatory approvals.
•In September, we announced that we extended Platform Equinix into the strategic Indian market, following the completion
of the acquisition of the India operations of GPX Global Systems, Inc. ("GPX India"). The $170.5 million transaction includes
a fiber-connected campus in Mumbai with two data centers. The expansion into India is intended to unlock opportunities for
Indian businesses expanding internationally and for multinational corporations pursuing growth and innovation in the Indian
market.
•In June, we entered into an agreement to form another joint venture in the form of a limited liability partnership with GIC,
Singapore’s sovereign wealth fund, to develop and operate additional xScale data centers in Europe and the Americas
(the “EMEA 2 Joint Venture”). In October, we also entered into an agreement to form a joint venture in the form of a limited
liability partnership with PGIM Real Estate ("PGIM"), to develop and operate xScaledata centers in Asia-Pacific (the "Asia-
Pacific 2 Joint Venture"). Combined with our existing xScale joint ventures in Europe, Asia-Pacific and the Americas, these
joint ventures will bring our global xScale data center portfolio to more than $7.5 billion across 34 facilities when completed
and fully constructed.
•In June, we opened our first data center in Bordeaux, France ("BX1"). With direct fiber links to Equinix's International
Business Exchange™ (IBX) sites in Paris, this new facility will provide global businesses and local authorities located in
the region with the ability to connect directly and securely to the world's digital economy, via comprehensive digital
ecosystems. Increasing connectivity opportunities further, BX1 will provide a landing hub for the new submarine cable,
AMITIE, which will link France to the United States and Great Britain, creating a new European gateway for data traffic
between the United States and Europe.TM
TM
 
®
6
Table of Contents
•In March, we announced that Equinix Metal™ had significantly advanced its global scale, features and ability to enable as a
service consumption of the full value of Platform Equinix. With these new and enhanced capabilities, Equinix Metal
customers can consume interconnected infrastructure with the control of physical hardware and the low overhead and
developer experience of the cloud, helping them move faster in today's competitive environment. This announcement also
included the expanded availability of Equinix Metal in 18 global metros, the addition of new networking features to support
hybrid multicloud architectures, the certification of new software integrations on Equinix Metal and the launch of a managed
appliance as a service solution.
Industry Trends: Large-scale global trends are driving a digital-first strategy
Digital transformation is changing where and how businesses deploy and deliver IT services to employees and is creating new
digital business models for partners and customers. The convergence of these global trends and the impact of the ongoing COVID-
19 pandemic have created additional pressure for many companies to transform. The collective influence of these trends is driving
complexity and risk that must be addressed in multiple locations for companies to effectively compete in the global digital economy.
These trends include:
•The Digital services trend is the continued digitizing of the back office to support digital business throughput. By 2022,
65% of global GDP will be digitalized, and most organizations will realize greater value by combining digitization and
sustainability. This trend forces the need for a digital infrastructure optimized for proximity to, and interconnection with,
networks and clouds. This in turn enables digital development with elastic scale and has contributed to a 3x increase in the
multicloud, multiregion adoption rate over the last two years as businesses scale the digital core.
•The Digital participation trend is digitizing trade and accessing digital marketplaces (digital B2B commerce). By 2025,
75% of organization leaders will leverage digital platforms and ecosystem capabilities to adapt their value chains to new
markets, industries and ecosystems. This forces the need for organizations to interconnect digital infrastructure with
research communities, supply chains and marketplaces, which enables composable business models. The fifth annual
Global Interconnection Index ("GXI"), a market study published by Equinix, shows that SaaS is now the largest IT spend
line item as companies move to public and private SaaS alternatives. Organizations that fail to leverage cloud, SaaS or
partner digital ecosystems have shown two to three times slower growth over the past two years.
•The Digital proximity trend means digitizing the front office for localized and personalized delivery—to customers,
employees and operations where business happens, as well as digitizing the physical world for the physical infrastructure
and operations intelligence needed to optimize commercial and environmental impact. Data shows that shifts in population
and commerce centers will result in over 50% of new infrastructure being local by 2023, which will require a digital
infrastructure in proximity to, and interconnecting, experiences, things (IoT) and intelligent operations.
These trends are accelerating the need for companies like Equinix who can provide a secure, agile global business platform
that leverages digital interconnection—or private data exchange—to deliver real-time interactions around the world.
As part of their digital transformation, businesses in most industries are shifting their centralized IT infrastructures to the edge to
bring digital services closer to users for better performance, which has become a significant driver of digital business value. To
realize the full potential of the edge, IT organizations require greater interconnection bandwidth. Interconnection bandwidth is
defined as the total capacity provisioned to privately and directly exchange traffic, with a diverse set of partners and providers, at
distributed IT exchange points inside carrier-neutral colocation data centers. Private interconnection capacity between businesses,
as reported in the GXI, is anticipated to grow at a compound annual growth rate of 44% by 2024, reaching 21,485+ terabits per
second of data exchanged annually.®
7
Table of Contents
Worldwide Interconnection Bandwidth Capacity Growth (2020 - 2024) in Terabits per Second (Tbps)
Source: GXI Volume 5
Equinix Business Proposition: To be the platform where the world comes together, enabling the innovations that enrich
our work, life and planet
In 2021, we continued to build new data center, interconnection and edge services capabilities to further our vision to power the
world’s digital leaders. On Platform Equinix, digital leaders can reach the most strategic global markets with the largest ecosystem
of digital partners, with infrastructure that assembles and deploys virtually in minutes. We offer a comprehensive, integrated suite of
data center, interconnection, edge services and products to over 10,000 enterprise and service provider customers worldwide.
The following are the leading revenue generating product and other offerings that collectively make up Platform Equinix:    
Data Center Solutions
Our global, state-of-the-art data centers meet strict standards of security, reliability, certification and sustainability. Offerings in
these data centers are typically billed based on the space and power a customer consumes, are delivered under a fixed duration
contract and generate monthly recurring revenue ("MRR").
•International Business ExchangeData Centers consist of more than 230 IBX vendor-neutral colocation data centers
worldwide, providing our customers with secure, reliable and robust environments (including space and power) that are
necessary to aggregate and distribute information and connect digital and business ecosystems globally. IBX data centers
provide access to vital ecosystems where enterprises, network, cloud and SaaS providers, and business partners, directly
and securely interconnect to each other.
•xScale Data Centers are designed to serve the unique core workload deployment needs of a targeted group of
hyperscale companies, which include the world's largest cloud service providers. With xScale dataTM 
TM
8
Table of Contents
centers, hyperscale customers add to their core hyperscale data center deployments and existing customer access points
at Equinix, allowing streamlined expansion with a single global vendor.
•IBX SmartView is a fully integrated monitoring software which provides customers visibility into the operating data relevant
to their specific Equinix footprint as if they were in-house. The software provides online access to real-time environmental
and operating data through the Equinix Customer Portal or API integrations. With real-time alerts and configurable
reporting, IBX SmartView allows customers to maintain their IBX operations and plan for future growth.
Interconnection Solutions
Our interconnection solutions connect businesses directly, securely and dynamically within and between our data centers
across our global platform. Our interconnection solutions are typically billed based on the outbound connections from a customer
and generate MRR.
•Equinix Fabric™ provides secure, on-demand, software-defined interconnection. Built specifically for digital infrastructure,
Equinix Fabric enables businesses to connect globally to their choice of thousands of networking, storage, compute and
application service providers in the industry’s largest infrastructure ecosystem. As the foundation of Platform Equinix’s
interconnection capability, Equinix Fabric enables customers to quickly and easily connect their physical and virtual digital
infrastructures.
•Cross Connects provide a point-to-point cable link between two Equinix customers in the same IBX data center. Cross
Connects deliver fast, convenient, affordable and highly reliable connectivity and data exchange with business partners and
service providers within the Equinix ecosystem.
•Equinix Internet Exchange™ enables networks, content providers and large enterprises to exchange internet traffic
through the largest global peering solution. Service providers can aggregate traffic to multiple counterparties, called peers,
on one physical port and handle multiple small peers while moving high-traffic peers to private interconnections. This
reduces latency for end-users when accessing content and applications.
•Equinix Connect is an agile, scalable, resilient and high performing internet access solution. With at least two upstream
ISPs in each market, Equinix Connect offers the resiliency that organizations demand and direct connections to major
content destinations, resulting in superior performance. It provides the convenience of a one-stop shop and the flexibility
required to connect to the internet as a primary or secondary access solution. Available globally in more than 40 markets,
Equinix Connect allows businesses to grow as their needs grow with scalable bandwidth options to meet their emerging
usage requirements.
•Fiber Connect provides dark fiber links between customers and partners in multiple Equinix IBX data centers. Fiber
Connect enables fast, convenient and affordable integration with partners, customers and service providers across the
global Equinix digital ecosystem. It supports highly reliable, extremely low-latency communication, system integration and
data exchange.
Edge Services
Our edge services help businesses rapidly deploy as-a-service networking, security and hardware across our global data center
footprint - as an alternative to buying, owning and managing the physical infrastructure. Our edge services are typically billed based
on the number of instances and the capacity used by a customer and generate MRR.
•Network Edge allows customers to modernize networks within minutes, by deploying network functions virtualization
("NFV") from multiple vendors across Equinix metros. Companies can select, deploy and connect virtual network services
at the edge quickly, with no additional hardware requirements.
•Equinix Metal™ allows enterprises, SaaS companies and digital service providers to provision interconnected bare metal
resources in minutes instead of months, while reducing the capital expenditures and operational requirements of owning
hardware. They can also reduce cloud costs while retaining the flexibility and operational expenditures of cloud services via
on demand, reserved or spot market capacity in Equinix’s global data centers using the Equinix Metal portal or DevOps-
friendly APIs and integrations.
•Equinix Precision Time™ provides secure Precision Time Protocol ("PTP") and Network Time Protocol ("NTP") Time as a
service for distributed enterprise applications on Platform Equinix. The service uses redundant and strategically located
equipment and the high-performance network backbone of Equinix®
9
Table of Contents
Fabric™ to deliver secure, reliable and precise time synchronization. Customers gain access to the product portal, allowing
them to provision, manage and monitor their service.
Colocation Offerings
Equinix offers a variety of colocation offerings designed to speed and streamline digital transformation and data center
deployments for its customers. These services are typically billed based on consumption and generate non-recurring revenue
("NRR").
•Equinix Smart Hands provides around-the-clock, on-site, operational support service for remote management, installation
and troubleshooting of customer data center equipment. Using Equinix IBX data center technicians, Smart Hands allows
customers to manage and outsource their business operations and maximize uptime whether from within an IBX data
center or from a remote location.
•Equinix Infrastructure Services (EIS) provides customers with a one-stop shop for data center installation, migration and
equipment procurement. With proven practices developed over many years of successfully building, migrating and
optimizing our customers’ data center needs, EIS services lend expertise to address larger, more complex data center jobs
including installation and implementation of new builds, planned migrations, structured cabling, labelling and
documentation, procurement recommendations and coordination, and secure de-installation.
Competition
While a large number of enterprises and service providers, such as hyperscale cloud service providers, own their own data
centers, we believe the industry is shifting away from single-tenant solutions to outsourcing some or all of their IT housing and
interconnection requirements to third party facilities, such as those operated by us.
Historically, the outsourcing market was served by large telecommunications carriers who bundled their products and services
with their colocation offerings. The data center market landscape has evolved to include private and vendor-neutral MTDC
providers, hyperscale cloud providers, managed infrastructure and application hosting providers, and systems integrators. It is
estimated that Equinix is one of more than 2,200 companies that provide MTDC offerings around the world. The global MTDC
market is highly fragmented. Each of these data center solutions providers can bundle various colocation, interconnection and
network offerings and outsourced IT infrastructure solutions. We believe that this outsourcing trend has accelerated and is likely to
continue to accelerate in the coming years, especially in light of the movement to digital business as a result of the ongoing COVID-
19 pandemic.
Equinix is differentiated in this market by being able to offer customers a global platform that reaches 27 countries and contains
the industry’s largest and most active ecosystem of partners in our sites. This ecosystem creates a “network effect” which improves
performance and lowers cost for our customers and is a significant source of competitive advantage for Equinix.
Customers
Our customers include telecommunications carriers, mobile and other network services providers, cloud and IT services
providers, digital media and content providers, financial services companies, and global enterprise ecosystems in various
industries. We provide each company access to a choice of business partners and solutions based on their colocation,
interconnection and managed IT service needs, and delivered 99.999% operational uptime across our global data centers in 2021.
As of December 31, 2021, we had over 10,000 customers worldwide. No one customer made up 10% or more of our total business
revenues for the year ended December 31, 2021.
10
Table of Contents
The following companies represent some of our leading customers and partners:
We serve our customers with a direct sales force and channel marketing program. We organize our sales force by customer
type, as well as by establishing a sales presence in diverse geographic regions, which enables efficient servicing of the customer
base from a network of regional offices. We also support our customers with a global customer care organization.
Human Capital
As of December 31, 2021, we had 10,944 employees worldwide with 5,056 based in the Americas, 3,611 based in EMEA and
2,277 based in APAC. Of those employees, 4,693 employees were in engineering and operations, 1,855 employees were in sales
and marketing and 4,396 employees were in management, finance and administration. As of December 31, 2021, approximately
74% of our workforce identified as men and approximately 25% identified as women. Women's representation in leadership (VP and
above) increased from 28% to 31% year-over-year.
At Equinix, we strive to build a culture where every employee, every day, can say “I’m Safe, I Belong and I Matter” and where
our workforce, at all levels, reflects and represents the communities in which we operate. Our objective is to continue to make our
culture a critical competitive advantage, engaging every leader and every employee in the process. To ensure we are upholding our
core corporate values and making progress towards our aspirational goals, we monitor employee satisfaction through a quarterly
pulse survey, which is one of our listening mechanisms. In 2021, employee satisfaction scores ranged between 82 - 84 out of a 100
each quarter. We recognize that attracting, developing and retaining talent at all levels is vital to continuing our success and offer
industry competitive compensation and benefits, along with development opportunities to help every employee achieve their full
potential. The virtual recruiting environment necessitated by the global pandemic has created new opportunities for Equinix to find
talent. We have benefited from new talent sourcing programs such as our global new-to-career programs as well as a pathways
program to enable career transition for veterans and women returning to the workforce. In 2021, we continued to enhance our
portfolio of development programs for our employees and introduced a system-enabled approach to goal setting and development
planning to drive objectivity and achievement. We also continued to offer development tools and opportunities to our employees
such as online learning, manager training, professional coaching and 360 degree assessments for eligible employees.
11
Table of Contents
We are integrating a focus on diversity, inclusion and belonging ("DIB") into every aspect of how we run our business. In 2020,
we embarked on a multi-year DIB strategy with governance through a DIB Council chaired by our CEO and CHRO, and in
partnership with our Sustainability Program Office, that oversees our progress on environmental, social and governance ("ESG")
matters. Our DIB strategy focuses on attracting, retaining and developing a diverse, global workforce; building leadership capability;
and empowering our people to bring DIB to life. We are focused on creating multiple pathways to reach new talent from diverse
communities. In 2021, we forged partnerships and invested in tools and systems to grow and support our inclusive hiring practices
and made updates to our recruitment marketing to reach a wider candidate pool more effectively. We also embedded diversity and
inclusive competencies and behaviors in our leadership profiles and added coaching tools as well as manager training on leading
inclusive teams to our development program. Our Equinix Employee-led Connection Networks ("EECNs") are integral to our DIB
strategy and play an important role in creating belonging and advocating for the needs and goals of communities with common
identities, cultures or backgrounds. Each of our nine EECNs represents an identity/community that has faced historical
discrimination or shares unique challenges. We recognize that creating the best workplace and culture we can requires a global
effort with localized awareness and approaches. Late in 2020, we launched WeAreEquinix employee teams empowered to create,
localize and promote purpose, inclusion and belonging for their locations across the world. Through live and virtual events,
campaigns, and collaboration with the business, these volunteer leaders bring local opportunities to engage in the following areas:
Wellbeing, Green and Sustainability, Community Impact, Fun and Creativity, Diversity, Inclusion and Belonging, and Employee
Networks. We currently have WeAreEquinix teams in 15 locations.
In 2021, we launched our “I Matter” initiative to enable employees to voluntarily self-identify by adding their data across
dimensions of diversity, including race/ethnicity, sexual orientation, gender identity, and disability in accordance with country
regulations so that we may better understand the global employee experience.
Equinix representatives have joined the G100 Talent Consortium Task Force on Racial Inequity in Business to consider core
inequity issues, including anti-racism, bias, and hiring and promotability practices, in order to develop tangible best practices that
companies can use as guide rails to increase representation and career mobility for black, indigenous and people of color
("BIPOC") employees. In 2021, we hosted a Days of Understanding event as part of an initiative of CEO ACT!ON, a pledge Equinix
has taken along with hundreds of other companies to embrace difference in our organizations, educate our people and build more
inclusive cultures inside and outside of our workplaces. As part of this partnership, three Equinix employees joined ACT!ON’s
inaugural two-year fellowship program focused on identifying, developing, and promoting scalable and sustainable policies and
corporate best practices that address systemic racism and social injustice to improve societal wellbeing. Equinix also joined the
Alliance for Global Inclusion, a coalition of global organizations working together to bring inclusivity and full equity to the workplace.
Finally, in 2021 Equinix partnered with McKinsey to provide leadership development to our Black/African American leaders through
the Black Leadership Academy.
Our Community Impact program promotes connection and belonging, and enables employees to give back, with the support of
Equinix, to the communities in which we work and live. In 2021, our employees volunteered at approximately 2,230 nonprofits
worldwide.
We believe our commitment to the highest standards of honesty, integrity and ethical behavior differentiates our business as
much as our technology. We promote these high standards through a number of policies including the Equinix Code of Business
Conduct. All employees are required to complete trainings on ethics and the company’s anti-bribery and corruption policies. In
addition, we maintain a confidential ethics helpline where employees are encouraged to speak up if they have any questions or
concerns that our code is being violated. We have a zero-tolerance, non-retaliation policy that protects our employees when they
speak up.
In a year again disrupted by the unprecedented global pandemic caused by COVID-19, we continued a number of
precautionary measures in line with our business continuity and pandemic plans to minimize the risk of operational impacts and to
protect the health and safety of employees, customers, partners and our communities. During the pandemic, we have focused on a
careful, safe and responsible opening of our offices based on guidance from health experts and other leaders from around the
world. As we look forward to the future of work, and more importantly amplifying Equinix’s vibrant culture, we are providing flexible,
hybrid work opportunities in many roles, enhanced collaboration technologies for everyone, and activity-based workspaces at home
or onsite. We recognize that the new normal will require changing behaviors. As such, we are providing learning opportunities and
best practices to ensure our meetings, events and work sessions are inclusive and equitable for virtual and in-person participation.
Employee well-being has been central to these efforts, driven globally through offerings such as health programs, ergonomic
support, technology reimbursements, and wellness days.
12
Table of Contents
We believe that all of these programs and initiatives support our human capital goals, align with our company culture, and
increase employee satisfaction.
Sustainability
At Equinix, our Future First sustainability strategy rallies our people and partners to envision a better future and then do what it
takes to make it happen. As the world’s digital infrastructure leader, we have the responsibility to harness the power of technology to
create a more accessible, equitable and sustainable future. The ESG initiatives comprising our Future First strategy focus on the
material issues that have the greatest impact on our stakeholders and our business. We continue to progress on our sustainability
goals and look to build a business and world that reflects our purpose to bring the world together on our platform to create the
innovations that will enrich our work, life and planet. We document our ESG progress in our Annual Report as well as in the annual
Corporate Sustainability Report located on our sustainability website: sustainability.equinix.com.
In 2021, we committed to becoming climate neutral across our global operations by 2030 and set a validated science-based
target (“SBT”) for emissions reduction across our global operations and supply chain. Our climate commitments are a critical step to
ensure that we continue to advance investments and innovations to reduce greenhouse gas ("GHG") emissions and keep global
warming to 1.5 degrees Celsius in alignment with the Paris Climate Agreement.
As a part of our Future First sustainability strategy, we published an Environmental Sustainability and Global Climate Change
Policy in 2021 to detail our approach and practices related to the environment, climate change, resource efficiency and reporting. In
alignment with our strategy and policy, we are also evaluating our material climate change risks and opportunities based on the
recommendations of the Task Force on Climate Related Financial Disclosures (“TCFD”). We are continuing our work to embed
climate change risk management into our business where relevant.
Environmental Performance
Equinix was the first data center company to commit to a long-term goal of 100% renewable energy across our global portfolio.
We use local renewable energy sources where possible, seek new or recently built renewable sources and advocate for favorable
renewable energy policies. In the U.S., we purchase more than 2.3 million megawatt-hours (MWh) of green power annually from a
portfolio of renewable energy projects, including 225 MW of wind power under long-term virtual power purchase agreements
(VPPAs) located in Texas and Oklahoma. In 2020, over 90% of our global electricity consumption, and 100% of U.S. electricity
consumption, was covered by renewable energy sources.
We are committed to transparently measuring and reporting our global carbon footprint across direct (Scope 1), indirect energy
(Scope 2) and indirect value chain (Scope 3) emissions. Since 2015, we have achieved a 50% reduction in GHG emissions on an
absolute basis (Scope 1 and Scope 2 market-based metric tons of carbon dioxide-equivalent (mtCO2e)), even as the company
doubled its footprint in both energy consumption and number of sites. In 2021, CDP, a global non-governmental organization
dedicated to helping investors and companies measure and manage their climate risks, recognized our commitments, actions and
progress on climate change.
13
Table of Contents
We received an 'A-' CDP leadership score for climate action and annual disclosures within the CDP Climate Change survey.
We are leveraging technology and innovation to encourage commercialization of solutions that will enable the “Data Center of
the Future”. To support our ongoing sustainability initiatives and commitment to innovation, we issued green bonds totaling $1.4
billion in 2020 and an additional $2.3 billion in 2021. Our Green Finance Framework aligns our sustainability commitments with our
long-term financing needs and highlights our pipeline of green projects and data center innovations. In 2021, we allocated $2.9
billion in net proceeds to finance or refinance, in whole or in part, ongoing and new projects in categories of green buildings,
renewable energy and energy efficiency.
We are committed to advancing environmental progress across other areas of our operations. While energy usage, specifically
electricity, is our largest environmental impact, to address the growing importance of water within our operations, we launched a
Sustainable Water Management Program in 2021. We consider the consumption of water in the design and operation of our
facilities and are developing a coordinated global approach to water measurement and management. Through our efforts to
establish the European Climate-Neutral Data Centre Operator Pact in 2021, Equinix and the EU data center industry have also
committed to advancing initiatives beyond renewable energy and energy efficiency, including water efficiency, waste reduction, and
circular economy principles.
Sustainability Accounting Standards Board ("SASB") Disclosures
SASB published the Sustainability Accounting Standard ("Standard") for the Real Estate Industry in October 2018. We have
aligned our SASB disclosures with the Real Estate Standard to enhance corporate disclosure around ESG performance. In our
comprehensive disclosures in our annual Corporate Sustainability Report we also document our progress against metrics as
outlined in other frameworks such as the Global Reporting Initiative ("GRI"), UN Sustainable Development Goals ("SDGs") and
TCFD. The following tables detail our energy metrics, aligned with the SASB Real Estate Standard. We intend to expand our
reporting around the Real Estate Standard in the coming years.
The following metrics represent our colocation facilities performance in the calendar years specified. Energy, renewable energy
and GHG emissions are independently assured to ISO 14064-3:2006 Standards for the quantification and reporting of GHG
emissions (Scope 1, 2 and 3). Calendar year data for 2021 will become available in Q2 2022 and published in our annual Corporate
Sustainability Report located on our sustainability website.
Energy Management: Energy Consumption
YearEnergy
Consumption
Data as a % of
Floor AreaTotal Energy
Consumed by
Portfolio Area
with Data
Coverage
(MWh)Like-for-Like
Change in
Energy
Consumption of
Portfolio Area
with Data
Coverage (MWh)Grid Electricity
Consumption as
a % of Energy
ConsumptionEnergy
Consumption
from Renewable
Sources (kWh)Renewable
Energy as a %
of Energy
Consumption Like-for-Like
Change in Energy
Consumption from
Renewable Sources
of Portfolio Area
with Data Coverage
(MWh)Renewable
Energy as a % of
Electricity
Consumption
2019 94.9% 5,711,000 N/A 94.4% 5,168,000 91% N/A 91%
2020 95.8% 6,432,000 6.2% 93.2% 5,695,000 89% 5.3% 91%
The scope of energy includes: energy used onsite (natural gas, diesel, chilled water), energy procured (purchased electricity, electric power from fuel cells
under power purchase agreements).
Like-for-like computed for stabilized asset list for the overlapping list of sites designated as stabilized in 2019 and 2020.
Excludes renewable energy inherently supplied by the standard utility grid mix. Equinix buys renewable energy for the entire electricity consumption of sites
including customer and overhead load. The instruments used include: Renewable Energy Certificates (RECs) from Virtual Power Purchase Agreements
(VPPAs), RECs, International RECs (I-RECs), Guarantees of Origin (GOOs) and Renewable Energy Guarantees of Origin (REGOs) from suppliers, green
tariffs and bundled contracts.(1) (2) (3) (4) (2) (3)
(5)(6)
(7)(8)
(1)
(2)
(3)
14
Table of Contents
Equinix's global renewable energy percentage reported for RE100 and CDP was 91%, which is comprised of 5,844 GWh of renewables out of 6,427 GWh of
electric power consumption. The discrepancy in the totals arises from non-IBX data center sites' energy usage and non-electric power energy consumption
2019 portfolio coverage excludes xScale sites: PA8x, LD13x.
2019 portfolio coverage excludes reseller sites: DA99, JK1, OS99, SH1.
Recently constructed or acquired sites for which no utility data is available are excluded from the 2020 SASB metrics reporting boundary. These include
certain data centers in AMER (DC21) and EMEA (MC1). Reseller sites are also excluded in the energy metrics (OS99, SH1).
2020 portfolio coverage excludes xScale sites: LD10x, LD13x, FR11x, SP5x, PA8x.
Energy Management: Green Building Ratings
Our environmental efforts aim to deliver meaningful and measurable progress against sustainability goals that positively impact
our customers, partners, investors and employees. Our data centers are designed with high operational standards and energy
efficiency in mind. Our data centers are planned holistically to incorporate the needs of our communities and we aim to minimize the
use of all resources in our operations. We evaluate cost-efficient opportunities to enhance energy efficiency and buy renewable
energy for existing or acquired sites.
We are protecting our planet's resources by pioneering green data center innovations and building and operating energy-
efficient data centers around the world. Our Energy Efficiency Center of Excellence is driving a global approach to cooling our
existing data centers more efficiently. The program engages customers to manage their implementations more sustainably at our
facilities, leading to overall improved site efficiencies.
We certify our data centers to numerous green buildings and energy management certifications and schemes. These include
USGBC LEED green buildings certifications, ISO 14001:2015 Environmental Management Standard, ISO 50001:2011 Energy
Management Standard, BCA Green Mark, U.S. EPA Energy Star for Data Centers and others.
Data centers receiving green building ratings in 2020 and 2021 covered 1.1 million gross sq. ft. While we have additional
certifications that are pending final submissions, the following new sites received ratings in 2020 or 2021:
Data Center Metro Area Rating Scheme Level Achieved
DA11 Dallas, Texas LEED Silver
DC15 Washington, DC Green Globes 3 Globes
SV11 Silicon Valley, California LEED Silver
SG4 Singapore BCA Green Mark GoldPlus
SG5 Singapore LEED Pending
ML5 Milan, Italy LEED Pending
In 2021, we had 16.8 million gross sq. ft., or 71% of our global footprint, in operation with green buildings and energy
management certifications. Within the U.S., we had 3.7 million gross sq. ft., or 43% of our footprint, under certification, including 0.3
million of gross sq. ft., or 3% of U.S. footprint, having achieved U.S. EPA Energy Star for Data Centers. We are currently evaluating
enrolling additional sites in the Energy Star program. We disclose these and other site-level details about our data centers on our
sustainability website.
YearTotal Gross sq. ft.
(million)Area of Eligible Portfolio with Green Building
Rating (million sq. ft.)Eligible Portfolio with Green
Building Rating (%)
Global Total through 2021 23.8 16.8 71%
U.S. Total through 2021 8.53.7 (LEED and Energy Star)
0.3 (Energy Star)43% (LEED and Energy Star)
3% (Energy Star)
Ratings included in our totals: ISO 50001 Energy Management, ISO 14001 Environmental Management, LEED green buildings certifications, U.S.
Environmental Protection Agency Energy Star for Data Centers, BCA Green Mark, NABERS and Green Globes.
We are currently evaluating our approach to U.S. EPA Energy Star for Data Centers. In 2020, two sites received Energy Star for Data Centers recognition,
representing 3% of our U.S. portfolio. In contrast, our U.S. portfolio has 18 LEED-certified data centers or 32% of the U.S. portfolio by gross square footage.(4)
(5) TM
(6)
(7)
(8) TM
(1)
(2)
(1)
(2)
15
Table of Contents
Our Business Segment Financial Information
We currently operate in three reportable segments comprised of our Americas, EMEA and Asia-Pacific geographic regions.
Information attributable to each of our reportable segments is set forth in Note 17 within the Consolidated Financial Statements.
Available Information
Equinix owns and maintains intellectual property in the form of trademarks, patents, application programming interfaces,
customer portals and a variety of products and other offerings.
We were incorporated in Delaware in June 1998. We are required to file reports under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as
amended, with the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC"). The SEC maintains an internet website at http://www.sec.gov
that contains reports, proxy and information statements and other information.
You may also obtain copies of our annual reports on Form 10-K, our quarterly reports on Form 10-Q and our current reports on
Form 8-K, and any amendments to such reports, free of charge by visiting the Investor Relations page on our website,
www.equinix.com. These reports are available as soon as reasonably practical after we file them with the SEC. Information
contained on or accessible through our website is not part of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
16
Table of Contents
ITEM 1A.     Risk Factors
In addition to the other information contained in this report, the following risk factors should be considered carefully in evaluating
our business:
Risk Factors
Risks Related to Our Business and Our Operations
The ongoing COVID-19 pandemic could have a negative effect on our business, results of operations and financial
condition.
We have continuously monitored our global operations as the COVID-19 pandemic has spread across the globe and as
variants and vaccines have developed. We have implemented procedures focusing on the health and safety of our employees,
customers, partners and communities, the continuity of our business offerings and compliance with governmental regulations and
local public health guidance and ordinances. We have activated our business continuity and pandemic plans and while our business
operations have continued without interruption and our IBX data centers have remained fully operational to date, we cannot
guarantee our business operations or our IBX data centers will not be negatively impacted in the future. Our IBX data centers have
been designated “essential businesses” or “critical infrastructure” for purposes of remaining open during the COVID-19 pandemic in
all of the jurisdictions that have published these exemptions but not all jurisdictions have created such designations. Any change in
these classifications could cause operational disruptions or closures of the affected IBX data centers.
We implemented processes to limit and schedule access to certain IBX data centers based on infection rates and case counts
as well as implemented social distancing and hygiene protocols. We have continued to track infections and adapt our policies and
procedures based on a number of factors including the COVID-19 pandemic severity in each office and IBX location. These
proactive actions we have taken or may take in the future and any restrictions imposed by the government could result in business
delays, operational disruption and customer dissatisfaction. Employee illnesses resulting from the pandemic could result in further
inefficiencies or delays and a suspected or confirmed case in an IBX data center could require temporary closure of the affected
IBX data center for cleaning or until local regulatory requirements are fulfilled. Any closure of an IBX data center or limitation of
customer access could cause customer dissatisfaction if customers are unable to access their equipment within the IBX data
center. We also have service level agreements which could be affected if we are required to close an IBX data center for any
reason.
Preventative measures instituted by governments and businesses to mitigate the spread of COVID-19, including travel
restrictions, social distancing requirements, shelter in place orders and quarantines, have negatively impacted the global economy
and may adversely impact us, our customers and vendors. Given the uncertainty around the duration and extent of the ongoing
COVID-19 pandemic, we cannot accurately predict at this time how the pandemic will affect our business over time.
The COVID-19 pandemic has contributed to certain global supply chain disruptions including the supply of certain construction
materials and has contributed to overall inflation. While we do not expect the construction delays and supply chain disruptions that
we are currently experiencing to have a material effect on us at this time, additional disruptions because of the ongoing COVID-19
pandemic could occur. Additional or unexpected disruptions could cause construction delays or significantly affect the cost of our
planned expansion projects in the future. Significant construction delays and increases in costs because of the supply chain
disruptions could interfere with our ability to meet commitments to customers who have contracted for space in new IBX data
centers under construction and could have a material impact on our business. While we have received "essential business" permits
for construction in some jurisdictions, these classifications may not extend to the construction of new IBX data centers in all of our
jurisdictions. We are also reliant on third party construction labor to build and expand our IBX data centers, to which we may not
have access due to the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic. We rely on materials, products and manufacturing from regions of the world
which are impacted by the pandemic and supply chain disruptions. While we have invested in creating a material inventory to
mitigate global increases in raw materials, energy and labor prices, it may not be sufficient and ongoing delays, difficulty finding
replacement products and continued high inflation could affect our business and growth.
Although currently stayed while being litigated in U.S. courts, U.S. Presidential Executive Order (EO 14042) requires companies
that do business with the U.S. Federal government (“Government Contractors”) to implement a
17
Table of Contents
mandate for all their U.S. employees to be fully vaccinated against COVID-19 (the “US Vaccine Mandate”). As a Government
Contractor, we will be required to comply with the US Vaccine Mandate if it or a similar vaccine mandate for Government
Contractors goes into effect. We do not anticipate the US Vaccine Mandate to have a material negative effect on our business even
if it goes into effect, but if we experience more employee turnover than we expect or if similar mandates are required in other
regions, we could experience disruptions to certain functions and employee satisfaction could be affected.
While the full extent and impact of the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic cannot be reasonably estimated at this time, it could have
a material adverse impact on our business and financial condition. The extent to which the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic will impact
our financial condition or results of operations will depend on many factors and future developments, including new information
about the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic and its variants, additional surges in infection rates, vaccine efforts and any new
government regulations which may emerge to contain the virus, among others.
We experienced an information technology security breach in the past and may be vulnerable to future security breaches,
which could disrupt our operations and have a material adverse effect on our business results of operation and financial
performance.
Despite our efforts to protect against cyber-attacks, we are not fully insulated from these types of security breaches, and such
an attack could adversely impact our competitiveness and results of operations. In September 2020, we discovered ransomware on
certain of our internal systems, encrypting files and holding them for ransom. Our teams responded quickly to address the incident
and notified law enforcement, and after a thorough review of the incident by our management and experts retained to assist in this
incident, the investigation was closed as of October 14, 2020. Our IBX data centers and our service offerings, including managed
services, remained fully operational during the attack and the incident did not affect our ability to support our customers. We further
believe that we were able to contain the incident and that the resolution will prevent the release of any data associated with this
attack. While the event has been resolved and has not caused a material disruption to our systems nor resulted in any material
costs to us, we are also working to protect against any future attacks. We will continue to face risks associated with unauthorized
access to our computer systems, loss or destruction of data, computer viruses, ransomware, malware, distributed denial-of-service
attacks or other malicious activities. These threats may result from human error, equipment failure, fraud or malice on the part of
employees, vendors or third parties. As techniques used to breach security change frequently and are generally not recognized until
launched against a target, we may not be able to promptly detect that a cyber breach has occurred, or implement security
measures in a timely manner or, if and when implemented, we may not be able to determine the extent to which these measures
could be circumvented. Because of the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic, many of our non-IBX employees are working from home and
could potentially be exposed to new security risks or attempted breaches because of these new work environments. Our adaptation
to a hybrid working model that includes both work from home and in an office could continue to expose us to new security risks. A
party who is able to compromise the security measures on our networks or the security of our infrastructure could misappropriate
either our proprietary information or the personal information of our customers or our employees, or cause interruptions or
malfunctions in our operations or our customers' operations. As we provide assurances to our customers that we provide a high
level of security, such a compromise could be particularly harmful to our brand and reputation. We may be required to expend
significant capital and resources to protect against such threats or to alleviate problems caused by breaches in security. Any
breaches that may occur in the future could expose us to increased risk of lawsuits, regulatory penalties, loss of existing or potential
customers, damage relating to loss of proprietary information, harm to our reputation and increases in our security costs, which
could have a material adverse effect on our financial performance and results of operations. We maintain insurance coverage for
cyber risks, but such coverage may be unavailable or insufficient to cover our losses.
We offer professional services to our customers where we consult on data center solutions and assist with implementations. We
also offer managed services in certain of our foreign jurisdictions outside of the U.S. where we manage the data center
infrastructure for our customers. The access to our clients' networks and data, which is gained from these services, creates some
risk that our clients' networks or data will be improperly accessed. We may also design our clients' cloud storage systems in such a
way that exposes our clients to increased risk of data breach. If we were held responsible for any such breach, it could result in a
significant loss to us, including damage to our client relationships, harm to our brand and reputation, and legal liability.
Terrorist activity, or other acts of violence, including violence stemming from the current climate of political and economic
uncertainty, could adversely impact our business.
18
Table of Contents
The continued threat of terrorist activity and other acts of war or hostility both domestically and abroad by terrorist
organizations, organized crime organizations, or other criminals along with violence stemming from political unrest, contribute to a
climate of political and economic uncertainty in many of the regions in which we operate. Due to existing or developing
circumstances, we may need to incur additional costs in the future to provide enhanced security, including cyber security and
physical security, which could have a material adverse effect on our business and results of operations. These circumstances may
also adversely affect our ability to attract and retain customers and employees, our ability to raise capital and the operation and
maintenance of our IBX data centers.
Our offerings have a long sales cycle that may harm our revenue and results of operations.
A customer's decision to purchase our offerings typically involves a significant commitment of resources. In addition, some
customers will be reluctant to commit to locating in our IBX data centers until they are confident that the IBX data center has
adequate carrier connections. As a result, we have a long sales cycle. Furthermore, we may devote significant time and resources
to pursuing a particular sale or customer that does not result in revenues.
Delays due to the length of our sales cycle may materially and adversely affect our revenues and results of operations, which
could harm our ability to meet our forecasts and cause volatility in our stock price.
Any failure of our physical infrastructure or negative impact on our ability to meet our obligations to our customers, or
damage to customer infrastructure within our IBX data centers, could lead to significant costs and disruptions that could
reduce our revenue and harm our business reputation and financial results.
Our business depends on providing customers with highly reliable solutions. We must safeguard our customers' infrastructure
and equipment located in our IBX data centers and ensure our IBX data centers and non-IBX offices remain operational at all times.
We own certain of our IBX data centers, but others are leased by us, and we rely on the landlord for basic maintenance of our
leased IBX data centers and office buildings. If such landlord has not maintained a leased property sufficiently, we may be forced
into an early exit from the center which could be disruptive to our business. Furthermore, we continue to acquire IBX data centers
not built by us. If we discover that these buildings and their infrastructure assets are not in the condition we expected when they
were acquired, we may be required to incur substantial additional costs to repair or upgrade the IBX data centers. Newly acquired
data centers also may not have the same power infrastructure and design in place as our own IBX data centers. These legacy
designs could require upgrades in order to meet our standards and our customers’ expectations. Until the legacy systems are
brought up to our standards, customers in these legacy IBX data centers could be exposed to higher risks of unexpected power
outages. We have experienced power outages because of these legacy design issues in the past and our customers could
experience these in the future.
Problems at one or more of our IBX data centers or corporate offices, whether or not within our control, could result in service
interruptions or significant infrastructure or equipment damage. These could result from numerous factors, including but not limited
to:
•human error;
•equipment failure;
•physical, electronic and cyber security breaches;
•fire, earthquake, hurricane, flood, tornado and other natural disasters;
•extreme temperatures;
•water damage;
•fiber cuts;
•power loss;
•terrorist acts;
•sabotage and vandalism;
•global pandemics such as the COVID-19 pandemic;
•inability of our operations employees to access our IBX data centers for any reason; and
•failure of business partners who provide our resale products.
19
Table of Contents
We have service level commitment obligations to certain customers. As a result, service interruptions or significant equipment
damage in our IBX data centers could result in difficulty maintaining service level commitments to these customers and potential
claims related to such failures. Because our IBX data centers are critical to many of our customers' businesses, service
interruptions or significant equipment damage in our IBX data centers could also result in lost profits or other indirect or
consequential damages to our customers. We cannot guarantee that a court would enforce any contractual limitations on our
liability in the event that one of our customers brings a lawsuit against us as a result of a problem at one of our IBX data centers
and we may decide to reach settlements with affected customers irrespective of any such contractual limitations. Any such
settlement may result in a reduction of revenue under U.S. generally accepted accounting principles ("GAAP"). In addition, any loss
of service, equipment damage or inability to meet our service level commitment obligations could reduce the confidence of our
customers and could consequently impair our ability to obtain and retain customers, which would adversely affect both our ability to
generate revenues and our results of operations.
Furthermore, we are dependent upon internet service providers, telecommunications carriers and other website operators in the
Americas, Asia-Pacific and EMEA regions and elsewhere, some of which have experienced significant system failures and electrical
outages in the past. Our customers may in the future experience difficulties due to system failures unrelated to our systems and
offerings. If, for any reason, these providers fail to provide the required services, our business, financial condition and results of
operations could be materially and adversely impacted.
Our IBX data center employees are critical to our ability to maintain our business operations and reach our service level
commitments. Although we have redundancies built into our network, if our IBX employees are unable to access our IBX data
centers for any reason, we could experience operational issues at the affected site. Pandemics, weather and climate related crises
or any other social, political, or economic disruption in the U.S. or abroad could prevent sufficient staffing at our IBX data centers
and have a material adverse impact on our operations.
We are currently making significant investments in our back-office information technology systems and processes.
Difficulties from or disruptions to these efforts may interrupt our normal operations and adversely affect our business and
results of operations.
We have been investing heavily in our back-office information technology systems and processes for a number of years and
expect such investment to continue for the foreseeable future in support of our pursuit of global, scalable solutions across all
geographies and functions that we operate in. These continuing investments include: 1) ongoing improvements to the customer
experience from initial quote to customer billing and our revenue recognition process; 2) integration of recently-acquired operations
onto our various information technology systems; and 3) implementation of new tools and technologies to either further streamline
and automate processes, or to support our compliance with evolving U.S. GAAP. Our finance team is also working on a multi-year
project to move the backbone of our finance systems to the cloud. As a result of our continued work on these projects, we may
experience difficulties with our systems, management distraction and significant business disruptions. For example, difficulties with
our systems may interrupt our ability to accept and deliver customer orders and may adversely impact our overall financial
operations, including our accounts payable, accounts receivables, general ledger, fixed assets, revenue recognition, close
processes, internal financial controls and our ability to otherwise run and track our business. We may need to expend significant
attention, time and resources to correct problems or find alternative sources for performing these functions. All of these changes to
our financial systems also create an increased risk of deficiencies in our internal controls over financial reporting until such systems
are stabilized. Such significant investments in our back-office systems may take longer to complete and cost more than originally
planned. In addition, we may not realize the full benefits we hoped to achieve and there is a risk of an impairment charge if we
decide that portions of these projects will not ultimately benefit us or are de-scoped. Finally, the collective impact of these changes
to our business has placed significant demands on impacted employees across multiple functions, increasing the risk of errors and
control deficiencies in our financial statements, distraction from the effective operation of our business and difficulty in attracting and
retaining employees. Any such difficulties or disruptions may adversely affect our business and results of operations.
The level of insurance coverage that we purchase may prove to be inadequate.
We carry liability, property, business interruption and other insurance policies to cover insurable risks to our company. We select
the types of insurance, the limits and the deductibles based on our specific risk profile, the cost of the insurance coverage versus its
perceived benefit and general industry standards. Our insurance policies
20
Table of Contents
contain industry standard exclusions for events such as war and nuclear reaction. We purchase earthquake insurance for certain of
our IBX data centers, but for our IBX data centers in high-risk zones, including those in California and Japan, we have elected to
self-insure. The earthquake and flood insurance that we do purchase would be subject to high deductibles. Any of the limits of
insurance that we purchase, including those for cyber risks, could prove to be inadequate, which could materially and adversely
impact our business, financial condition and results of operations.
The use of high power density equipment may limit our ability to fully utilize our older IBX data centers.
Some customers have increased their use of high power density equipment, such as blade servers, in our IBX data centers
which has increased the demand for power on a per cabinet basis. Because many of our IBX data centers were built a number of
years ago, the current demand for power may exceed the designed electrical capacity in these IBX data centers. As power, not
space, is a limiting factor in many of our IBX data centers, our ability to fully utilize those IBX data centers may be impacted. The
ability to increase the power capacity of an IBX data center, should we decide to, is dependent on several factors including, but not
limited to, the local utility's ability to provide additional power; the length of time required to provide such power; and/or whether it is
feasible to upgrade the electrical infrastructure of an IBX data center to deliver additional power to customers. Although we are
currently designing and building to a higher power specification than that of many of our older IBX data centers, there is a risk that
demand will continue to increase and our IBX data centers could become underutilized sooner than expected.
If we are unable to implement our evolving organizational structure or if we are unable to recruit or retain key executives
and qualified personnel, our business could be harmed.
In connection with the evolving needs of our customers and our business, we continue to review our organizational architecture
and have made, and will continue to make, changes as appropriate. There can be no assurances that any of these changes will not
result in attrition, that the significant amount of management and other employees' time and focus to implement the changes will not
divert attention from operating and growing the business, or that any changes will result in increased organizational effectiveness.
We must also continue to identify, hire, train and retain key personnel who maintain relationships with our customers and who can
provide the technical, strategic and marketing skills required for our company's growth. There is a shortage of qualified personnel in
these fields, and we compete with other companies for the limited pool of talent.
The failure to recruit and retain necessary key executives and personnel could cause disruption, harm our business and
hamper our ability to grow our company.
We may not be able to compete successfully against current and future competitors.
The global multi-tenant data center market is highly fragmented. It is estimated that we are one of more than 1,200 companies
that provide these offerings around the world. We compete with these firms which vary in terms of their data center offerings. We
must continue to evolve our product strategy and be able to differentiate our IBX data centers and product offerings from those of
our competitors.
Some of our competitors may adopt aggressive pricing policies, especially if they are not highly leveraged or have lower return
thresholds than we do. As a result, we may suffer from pricing pressure that would adversely affect our ability to generate revenues.
Some of these competitors may also provide our target customers with additional benefits, including bundled communication
services or cloud services, and may do so in a manner that is more attractive to our potential customers than obtaining space in our
IBX data centers. Similarly, with growing acceptance of cloud-based technologies, we are at risk of losing customers that may
decide to fully leverage cloud infrastructure offerings instead of managing their own. Competitors could also operate more
successfully or form alliances to acquire significant market share.
Failure to compete successfully may materially adversely affect our financial condition, cash flows and results of operations.
If we cannot continue to develop, acquire, market and provide new offerings or enhancements to existing offerings that
meet customer requirements and differentiate us from our competitors, our results of operations could suffer.
21
Table of Contents
As our customers evolve their IT strategies, we must remain flexible and evolve along with new technologies and industry and
market shifts. Ineffective planning and execution in our cloud and product development strategies may cause difficulty in sustaining
our competitive advantages.
The process of developing and acquiring new offerings and enhancing existing offerings is complex. If we fail to anticipate
customers’ evolving needs and expectations or do not adapt to technological and IT trends, our results of operations could suffer. In
order to adapt effectively, we sometimes must make long-term investments, develop, acquire or obtain certain intellectual property
and commit significant resources before knowing whether our predictions will accurately reflect customer demand for the new
offerings. If we misjudge customer needs in the future, our new offerings may not succeed, and our revenues and earnings may be
harmed. Additionally, any delay in the development, acquisition, marketing or launch of a new offering could result in customer
dissatisfaction or attrition. If we cannot continue adapting our products, or if our competitors can adapt their products more quickly
than us, our business could be harmed.
We have recently invested in joint ventures in order to develop capacity to serve the large footprint needs of a targeted set of
hyperscale customers by leveraging existing capacity and dedicated hyperscale builds. We have announced our intention to seek
additional joint venture partners for certain of our hyperscale builds. There can be no assurances that our joint ventures will be
successful or that we find additional partners or that we are able to successfully meet the needs of these customers.
In 2020, we also acquired Packet Host, Inc. ("Packet"), a bare metal automation company to facilitate a new hardware product
offering for us and we expect to continue to consider other new product offerings for our customers. Hardware solutions are a new
market area for us which can bring challenges and could harm our business if not executed in the time or manner that we expect.
While we believe this new product offering and others we may implement in the future will be desirable to our customers and will
complement our other offerings on Platform Equinix, we cannot guarantee the success of this product or any other new product
offering.
Our results of operations may fluctuate.
We have experienced fluctuations in our results of operations on a quarterly and annual basis. The fluctuations in our results of
operations may cause the market price of our common stock to be volatile. We may experience significant fluctuations in our results
of operations in the foreseeable future due to a variety of factors, including, but not limited to:
•fluctuations of foreign currencies in the markets in which we operate;
•the timing and magnitude of depreciation and interest expense or other expenses related to the acquisition, purchase or
construction of additional IBX data centers or the upgrade of existing IBX data centers;
•demand for space, power and solutions at our IBX data centers;
•increased costs of power;
•changes in general economic conditions, such as those stemming from pandemics or other economic downturns, or
specific market conditions in the telecommunications and internet industries, any of which could have a material impact on
us or on our customer base;
•charges to earnings resulting from past acquisitions due to, among other things, impairment of goodwill or intangible assets,
reduction in the useful lives of intangible assets acquired, identification of additional assumed contingent liabilities or
revised estimates to restructure an acquired company's operations;
•the duration of the sales cycle for our offerings and our ability to ramp our newly-hired sales persons to full productivity
within the time period we have forecasted;
•additions and changes in product offerings and our ability to ramp up and integrate new products within the time period we
have forecasted;
•restructuring charges or reversals of restructuring charges, which may be necessary due to revised sublease assumptions,
changes in strategy or otherwise;
•acquisitions or dispositions we may make;
•the financial condition and credit risk of our customers;
22
Table of Contents
•the provision of customer discounts and credits;
•the mix of current and proposed products and offerings and the gross margins associated with our products and offerings;
•the timing required for new and future IBX data centers to open or become fully utilized;
•competition in the markets in which we operate;
•conditions related to international operations;
•increasing repair and maintenance expenses in connection with aging IBX data centers;
•lack of available capacity in our existing IBX data centers to generate new revenue or delays in opening new or acquired
IBX data centers that delay our ability to generate new revenue in markets which have otherwise reached capacity;
•changes in rent expense as we amend our IBX data center leases in connection with extending their lease terms when their
initial lease term expiration dates approach or changes in shared operating costs in connection with our leases, which are
commonly referred to as common area maintenance expenses;
•the timing and magnitude of other operating expenses, including taxes, expenses related to the expansion of sales,
marketing, operations and acquisitions, if any, of complementary businesses and assets; the cost and availability of
adequate public utilities, including electricity;
•changes in employee stock-based compensation;
•overall inflation;
•increasing interest expense due to any increases in interest rates and/or potential additional debt financings;
•changes in our tax planning strategies or failure to realize anticipated benefits from such strategies;
•changes in income tax benefit or expense; and
•changes in or new GAAP as periodically released by the Financial Accounting Standards Board ("FASB").
Any of the foregoing factors, or other factors discussed elsewhere in this report, could have a material adverse effect on our
business, results of operations and financial condition. Although we have experienced growth in revenues in recent quarters, this
growth rate is not necessarily indicative of future results of operations. Prior to 2008, we had generated net losses every fiscal year
since inception. It is possible that we may not be able to generate net income on a quarterly or annual basis in the future. In
addition, a relatively large portion of our expenses are fixed in the short-term, particularly with respect to lease and personnel
expenses, depreciation and amortization and interest expenses. Therefore, our results of operations are particularly sensitive to
fluctuations in revenues. As such, comparisons to prior reporting periods should not be relied upon as indications of our future
performance. In addition, our results of operations in one or more future quarters may fail to meet the expectations of securities
analysts or investors.
Our DSO may be negatively impacted by process and system upgrades and acquisitions.
Our DSO may be negatively impacted by ongoing process and system upgrades which can impact our customers' experience
in the short term, together with integrating recent acquisitions into our processes and systems, which may have a negative impact
on our operating cash flows, liquidity and financial condition.
We may incur goodwill and other intangible asset impairment charges, or impairment charges to our property, plant and
equipment, which could result in a significant reduction to our earnings.
In accordance with U.S. GAAP, we are required to assess our goodwill and other intangible assets annually, or more frequently
whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate potential impairment, such as changing market conditions or any changes in
key assumptions. If the testing performed indicates that an asset may not be recoverable, we are required to record a non-cash
impairment charge for the difference between the carrying value of the goodwill or other intangible assets and the implied fair value
of the goodwill or other intangible assets in the period the determination is made.
We also periodically monitor the remaining net book values of our property, plant and equipment, including at the individual IBX
data center level. Although each individual IBX data center is currently performing in accordance
23
Table of Contents
with our expectations, the possibility that one or more IBX data centers could begin to under-perform relative to our expectations is
possible and may also result in non-cash impairment charges.
These charges could be significant, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations or
financial condition.
We have incurred substantial losses in the past and may incur additional losses in the future.
As of December 31, 2021, our retained earnings were $2.3 billion. Although we have generated net income for each fiscal year
since 2008, except for the year ended December 31, 2014, we are currently investing heavily in our future growth through the build
out of multiple additional IBX data centers, expansions of IBX data centers and acquisitions of complementary businesses. As a
result, we will incur higher depreciation and other operating expenses, as well as transaction costs and interest expense, that may
negatively impact our ability to sustain profitability in future periods unless and until these new IBX data centers generate enough
revenue to exceed their operating costs and cover the additional overhead needed to scale our business for this anticipated growth.
The current global financial uncertainty may also impact our ability to sustain profitability if we cannot generate sufficient revenue to
offset the increased costs of our recently-opened IBX data centers or IBX data centers currently under construction. In addition,
costs associated with the acquisition and integration of any acquired companies, as well as the additional interest expense
associated with debt financing, we have undertaken to fund our growth initiatives, may also negatively impact our ability to sustain
profitability. Finally, given the competitive and evolving nature of the industry in which we operate, we may not be able to sustain or
increase profitability on a quarterly or annual basis.
The failure to obtain favorable terms when we renew our IBX data center leases, or the failure to renew such leases, could
harm our business and results of operations.
While we own certain of our IBX data centers, others are leased under long-term arrangements. These leased IBX data centers
have all been subject to significant development by us in order to convert them from, in most cases, vacant buildings or warehouses
into IBX data centers. Most of our IBX data center leases have renewal options available to us. However, many of these renewal
options provide for the rent to be set at then-prevailing market rates. To the extent that then-prevailing market rates or negotiated
rates are higher than present rates, these higher costs may adversely impact our business and results of operations, or we may
decide against renewing the lease. In the event that an IBX data center lease does not have a renewal option, or we fail to exercise
a renewal option in a timely fashion and lose our right to renew the lease, we may not be successful in negotiating a renewal of the
lease with the landlord. A failure to renew a lease could force us to exit a building prematurely, which could disrupt our business,
harm our customer relationships, expose us to liability under our customer contracts, cause us to take impairment charges and
affect our results of operations negatively.
We depend on a number of third parties to provide internet connectivity to our IBX data centers; if connectivity is
interrupted or terminated, our results of operations and cash flow could be materially and adversely affected.
The presence of diverse telecommunications carriers' fiber networks in our IBX data centers is critical to our ability to retain and
attract new customers. We are not a telecommunications carrier, and as such, we rely on third parties to provide our customers with
carrier services. We believe that the availability of carrier capacity will directly affect our ability to achieve our projected results. We
rely primarily on revenue opportunities from the telecommunications carriers' customers to encourage them to invest the capital and
operating resources required to connect from their data centers to our IBX data centers. Carriers will likely evaluate the revenue
opportunity of an IBX data center based on the assumption that the environment will be highly competitive. We cannot provide
assurance that each and every carrier will elect to offer its services within our IBX data centers or that once a carrier has decided to
provide internet connectivity to our IBX data centers that it will continue to do so for any period of time.
Our new IBX data centers require construction and operation of a sophisticated redundant fiber network. The construction
required to connect multiple carrier facilities to our IBX data centers is complex and involves factors outside of our control, including
regulatory processes and the availability of construction resources. Any hardware or fiber failures on this network may result in
significant loss of connectivity to our new IBX data center expansions. This could affect our ability to attract new customers to these
IBX data centers or retain existing customers.
24
Table of Contents
To date, the network neutrality of our IBX data centers and the variety of networks available to our customers has often been a
competitive advantage for us. In certain of our acquired IBX data centers in the Asia-Pacific region, the limited number of carriers
available reduces that advantage. As a result, we may need to adapt our key revenue-generating offerings and pricing to be
competitive in those markets.
If the establishment of highly diverse internet connectivity to our IBX data centers does not occur, is materially delayed or is
discontinued, or is subject to failure, our results of operations and financial condition will be adversely affected.
We have government customers, which subjects us to risks including early termination, audits, investigations, sanctions
and penalties.
We derive revenues from contracts with the U.S. government, state and local governments and foreign governments. Some of
these customers may terminate all or part of their contracts at any time, without cause. There is increased pressure for
governments and their agencies, both domestically and internationally, to reduce spending. Some of our federal government
contracts are subject to the approval of appropriations being made by the U.S. Congress to fund the expenditures under these
contracts. Similarly, some of our contracts at the state and local levels are subject to government funding authorizations.
Government contracts often have unique terms and conditions, such as most favored customer obligations, and are generally
subject to audits and investigations which could result in various civil and criminal penalties and administrative sanctions, including
termination of contracts, refund of a portion of fees received, forfeiture of profits, suspension of payments, fines and suspensions or
debarment from future government business.
Additionally, as a Government Contractor, we could be subject to additional orders and laws such as the US Vaccine Mandate
which could have a material adverse effect on our employee satisfaction and our business.
Because we depend on the development and growth of a balanced customer base, including key magnet customers,
failure to attract, grow and retain this base of customers could harm our business and results of operations.
Our ability to maximize revenues depends on our ability to develop and grow a balanced customer base, consisting of a variety
of companies, including enterprises, cloud, digital content and financial companies, and network service providers. We consider
certain of these customers to be key magnets in that they draw in other customers. The more balanced the customer base within
each IBX data center, the better we will be able to generate significant interconnection revenues, which in turn increases our overall
revenues. Our ability to attract customers to our IBX data centers will depend on a variety of factors, including the presence of
multiple carriers, the mix of our offerings, the overall mix of customers, the presence of key customers attracting business through
vertical market ecosystems, the IBX data center's operating reliability and security and our ability to effectively market our offerings.
However, some of our customers may face competitive pressures and may ultimately not be successful or may be consolidated
through merger or acquisition. If these customers do not continue to use our IBX data centers it may be disruptive to our business.
Finally, any uncertain global economic climate, including the one we are currently experiencing as a result of the ongoing COVID-19
pandemic, could harm our ability to attract and retain customers if customers slow spending, or delay decision-making on our
offerings, or if customers begin to have difficulty paying us or seek bankruptcy protection and we experience increased churn in our
customer base. Any of these factors may hinder the development, growth and retention of a balanced customer base and adversely
affect our business, financial condition and results of operations.
Industry consolidation may have a negative impact on our business model.
If customers combine businesses, they may require less colocation space, which could lead to churn in our customer base.
Regional competitors may also consolidate to become a global competitor. Consolidation of our customers and/or our competitors
may present a risk to our business model and have a negative impact on our revenues.
25
Table of Contents
Our business could be harmed by increased costs to procure power, prolonged power outages, shortages or capacity
constraints.
Any power outages, shortages, capacity constraints or significant increase in the cost of power may have an adverse effect on
our business and our results of operations.
In each of our markets, we rely on third parties, and their infrastructure, to provide a sufficient amount of power for current and
future customers. At the same time, power and cooling requirements are increasing per unit of equipment. As a result, some
customers are consuming an increasing amount of power per cabinet. We generally do not control the amount of power our
customers draw from their installed circuits, which can result in growth in the aggregate power consumption of our facilities beyond
our original plan and expectations. This means that limitations on the capacity of our electrical delivery systems and equipment
could limit customer utilization of our IBX data centers. These limitations could have a negative impact on the effective available
capacity of a given center and limit our ability to grow our business, which could have a negative impact on our financial
performance, results of operations and cash flows.
Our IBX data centers are affected by problems accessing electricity sources, such as planned or unplanned power outages and
limitations on transmission or distribution. Unplanned power outages, including, but not limited to those relating to large storms,
earthquakes, fires, tsunamis, cyberattacks, and any failures of electrical power grids more generally, and planned power outages by
public utilities, such as those related to Pacific Gas and Electric Company's planned outages in California to minimize fire risks,
could harm our customers and our business. Many of our employees in California are still working from home because of the
ongoing COVID-19 pandemic and they could be subjected to planned power outages at home which could be difficult to track and
could affect our day to day operations of our non-IBX employees. Our international operations are sometimes located outside of
developed, reliable electricity markets, where we are exposed to some insecurity in supply associated with technical and regulatory
problems, as well as transmission constraints. Some of our IBX data centers are located in leased buildings where, depending upon
the lease requirements and number of tenants involved, we may or may not control some or all of the infrastructure including
generators and fuel tanks. As a result, in the event of a power outage, we may be dependent upon the landlord, as well as the utility
company, to restore the power. We attempt to limit our exposure to system downtime by using backup generators and alternative
power supplies, but these measures may not always prevent downtime, which can adversely affect customer experience and
revenues.
We are currently experiencing inflation and volatility pressures in the energy market globally. In particular, current dislocation in
the Singapore power market has resulted in Equinix having to buy power at extremely elevated spot rates and this ongoing price
volatility impacted elements of our 2022 financial projections. Various macroeconomic factors are contributing to the instability and
global power shortage including the COVID-19 pandemic, severe weather events, governmental regulations, government relations
and inflation. The price for power in many of the countries in which we operate has seen significant increases in recent months, and
it is unclear when the markets will stabilize. While we have aimed to minimize our risk exposure related to power procurement in
Singapore and globally via hedging, conservation, and other efficiencies, we expect the cost for power to continue to be volatile and
unpredictable and subject to inflationary pressures. We believe we have made appropriate estimates for these costs in our
forecasting but the unpredictable energy market at this time could materially affect our financial forecasting, results of operations
and financial condition.
Each new facility requires access to significant quantities of electricity. Limitations on generation, transmission and distribution
may limit our ability to obtain sufficient power capacity for potential expansion sites in new or existing markets. We may experience
significant delays and substantial increased costs demanded by the utilities to provide the level of electrical service required by our
current IBX data center designs.
Risks Related to Our Expansion Plans
Our construction of new IBX data centers or IBX data center expansions could involve significant risks to our business.
In order to sustain our growth in certain of our existing and new markets, we may have to expand an existing data center, lease
a new facility or acquire suitable land, with or without structures, to build new IBX data centers from the ground up. Expansions or
new builds are currently underway, or being contemplated, in many of our markets. These construction projects expose us to many
risks which could have an adverse effect on our results of operations and financial condition. The ongoing COVID-19 pandemic,
supply chain issues and inflation have
26
Table of Contents
exacerbated many of these construction risks and created additional risks for our business. Some of the risks associated with
construction projects include:
•construction delays;
•lack of availability and delays for data center equipment, including items such as generators and switchgear;
•unexpected budget changes;
•increased prices for and delays in obtaining building supplies, raw materials and data center equipment;
•labor availability, labor disputes and work stoppages with contractors, subcontractors and other third parties, including
interruptions in work due to the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic;
•unanticipated environmental issues and geological problems;
•delays related to permitting and approvals to open from public agencies and utility companies;
•delays in site readiness leading to our failure to meet commitments made to customers planning to expand into a new build;
and
•unanticipated customer requirements that would necessitate alternative data center design, making our sites less desirable
or leading to increased costs in order to make necessary modifications or retrofits.
We are currently experiencing rising construction costs which reflect the increase in cost of labor and raw materials, supply
chain and logistic challenges, and high demand in our sector. While we have invested in creating a material inventory to mitigate
supply chain issues and inflation, it may not be sufficient and ongoing delays, difficulty finding replacement products and continued
high inflation could affect our business and growth and could have a material effect on our business. Additional or unexpected
disruptions to our supply chain or inflationary pressures could significantly affect the cost of our planned expansion projects and
interfere with our ability to meet commitments to customers who have contracted for space in new IBX data centers under
construction.
Construction projects are dependent on permitting from public agencies and utility companies. Any delay in permitting could
affect our growth. We are currently experiencing permitting delays in most metros due to reduced production from labor availability
and from other COVID-19 pandemic related permitting restrictions or stoppages. While we don't currently anticipate any material
long-term negative impact to our business because of these construction delays, these types of delays and stoppages related to
permitting from public agencies and utility companies could worsen and have an adverse effect on our bookings, revenue or growth.
Additionally, all construction related projects require us to carefully select and rely on the experience of one or more designers,
general contractors, and associated subcontractors during the design and construction process. Should a designer, general
contractor, significant subcontractor or key supplier experience financial problems or other problems during the design or
construction process, we could experience significant delays, increased costs to complete the project and/or other negative impacts
to our expected returns.
Site selection is also a critical factor in our expansion plans. There may not be suitable properties available in our markets with
the necessary combination of high-power capacity and fiber connectivity, or selection may be limited. Thus, while we may prefer to
locate new IBX data centers adjacent to our existing locations, it may not always be possible. In the event we decide to build new
IBX data centers separate from our existing IBX data centers, we may provide metro connect solutions to connect these two IBX
data centers. Should these solutions not provide the necessary reliability to sustain connection, this could result in lower
interconnection revenue and lower margins and could have a negative impact on customer retention over time.
Acquisitions present many risks, and we may not realize the financial or strategic goals that were contemplated at the time
of any transaction.
Over the last several years, we have completed numerous acquisitions, including most recently that of GPX Global System's,
Inc.'s India operations in September 2021, certain data centers from BCE Inc. ("Bell") in Canada in the fourth quarter of 2020,
Packet in March 2020, and three data centers from Axtel S.A.B. de C.V. ("Axtel") in Mexico in January 2020. In 2021 we also
announced our intention to acquire MainOne, a leading West African data center and connectivity solutions provider, with operations
in Nigeria, Ghana and Côte d'Ivoire. We expect to make additional acquisitions in the future, which may include (i) acquisitions of
businesses, products, solutions or technologies that we believe to be complementary, (ii) acquisitions of new IBX data centers or
real estate for
27
Table of Contents
development of new IBX data centers; (iii) acquisitions through investments in local data center operators; or (iv) acquisitions in new
markets with higher risk profiles. We may pay for future acquisitions by using our existing cash resources (which may limit other
potential uses of our cash), incurring additional debt (which may increase our interest expense, leverage and debt service
requirements) and/or issuing shares (which may dilute our existing stockholders and have a negative effect on our earnings per
share). Acquisitions expose us to potential risks, many of which could be exacerbated by the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic,
including:
•the possible disruption of our ongoing business and diversion of management's attention by acquisition, transition and
integration activities, particularly when multiple acquisitions and integrations are occurring at the same time or when we are
entering an emerging market with a higher risk profile;
•our potential inability to successfully pursue or realize some or all of the anticipated revenue opportunities associated with
an acquisition or investment;
•the possibility that we may not be able to successfully integrate acquired businesses, or businesses in which we invest, or
achieve anticipated operating efficiencies or cost savings;
•the possibility that announced acquisitions may not be completed, due to failure to satisfy the conditions to closing as a
result of:
•an injunction, law or order that makes unlawful the consummation of the acquisition;
•inaccuracy or breach of the representations and warranties of, or the non-compliance with covenants by, either party;
•the nonreceipt of closing documents; or
•for other reasons;
•the possibility that there could be a delay in the completion of an acquisition, which could, among other things, result in
additional transaction costs, loss of revenue or other adverse effects resulting from such uncertainty;
•the possibility that our projections about the success of an acquisition could be inaccurate and any such inaccuracies could
have a material adverse effect on our financial projections;
•the dilution of our existing stockholders as a result of our issuing stock as consideration in a transaction or selling stock in
order to fund the transaction;
•the possibility of customer dissatisfaction if we are unable to achieve levels of quality and stability on par with past
practices;
•the possibility that we will be unable to retain relationships with key customers, landlords and/or suppliers of the acquired
businesses, some of which may terminate their contracts with the acquired business as a result of the acquisition or which
may attempt to negotiate changes in their current or future business relationships with us;
•the possibility that we could lose key employees from the acquired businesses;
•the possibility that we may be unable to integrate certain IT systems that do not meet Equinix's standard requirements with
respect to security, privacy or any other standard;
•the potential deterioration in our ability to access credit markets due to increased leverage;
•the possibility that our customers may not accept either the existing equipment infrastructure or the "look-and-feel" of a new
or different IBX data center;
•the possibility that additional capital expenditures may be required or that transaction expenses associated with acquisitions
may be higher than anticipated;
•the possibility that required financing to fund an acquisition may not be available on acceptable terms or at all;
•the possibility that we may be unable to obtain required approvals from governmental authorities under antitrust and
competition laws on a timely basis or at all, which could, among other things, delay or prevent us from completing an
acquisition, limit our ability to realize the expected financial or strategic benefits of an acquisition or have other adverse
effects on our current business and operations;
•the possible loss or reduction in value of acquired businesses;
28
Table of Contents
•the possibility that future acquisitions may present new complexities in deal structure, related complex accounting and
coordination with new partners, particularly in light of our desire to maintain our qualification for taxation as a REIT;
•the possibility that we may not be able to prepare and issue our financial statements and other public filings in a timely and
accurate manner, and/or maintain an effective control environment, due to the strain on the finance organization when
multiple acquisitions and integrations are occurring at the same time;
•the possibility that future acquisitions may trigger property tax reassessments resulting in a substantial increase to our
property taxes beyond that which we anticipated;
•the possibility that future acquisitions may be in geographies and regulatory environments to which we are unaccustomed
and we may become subject to complex requirements and risks with which we have limited experience;
•the possibility that future acquisitions may appear less attractive due to fluctuations in foreign currency rates;
•the possibility that carriers may find it cost-prohibitive or impractical to bring fiber and networks into a new IBX data center;
•the possibility of litigation or other claims in connection with, or as a result of, an acquisition, including claims from
terminated employees, customers, former stockholders or other third parties;
•the possibility that asset divestments may be required in order to obtain regulatory clearance for a transaction;
•the possibility of pre-existing undisclosed liabilities, including, but not limited to, lease or landlord related liability, tax liability,
environmental liability or asbestos liability, for which insurance coverage may be insufficient or unavailable, or other issues
not discovered in the diligence process;
•the possibility that we receive limited or incorrect information about the acquired business in the diligence process,
particularly in light of the travel bans and other restrictions imposed due to the COVID-19 pandemic; and
•the possibility that we do not have full visibility into customer agreements and customer termination rights during the
diligence process which could expose us to additional liabilities after completing the acquisition.
The occurrence of any of these risks could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations, financial
condition or cash flows. If an acquisition does not proceed or is materially delayed for any reason, the price of our common stock
may be adversely impacted, and we will not recognize the anticipated benefits of the acquisition.
We cannot assure that the price of any future acquisitions of IBX data centers will be similar to prior IBX data center
acquisitions. In fact, we expect costs required to build or render new IBX data centers operational to increase in the future. If our
revenue does not keep pace with these potential acquisition and expansion costs, we may not be able to maintain our current or
expected margins as we absorb these additional expenses. There is no assurance we would successfully overcome these risks, or
any other problems encountered with these acquisitions.
The anticipated benefits of our Joint Ventures may not be fully realized, or take longer to realize than expected.
We have entered into joint ventures to develop and operate xScale™ data centers (together, the “Joint Ventures”). Equinix
owns a 20% interest and our JV partners own an 80% interest in each joint venture, and Equinix operates all facilities.
Certain sites that are intended to be utilized in Joint Ventures require investment for development. The success of these Joint
Ventures will depend, in part, on the successful development of the data center sites, and we may not realize all of the anticipated
benefits. Such development may be more difficult, time-consuming or costly than expected and could result in increased costs,
decreases in the amount of expected revenues and diversion of management's time and energy, which could materially impact our
business, financial condition and results of operations. Additionally, if it is determined these sites are no longer desirable for the
Joint Ventures, we would need to adapt such sites for other purposes.
29
Table of Contents
We may not realize all of the anticipated benefits from our Joint Ventures. The success of these Joint Ventures will depend, in
part, on the successful partnership between Equinix and our JV partners. Such a partnership is subject to risks as outlined below in
our risk factor related to new joint ventures, and more generally, to the same types of business risks as would impact our IBX data
center business. A failure to successfully partner, or a failure to realize our expectations for the Joint Ventures, could materially
impact our business, financial condition and results of operations. These Joint Ventures could also be negatively impacted by
development and construction delays, including those resulting from the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic.
Joint venture investments could expose us to risks and liabilities in connection with the formation of the new joint
ventures, the operation of such joint ventures without sole decision-making authority, and our reliance on joint venture
partners who may have economic and business interests that are inconsistent with our business interests.
In addition to our current and proposed Joint Ventures, we may co-invest with other third parties through partnerships, joint
ventures or other entities in the future. These joint ventures could result in our acquisition of non-controlling interests in, or shared
responsibility for, managing the affairs of a property or portfolio of properties, partnership, joint venture or other entity. We may be
subject to additional risks, including:
•we may not have the right to exercise sole decision-making authority regarding the properties, partnership, joint venture or
other entity;
•if our partners become bankrupt or fail to fund their share of required capital contributions, we may choose to or be required
to contribute such capital;
•our partners may have economic, tax or other business interests or goals which are inconsistent with our business interests
or goals, and may be in a position to take actions contrary to our policies or objectives;
•our joint venture partners may take actions that are not within our control, which could require us to dispose of the joint
venture asset, transfer it to a TRS in order to maintain our qualification for taxation as a REIT, or purchase the partner's
interests or assets at an above-market price;
•our joint venture partners may take actions unrelated to our business agreement but which reflect poorly on us because of
our joint venture;
•disputes between us and our partners may result in litigation or arbitration that would increase our expenses and prevent
our management from focusing their time and effort on our day-to-day business; and
•we may in certain circumstances be liable for the actions of our third-party partners or guarantee all or a portion of the joint
venture's liabilities, which may require us to pay an amount greater than its investment in the joint venture.
Each of these factors may result in returns on these investments being less than we expect or in losses, and our financial and
results of operations may be adversely affected.
If we cannot effectively manage our international operations, and successfully implement our international expansion
plans, or comply with evolving laws and regulations, our revenues may not increase, and our business and results of
operations would be harmed.
For the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, we recognized approximately 61%, 59% and 58%, respectively, of
our revenues outside the U.S. We currently operate outside of the U.S. in Canada, Mexico, South America, Asia-Pacific, and EMEA.
To date, the network neutrality of our IBX data centers and the variety of networks available to our customers has often been a
competitive advantage for us. In addition, we are currently undergoing expansions or evaluating expansion opportunities outside of
the U.S. Undertaking and managing expansions in foreign jurisdictions may present unanticipated challenges to us.
Our international operations are generally subject to a number of additional risks, including:
30
Table of Contents
•the costs of customizing IBX data centers for foreign countries;
•protectionist laws and business practices favoring local competition;
•greater difficulty or delay in accounts receivable collection;
•difficulties in staffing and managing foreign operations, including negotiating with foreign labor unions or workers' councils;
•difficulties in managing across cultures and in foreign languages;
•political and economic instability;
•fluctuations in currency exchange rates;
•difficulties in repatriating funds from certain countries;
•our ability to obtain, transfer or maintain licenses required by governmental entities with respect to our business;
•unexpected changes in regulatory, tax and political environments such as the United Kingdom's withdrawal from the
European Union ("Brexit"), the Hong Kong national security law, and the current trade war between the U.S. and China;
•our ability to secure and maintain the necessary physical and telecommunications infrastructure;
•compliance with anti-bribery and corruption laws;
•compliance with economic and trade sanctions enforced by the Office of Foreign Assets Control of the U.S. Department of
Treasury;
•compliance with changing laws, policies, and requirements related to sustainability;
•compliance with evolving governmental regulation with which we have little experience; and
•compliance with evolving and varied regulations related to the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic and related vaccine mandates.
Geo-political events, such as the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic, Brexit, the Hong Kong national security law, the trade war
between the U.S. and China and Russian and Ukraine tensions, may increase the likelihood of the listed risks to occur and could
have a negative effect on our business domestically or internationally. With respect to Brexit, it is possible that the level of economic
activity in the United Kingdom and the rest of Europe will be adversely impacted and that we will face increased regulatory and legal
complexities in these regions which could have an adverse impact on our business and employees in EMEA and could adversely
affect our financial condition and results of operations. In addition, compliance with international and U.S. laws and regulations that
apply to our international operations increases our cost of doing business in foreign jurisdictions. These laws and regulations
include the General Data Protection Regulation ("GDPR") and other data privacy laws and requirements, labor relations laws, tax
laws, anti-competition regulations, import and trade restrictions, export requirements, economic and trade sanctions, U.S. laws such
as the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act and local laws which also prohibit corrupt payments to governmental officials. With respect to
the current trade war between the U.S. and China, we have several customers in China named in restrictive executive orders by the
previous U.S. administration that are currently covered by a freeze issued by the current U.S. administration or currently enjoined
from enforcement subject to pending litigation. If Equinix is required to cease business with these companies, or additional
companies in the future, our revenues could be adversely affected. Violations of any of these domestic or international laws and
regulations could result in fines, criminal sanctions against us, our officers or our employees, and prohibitions on the conduct of our
business. Any such violations could include prohibitions on our ability to offer our offerings in one or more countries, could delay or
prevent potential acquisitions, and could also materially damage our reputation, our brand, our international expansion efforts, our
ability to attract and retain employees, our business and results of operations. Our success depends, in part, on our ability to
anticipate and address these risks and manage these difficulties.
We are continuing to invest in our expansion efforts but may not have sufficient customer demand in the future to realize
expected returns on these investments.
We are considering the acquisition or lease of additional properties and the construction of new IBX data centers beyond those
expansion projects already announced. We will be required to commit substantial operational and financial resources to these IBX
data centers, generally 12 to 18 months in advance of securing customer contracts, and we may not have sufficient customer
demand in those markets to support these IBX data centers once they are built. In addition, unanticipated technological changes
could affect customer requirements for data
31
Table of Contents
centers, and we may not have built such requirements into our new IBX data centers. Either of these contingencies, if they were to
occur, could make it difficult for us to realize expected or reasonable returns on these investments.
Risks Related to Our Capital Needs and Capital Strategy
Our substantial debt could adversely affect our cash flows and limit our flexibility to raise additional capital.
We have a significant amount of debt and may need to incur additional debt to support our growth. Additional debt may also be
incurred to fund future acquisitions, any future special distributions, regular distributions or the other cash outlays associated with
maintaining our qualification for taxation as a REIT. As of December 31, 2021, our total indebtedness (gross of debt issuance cost,
debt discount, and debt premium) was approximately $13.9 billion, our stockholders' equity was $10.9 billion and our cash and cash
equivalents totaled $1.5 billion. In addition, as of December 31, 2021, we had approximately $1.9 billion of additional liquidity
available to us from our $2.0 billion revolving credit facility. In addition to our substantial debt, we lease many of our IBX data
centers and certain equipment under lease agreements, some of which are accounted for as operating leases. As of December 31,
2021, we recorded operating lease liabilities of $1.3 billion, which represents our obligation to make lease payments under those
lease arrangements.
Our substantial amount of debt and related covenants, and our off-balance sheet commitments, could have important
consequences. For example, they could:
•require us to dedicate a substantial portion of our cash flow from operations to make interest and principal payments on our
debt and in respect of other off-balance sheet arrangements, reducing the availability of our cash flow to fund future capital
expenditures, working capital, execution of our expansion strategy and other general corporate requirements;
•increase the likelihood of negative outlook from our credit rating agencies, or of a downgrade to our current rating;
•make it more difficult for us to satisfy our obligations under our various debt instruments;
•increase our cost of borrowing and even limit our ability to access additional debt to fund future growth;
•increase our vulnerability to general adverse economic and industry conditions and adverse changes in governmental
regulations;
•limit our flexibility in planning for, or reacting to, changes in our business and industry, which may place us at a competitive
disadvantage compared with our competitors;
•limit our operating flexibility through covenants with which we must comply;
•limit our ability to borrow additional funds, even when necessary to maintain adequate liquidity, which would also limit our
ability to further expand our business; and
•make us more vulnerable to increases in interest rates because of the variable interest rates on some of our borrowings to
the extent we have not entirely hedged such variable rate debt.
The occurrence of any of the foregoing factors could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations and
financial condition.
We may also need to refinance a portion of our outstanding debt as it matures. There is a risk that we may not be able to
refinance existing debt or that the terms of any refinancing may not be as favorable as the terms of our existing debt. Furthermore,
if prevailing interest rates or other factors at the time of refinancing result in higher interest rates upon refinancing, then the interest
expense relating to that refinanced indebtedness would increase. These risks could materially adversely affect our financial
condition, cash flows and results of operations.
Sales or issuances of shares of our common stock may adversely affect the market price of our common stock.
Future sales or issuances of common stock or other equity related securities may adversely affect the market price of our
common stock, including any shares of our common stock issued to finance capital expenditures, finance acquisitions or repay
debt. In October 2020, we established an "at the market" equity offering program (the "2020 ATM Program") in the amount of $1.5
billion under which we may, from time to time, issue and sell shares of our common stock to or through sales agents up to
established limits. As of December 31, 2021, we had $1.0 billion available for sale under the 2020 ATM Program. We expect to
refresh our ATM program periodically, which could lead to additional dilution for our stockholders in the future. We may also seek
authorization to sell additional shares
32
Table of Contents
of common stock through other means which could lead to additional dilution for our stockholders. Please see Note 12 within the
Consolidated Financial Statements of this Annual Report on Form 10-K for sales of our common stock under our ATM programs.
If we are not able to generate sufficient operating cash flows or obtain external financing, our ability to fund incremental
expansion plans may be limited.
Our capital expenditures, together with ongoing operating expenses, obligations to service our debt and the cash outlays
associated with our REIT distribution requirements, are, and will continue to be, a substantial burden on our cash flow and may
decrease our cash balances. Additional debt or equity financing may not be available when needed or, if available, may not be
available on satisfactory terms. Our inability to obtain additional debt and/or equity financing or to generate sufficient cash from
operations may require us to prioritize projects or curtail capital expenditures which could adversely affect our results of operations.
Fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates in the markets in which we operate internationally could harm our results
of operations.
We may experience gains and losses resulting from fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates. To date, the majority of
revenues and costs in our international operations are denominated in foreign currencies. Where our prices are denominated in
U.S. Dollars, our sales and revenues could be adversely affected by declines in foreign currencies relative to the U.S. Dollar,
thereby making our offerings more expensive in local currencies. We are also exposed to risks resulting from fluctuations in foreign
currency exchange rates in connection with our international operations. To the extent we are paying contractors in foreign
currencies, our operations could cost more than anticipated as a result of declines in the U.S. Dollar relative to foreign currencies. In
addition, fluctuating foreign currency exchange rates have a direct impact on how our international results of operations translate
into U.S. Dollars.
Although we currently undertake, and may decide in the future to further undertake, foreign exchange hedging transactions to
reduce foreign currency transaction exposure, we do not currently intend to eliminate all foreign currency transaction exposure. In
addition, REIT compliance rules may restrict our ability to enter into hedging transactions. Therefore, any weakness of the U.S.
Dollar may have a positive impact on our consolidated results of operations because the currencies in the foreign countries in which
we operate may translate into more U.S. Dollars. However, if the U.S. Dollar strengthens relative to the currencies of the foreign
countries in which we operate, our consolidated financial position and results of operations may be negatively impacted as amounts
in foreign currencies will generally translate into fewer U.S. Dollars. For additional information on foreign currency risks, refer to our
discussion of foreign currency risk in "Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk" included in Item 7A of this Annual
Report on Form 10-K.
Our derivative transactions expose us to counterparty credit risk.
Our derivative transactions expose us to risk of financial loss if a counterparty fails to perform under a derivative contract.
Disruptions in the financial markets could lead to sudden decreases in a counterparty's liquidity, which could make them unable to
perform under the terms of their derivative contract and we may not be able to realize the benefit of the derivative contract.
Risks Related to Environmental Laws and Climate Change Impacts
Environmental regulations may impose upon us new or unexpected costs.
We are subject to various federal, state, local and international environmental and health and safety laws and regulations,
including those relating to the generation, storage, handling and disposal of hazardous substances and wastes. Certain of these
laws and regulations also impose joint and several liability, without regard to fault, for investigation and cleanup costs on current and
former owners and operators of real property and persons who have disposed of or released hazardous substances into the
environment. Our operations involve the use of hazardous substances and materials such as petroleum fuel for emergency
generators, as well as batteries, cleaning solutions and other materials. In addition, we lease, own or operate real property at which
hazardous substances and regulated materials have been used in the past. At some of our locations, hazardous substances or
regulated materials are known to be present in soil or groundwater, and there may be additional unknown hazardous
33
Table of Contents
substances or regulated materials present at sites we own, operate or lease. At some of our locations, there are land use
restrictions in place relating to earlier environmental cleanups that do not materially limit our use of the sites. To the extent any
hazardous substances or any other substance or material must be cleaned up or removed from our property, we may be
responsible under applicable laws, permits or leases for the removal or cleanup of such substances or materials, the cost of which
could be substantial.
We purchase significant amounts of electricity from generating facilities and utility companies that are subject to environmental
laws, regulations and permit requirements. These environmental requirements are subject to material change, which could result in
increases in our electricity suppliers' compliance costs that may be passed through to us. Regulations promulgated by the U.S. EPA
or state agencies, or by regulators in other countries, could limit air emissions from fossil fuel-fired power plants, restrict discharges
of cooling water, and otherwise impose new operational restraints on conventional power plants that could increase costs of
electricity. Regulatory programs intended to promote increased generation of electricity from renewable sources may also increase
our costs of procuring electricity. In addition, we are directly subject to environmental, health and safety laws regulating air
emissions, storm water management and other issues arising in our business. For example, our emergency generators are subject
to state and federal regulations governing air pollutants, which could limit the operation of those generators or require the
installation of new pollution control technologies. While environmental regulations do not normally impose material costs upon our
operations, unexpected events, equipment malfunctions, human error and changes in law or regulations, among other factors, can
lead to additional capital requirements, limitations upon our operations and unexpected increased costs.
Regulation of GHG emissions could increase the cost of electricity by reducing amounts of electricity generated from fossil
fuels, by requiring the use of more expensive generating methods, by requiring capture, management or reduction of GHG
emissions, or by imposing taxes or fees upon electricity generation or use. There has been interest in the U.S. Congress and in
countries where we operate abroad in addressing climate change. In the U.S., we believe there is a likelihood that new regulations
or legislation will be proposed and potentially enacted that would seek to limit carbon dioxide emissions and the use of fossil fuels.
Past legislative proposals to address climate change have included measures ranging from "carbon taxes," to tax credits, to
federally imposed limitations on GHG emissions. The course of future legislation and regulation in the U.S. and abroad remains
difficult to predict and the potential increased costs associated with GHG regulation or taxes cannot be estimated at this time.
State regulations also have the potential to increase our costs of obtaining electricity. Certain U.S. states in which we operate
have issued or are considering and may enact environmental regulations that could materially affect our facilities and electricity
costs. For example, California has limited GHG emissions from new and existing conventional power plants by imposing regulatory
caps and by auctioning the rights to emission allowances. Washington, Oregon and Massachusetts have issued regulations to
implement similar carbon cap and trade programs, and other states are considering proposals to limit carbon emissions through cap
and trade programs, carbon pricing programs and other mechanisms. Some northeastern states adopted a multi-state program for
limiting carbon emissions through the Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative ("RGGI") cap and trade program. Other countries in
which we operate may impose requirements and restrictions similar to those imposed in the U.S. Environmental regulations have
not had a material adverse effect on our electricity costs to date, but due to costs of changing pollution control technologies,
potential new regulatory requirements and the market-driven nature of some of the programs, such regulations could have a
material adverse effect on electricity costs in the future.
Aside from regulatory requirements, we have separately undertaken efforts to procure energy from renewable energy projects
in order to support new renewables development. These efforts to support and enhance renewable electricity generation may
increase our costs of electricity above those that would be incurred through procurement of conventional electricity from existing
sources or through conventional grids.
Our business may be adversely affected by climate change and responses to it.
Severe weather events, such as droughts, fires, flooding, heat waves, hurricanes, typhoons and other winter storms, pose a
threat to our IBX data centers and our customers' IT infrastructure through physical damage to facilities or equipment, power supply
disruption, and long-term effects on the cost of electricity. The frequency and intensity of severe weather events are reportedly
increasing as part of broader climate changes. Changes in global weather patterns may also pose long-term risks of physical
impacts to our business.
34
Table of Contents
We maintain disaster recovery and business continuity plans that would be implemented in the event of severe weather events
that interrupt our business or affect our customers' IT infrastructure housed in our IBX data centers. While these plans are designed
to allow us to recover from natural disasters or other events that can interrupt our business, we cannot be certain that our plans will
work as intended, facilitating our response to such disasters or events. Failure to prevent impact to customers from such events
could adversely affect our business.
U.S. and global environmental regulations are expected to continue to change and evolve and may impose upon us new or
unexpected costs. Concern about climate change in various jurisdictions may result in more stringent laws and regulatory
requirements regarding emissions of carbon dioxide or other GHGs. Restrictions on carbon dioxide or other GHG emissions could
result in significant increases in operating or capital costs, including higher energy costs generally, and increased costs from carbon
taxes, emission cap and trade programs and renewable portfolio standards that are imposed upon our electricity suppliers. These
higher energy costs, and the cost of complying across our global platform, or of failing to comply with these and any other climate
change regulations, may have an adverse effect on our business and our results of operations.
We may fail to achieve our environmental change goals which may adversely affect public perception of our business
and affect our relationship with our customers and/or our stockholders.
We have prioritized sustainability and have established long term goals of using 100% clean and renewable energy and
reducing our GHG emissions from our operations and supply chain. We also face pressure from our customers and stockholders,
who are increasingly focused on climate change, to prioritize renewable energy procurement, reduce our carbon footprint and
promote sustainable practices. To address these goals and concerns, where possible, we plan to continue to scale our renewable
energy strategy, seek low-carbon alternatives for traditional fuel sources and refrigerants, and pursue opportunities to improve
energy and water efficiency. As a result of these and other initiatives, we intend to make progress towards reducing our
environmental impact and global carbon footprint, as well as ensuring our business remains viable in a low-carbon economy. It is
possible, however, that we may fail to reach our stated environmental goals in a timely manner or that our customers and
stockholders might not be satisfied with our sustainability efforts or the speed of their adoption. A failure to meet our goals could
adversely affect public perception of our business, employee morale or customer or stockholder support. If we do not meet our
customers' or stockholders' expectations, our business and/or our share price could be harmed.
Risks Related to Certain Regulations and Laws, Including Tax Laws
Changes in U.S. or foreign tax laws, regulations, or interpretations thereof, including changes to tax rates, may adversely
affect our financial statements and cash taxes.
We are a U.S. company with global subsidiaries and are subject to income and other taxes in the U.S. (although currently
limited due to our taxation as a REIT) and many foreign jurisdictions. Significant judgment is required in determining our worldwide
provision for income and other taxes. Although we believe that we have adequately assessed and accounted for our potential tax
liabilities, and that our tax estimates are reasonable, there can be no certainty that additional taxes will not be due upon audit of our
tax returns or as a result of changes to the tax laws and interpretations thereof. For example, we are currently undergoing audits
and appealing the tentative assessments in a number of jurisdictions where we operate. The final results of these audits and the
outcomes of the appeals are uncertain and may not be resolved in our favor. Additionally, the U.S. Congress and the current
presidential administration of the U.S. have proposed various changes to federal income tax laws, including a potential minimum tax
as well as changes to the laws governing the U.S. taxation of foreign earned income under the GILTI (Global Intangible Low Taxed
Income) rules. It is unclear whether REITs might be exempt from the final legislation. Changes in tax laws, including the addition of
a minimum tax threshold and to the GILTI rules, could have a material adverse effect on our tax liability and increase our REIT
dividend distribution meaningfully.
The Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development ("OECD") is an international association made up of over 30
countries including the U.S. The OECD has proposed and made numerous changes to long-standing tax principles, which, if
adopted by the member countries, could have a materially adverse effect on our tax liabilities. For example, various jurisdictions are
starting to explore the taxation of digital service and the minimum effective tax rate Model Rules through the adoption of tax
principles which could have a negative effect on our tax liability.
35
Table of Contents
The ongoing COVID-19 pandemic has led to increased spending by many governments. Because of this, there could be
pressure to increase taxes in the future to pay back debts and generate revenues. The nature and timing of any future changes to
each jurisdiction's tax laws and the impact on our future tax liabilities because of the COVID-19 pandemic or for any other reason
cannot be predicted with any accuracy but could materially and adversely impact our results of operations and financial position or
cash flows.
Government regulation or failure to comply with laws and regulations may adversely affect our business.
Various laws and governmental regulations, both in the U.S. and abroad, governing internet-related services, related
communications services and information technologies remain largely unsettled, even in areas where there has been some
legislative action. For example, the Federal Communications Commission ("FCC") recently overturned network neutrality rules,
which may result in material changes in the regulations and contribution regime affecting us and our customers. Furthermore, the
U.S. Congress and state legislatures are reviewing and considering changes to the new FCC rules making the future of network
neutrality uncertain. Changes to these laws and regulations could have a material adverse effect on us and our customers. There
may also be forthcoming regulation in the U.S. on a federal or state level in the areas of cybersecurity, data privacy, taxation and
data security, any of which could impact us and our customers. Similarly, data privacy regulations continue to evolve and must be
addressed by Equinix as a global company.
We remain focused on whether and how existing and changing laws, such as those governing intellectual property, privacy,
libel, telecommunications services, data flows/data localization, carbon emissions impact, competition and antitrust, and taxation
apply to our business and those which might have a material effect on our customers’ decisions to purchase our services and
solutions. Substantial resources may be required to comply with regulations or bring any non-compliant business practices into
compliance with such regulations. In addition, the continuing development of the market for online commerce and the displacement
of traditional telephony service by the internet and related communications services may prompt an increased call for more
stringent consumer protection laws or other regulation both in the U.S. and abroad that may impose additional burdens on
companies conducting business online and their service providers.
While our business and IBX data centers are currently all operational and have been designated "critical infrastructure" or
"essential services" in order to remain open in many jurisdictions during the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic, any regulations
restricting our ability to operate our business due to the COVID-19 pandemic could have a material adverse effect on our business.
Additionally, the "essential services" and "critical infrastructure" designations we have experienced could lead countries or local
regulators to impose additional regulations on the data center industry due to the COVID-19 pandemic in order to have better
visibility and control over our industry for future events.
We strive to comply with all laws and regulations that apply to our business. However, as these laws evolve, they can be
subject to varying interpretations and regulatory discretion. To the extent a regulator or court disagrees with our interpretation of
these laws and determines that our practices are not in compliance with applicable laws and regulations, we could be subject to civil
and criminal penalties that could adversely affect our business operations. The adoption, or modification of laws or regulations
relating to the internet and our business, or interpretations of existing laws, could have a material adverse effect on our business,
financial condition and results of operations.
Risks Related to Our Taxation as a REIT
We may not remain qualified for taxation as a REIT.
We elected to be taxed as a REIT for U.S. federal income tax purposes beginning with our 2015 taxable year. We believe that
our organization and method of operation comply with the rules and regulations promulgated under the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended (the "Code"), such that we will continue to qualify for taxation as a REIT. However, we cannot assure you that we
have qualified for taxation as a REIT or that we will remain so qualified. Qualification for taxation as a REIT involves the application
of highly technical and complex provisions of the Code to our operations as well as various factual determinations concerning
matters and circumstances not entirely within our control. There are limited judicial or administrative interpretations of applicable
REIT provisions of the Code.
36
Table of Contents
If, in any taxable year, we fail to remain qualified for taxation as a REIT and are not entitled to relief under the Code:
•we will not be allowed a deduction for distributions to stockholders in computing our taxable income;
•we will be subject to U.S. federal and state income tax on our taxable income at regular corporate income tax rates; and
•we would not be eligible to elect REIT status again until the fifth taxable year that begins after the first year for which we
failed to qualify for taxation as a REIT.
Any such corporate tax liability could be substantial and would reduce the amount of cash available for other purposes. If we fail
to remain qualified for taxation as a REIT, we may need to borrow additional funds or liquidate some investments to pay any
additional tax liability. Accordingly, funds available for investment and distributions to stockholders could be reduced.
As a REIT, failure to make required distributions would subject us to federal corporate income tax.
We paid quarterly distributions in every quarter of 2021 and have declared a quarterly distribution to be paid on March 23, 2022.
The amount, timing and form of any future distributions will be determined, and will be subject to adjustment, by our Board of
Directors. To remain qualified for taxation as a REIT, we are generally required to distribute at least 90% of our REIT taxable income
(determined without regard to the dividends paid deduction and excluding net capital gain) each year, or in limited circumstances,
the following year, to our stockholders. Generally, we expect to distribute all or substantially all of our REIT taxable income. If our
cash available for distribution falls short of our estimates, we may be unable to maintain distributions that approximate our REIT
taxable income and may fail to remain qualified for taxation as a REIT. In addition, our cash flows from operations may be
insufficient to fund required distributions as a result of differences in timing between the actual receipt of income and the payment of
expenses and the recognition of income and expenses for federal income tax purposes, or the effect of nondeductible expenditures,
such as capital expenditures, payments of compensation for which Section 162(m) of the Code denies a deduction, interest
expense deductions limited by Section 163(j) of the Code, the creation of reserves or required debt service or amortization
payments.
To the extent that we satisfy the 90% distribution requirement but distribute less than 100% of our REIT taxable income, we will
be subject to federal corporate income tax on our undistributed taxable income. In addition, we will be subject to a 4%
nondeductible excise tax on our undistributed taxable income if the actual amount that we distribute to our stockholders for a
calendar year is less than the minimum amount specified under the Code.
We may be required to borrow funds, sell assets or raise equity to satisfy our REIT distribution requirements.
Due to the size and timing of future distributions, including any distributions made to satisfy REIT distribution requirements, we
may need to borrow funds, sell assets or raise equity, even if the then-prevailing market conditions are not favorable for these
borrowings, sales or offerings.
Any insufficiency of our cash flows to cover our REIT distribution requirements could adversely impact our ability to raise short-
and long-term debt, to sell assets, or to offer equity securities in order to fund distributions required to maintain our qualification and
taxation as a REIT. Furthermore, the REIT distribution requirements may increase the financing we need to fund capital
expenditures, future growth and expansion initiatives. This would increase our indebtedness. A significant increase in our
outstanding debt could lead to a downgrade of our credit rating. A downgrade of our credit rating could negatively impact our ability
to access credit markets. Further, certain of our current debt instruments limit the amount of indebtedness we and our subsidiaries
may incur. Significantly more financing, therefore, may be unavailable, more expensive or restricted by the terms of our outstanding
indebtedness. For a discussion of risks related to our substantial level of indebtedness, see other risks described elsewhere in this
Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Whether we issue equity, at what price and the amount and other terms of any such issuances will depend on many factors,
including alternative sources of capital, our then-existing leverage, our need for additional capital, market conditions and other
factors beyond our control. If we raise additional funds through the issuance of equity securities or debt convertible into equity
securities, the percentage of stock ownership by our existing stockholders may be reduced. In addition, new equity securities or
convertible debt securities could have rights, preferences and
37
Table of Contents
privileges senior to those of our current stockholders, which could substantially decrease the value of our securities owned by them.
Depending on the share price we are able to obtain, we may have to sell a significant number of shares in order to raise the capital
we deem necessary to execute our long-term strategy, and our stockholders may experience dilution in the value of their shares as
a result.
Complying with REIT requirements may limit our flexibility or cause us to forgo otherwise attractive opportunities.
To remain qualified for taxation as a REIT for U.S. federal income tax purposes, we must satisfy tests concerning, among other
things, the sources of our income, the nature and diversification of our assets and the amounts we distribute to our stockholders.
For example, under the Code, no more than 20% of the value of the assets of a REIT may be represented by securities of one or
more TRSs. Similar rules apply to other nonqualifying assets. These limitations may affect our ability to make large investments in
other non-REIT qualifying operations or assets. In addition, in order to maintain our qualification for taxation as a REIT, we must
distribute at least 90% of our REIT taxable income, determined without regard to the dividends paid deduction and excluding any
net capital gains. Even if we maintain our qualification for taxation as a REIT, we will be subject to U.S. federal income tax at regular
corporate income tax rates for our undistributed REIT taxable income, as well as U.S. federal income tax at regular corporate
income tax rates for income recognized by our TRSs; we also pay taxes in the foreign jurisdictions in which our international assets
and operations are held and conducted regardless of our qualification for taxation as a REIT. Because of these distribution
requirements, we will likely not be able to fund future capital needs and investments from operating cash flow. As such, compliance
with REIT tests may hinder our ability to make certain attractive investments, including the purchase of significant nonqualifying
assets and the material expansion of non-real estate activities.
Our ability to fully deduct our interest expense may be limited, or we may be required to adjust the tax depreciation of our
real property in order to maintain the full deductibility of our interest expense.
The Code generally limits interest deductions for businesses, whether in corporate or passthrough form, to the sum of the
taxpayer's business interest income for the tax year and 30% of the taxpayer's adjusted taxable income for that tax year. This
limitation does not apply to an "electing real property trade or business". Although REITs are permitted to make such an election, we
have not made such an election to date. If we so elect in the future, depreciable real property that we hold (including specified
improvements) would be required to be depreciated for U.S. federal income tax purposes under the alternative depreciation system
of the Code, which generally imposes a class life for depreciable real property as long as 40 years.
As a REIT, we are limited in our ability to fund distribution payments using cash generated through our TRSs.
Our ability to receive distributions from our TRSs is limited by the rules with which we must comply to maintain our qualification
for taxation as a REIT. In particular, at least 75% of our gross income for each taxable year as a REIT must be derived from real
estate. Consequently, no more than 25% of our gross income may consist of dividend income from our TRSs and other
nonqualifying types of income. Thus, our ability to receive distributions from our TRSs may be limited and may impact our ability to
fund distributions to our stockholders using cash flows from our TRSs. Specifically, if our TRSs become highly profitable, we might
become limited in our ability to receive net income from our TRSs in an amount required to fund distributions to our stockholders
commensurate with that profitability.
In addition, a significant amount of our income and cash flows from our TRSs is generated from our international operations. In
many cases, there are local withholding taxes and currency controls that may impact our ability or willingness to repatriate funds to
the United States to help satisfy REIT distribution requirements.
Our extensive use of TRSs, including for certain of our international operations, may cause us to fail to remain qualified
for taxation as a REIT.
Our operations include an extensive use of TRSs. The net income of our TRSs is not required to be distributed to us, and
income that is not distributed to us generally is not subject to the REIT income distribution requirement. However, there may be
limitations on our ability to accumulate earnings in our TRSs and the accumulation or reinvestment of significant earnings in our
TRSs could result in adverse tax treatment. In particular, if the
38
Table of Contents
accumulation of cash in our TRSs causes (1) the fair market value of our securities in our TRSs to exceed 20% of the fair market
value of our assets or (2) the fair market value of our securities in our TRSs and other nonqualifying assets to exceed 25% of the
fair market value of our assets, then we will fail to remain qualified for taxation as a REIT. Further, a substantial portion of our TRSs
are overseas, and a material change in foreign currency rates could also negatively impact our ability to remain qualified for taxation
as a REIT.
The Code imposes limitations on the ability of our TRSs to utilize specified income tax deductions, including limits on the use of
net operating losses and limits on the deductibility of interest expense.
Our cash distributions are not guaranteed and may fluctuate.
A REIT generally is required to distribute at least 90% of its REIT taxable income to its stockholders.
Our Board of Directors, in its sole discretion, will determine on a quarterly basis the amount of cash to be distributed to our
stockholders based on a number of factors including, but not limited to, our results of operations, cash flow and capital
requirements, economic conditions, tax considerations, borrowing capacity and other factors, including debt covenant restrictions
that may impose limitations on cash payments, future acquisitions and divestitures and any stock repurchase program.
Consequently, our distribution levels may fluctuate.
Even if we remain qualified for taxation as a REIT, some of our business activities are subject to corporate level income
tax and foreign taxes, which will continue to reduce our cash flows, and we will have potential deferred and contingent tax
liabilities.
Even if we remain qualified for taxation as a REIT, we may be subject to some federal, state, local and foreign taxes, including
taxes on any undistributed income, and state, local or foreign income, franchise, property and transfer taxes. In addition, we could
in certain circumstances be required to pay an excise or penalty tax, which could be significant in amount, in respect of dealer
property income or in order to utilize one or more relief provisions under the Code to maintain our qualification for taxation as a
REIT.
A portion of our business is conducted through wholly-owned TRSs because certain of our business activities could generate
nonqualifying REIT income as currently structured and operated. The income of our U.S. TRSs will continue to be subject to federal
and state corporate income taxes. In addition, our international assets and operations will continue to be subject to taxation in the
foreign jurisdictions where those assets are held or those operations are conducted. Any of these taxes would decrease our
earnings and our available cash.
We will also be subject to a U.S. federal corporate level income tax at the highest regular corporate income tax rate on gain
recognized from a sale of a REIT asset where our basis in the asset is determined by reference to the basis of the asset in the
hands of a C corporation (such as an asset that we or our QRSs hold following the liquidation or other conversion of a former TRS).
This tax is generally applicable to any disposition of such an asset during the five-year period after the date we first owned the asset
as a REIT asset, to the extent of the built-in-gain based on the fair market value of such asset on the date we first held the asset as
a REIT asset.
Complying with REIT requirements may limit our ability to hedge effectively and increase the cost of our hedging and may
cause us to incur tax liabilities.
The REIT provisions of the Code limit our ability to hedge assets, liabilities, revenues and expenses. Generally, income from
hedging transactions that we enter into to manage risk of interest rate changes or fluctuations with respect to borrowings made or to
be made by us to acquire or carry real estate assets and income from certain currency hedging transactions related to our non-U.S.
operations, as well as income from qualifying counteracting hedges, do not constitute "gross income" for purposes of the REIT
gross income tests. To the extent that we enter into other types of hedging transactions, the income from those transactions may be
treated as nonqualifying income for purposes of the REIT gross income tests. As a result of these rules, we have from time to time
limited our use of advantageous hedging techniques or have implemented those hedges through our TRSs, and our future hedging
strategies may continue to be so affected. This increases the cost of our hedging activities because our TRSs are subject to tax on
income or gains resulting from hedges entered into by them and may expose us to greater risks associated with changes in interest
rates or exchange rates than we would otherwise want to bear. In addition, hedging losses in any of our TRSs may not provide any
tax benefit, except for being carried forward for
39
Table of Contents
possible use against future income or gain in the TRSs. As a result, our financial performance, including our adjusted funds from
operations ("AFFO"), may also fluctuate.
Distributions payable by REITs generally do not qualify for preferential tax rates.
Dividends payable by U.S. corporations to noncorporate stockholders, such as individuals, trusts and estates, are generally
eligible for reduced U.S. federal income tax rates applicable to "qualified dividends." Distributions paid by REITs generally are not
treated as "qualified dividends" under the Code, and the reduced rates applicable to such dividends do not generally apply.
However, for tax years beginning before 2026, REIT dividends paid to noncorporate stockholders that meet specified holding period
requirements are generally taxed at an effective tax rate lower than applicable ordinary income tax rates due to the availability of a
deduction under the Code for specified forms of income from passthrough entities. More favorable rates will nevertheless continue
to apply to regular corporate "qualified" dividends, which may cause some investors to perceive that an investment in a REIT is less
attractive than an investment in a non-REIT entity that pays dividends, thereby reducing the demand and market price of our
common stock.
Our certificate of incorporation contains restrictions on the ownership and transfer of our stock, though they may not be
successful in preserving our qualification for taxation as a REIT.
In order for us to remain qualified for taxation as a REIT, no more than 50% of the value of outstanding shares of our stock may
be owned, beneficially or constructively, by five or fewer individuals at any time during the last half of each taxable year. In addition,
rents from "affiliated tenants" will not qualify as qualifying REIT income if we own 10% or more by vote or value of the customer,
whether directly or after application of attribution rules under the Code. Subject to certain exceptions, our certificate of incorporation
prohibits any stockholder from owning, beneficially or constructively, more than (i) 9.8% in value of the outstanding shares of all
classes or series of our capital stock or (ii) 9.8% in value or number, whichever is more restrictive, of the outstanding shares of any
class or series of our capital stock. We refer to these restrictions collectively as the "ownership limits" and we included them in our
certificate of incorporation to facilitate our compliance with REIT tax rules. The constructive ownership rules under the Code are
complex and may cause the outstanding stock owned by a group of related individuals or entities to be deemed to be constructively
owned by one individual or entity. As a result, the acquisition of less than 9.8% of our outstanding common stock (or the outstanding
shares of any class or series of our stock) by an individual or entity could cause that individual or entity or another individual or
entity to own constructively in excess of the relevant ownership limits. Any attempt to own or transfer shares of our common stock
or of any of our other capital stock in violation of these restrictions may result in the shares being automatically transferred to a
charitable trust or may be void. Even though our certificate of incorporation contains the ownership limits, there can be no
assurance that these provisions will be effective to prevent our qualification for taxation as a REIT from being jeopardized, including
under the affiliated tenant rule. Furthermore, there can be no assurance that we will be able to monitor and enforce the ownership
limits. If the restrictions in our certificate of incorporation are not effective and, as a result, we fail to satisfy the REIT tax rules
described above, then absent an applicable relief provision, we will fail to remain qualified for taxation as a REIT.
In addition, the ownership and transfer restrictions could delay, defer or prevent a transaction or a change in control that might
involve a premium price for our stock or otherwise be in the best interest of our stockholders. As a result, the overall effect of the
ownership and transfer restrictions may be to render more difficult or discourage any attempt to acquire us, even if such acquisition
may be favorable to the interests of our stockholders.
Legislative or other actions affecting REITs could have a negative effect on us or our stockholders.
At any time, U.S. federal or state income tax laws governing REITs, the administrative interpretations of those laws, or local
laws impacting our REIT structure for our international operations, may be amended. U.S. federal, state and local tax laws are
constantly under review by persons involved in the legislative process, the Internal Revenue Service, the U.S. Department of the
Treasury and state and local taxing authorities. Changes to the tax laws, regulations and administrative interpretations or local laws
governing our international operations, which may have retroactive application, could adversely affect us. In addition, some of these
changes could have a more significant impact on us as compared to other REITs due to the nature of our business and our
substantial use of TRSs, particularly non-U.S. TRSs.
40
Table of Contents
We could incur adverse tax consequences if we fail to integrate an acquisition target in compliance with the requirements
to qualify for taxation as a REIT.
We periodically explore and occasionally consummate merger and acquisition transactions. When we consummate these
transactions, we structure the acquisition to successfully manage the REIT income, asset, and distribution tests that we must
satisfy. We believe that we have and will in the future successfully integrate our acquisition targets in a manner that has and will
allow us to timely satisfy the REIT tests applicable to us, but if we failed or in the future fail to do so, then we could jeopardize or
lose our qualification for taxation as a REIT, particularly if we were not eligible to utilize relief provisions set forth in the Code.
General Risk Factors
Adverse global economic conditions, like the ones we are currently experiencing, could adversely impact our business
and financial condition.
Adverse global economic conditions like the ones we are currently experiencing because of global inflation, the increased cost
of power, and supply chain issues have created, and in the future may increase, risk to our financial outlook. We are experiencing
these issues in various aspects of our business. As discussed above, our efforts to mitigate the risks associated with these global
economic conditions may not be successful and our business and growth could be adversely affected.
The uncertain global economy could also result in material churn in our customer base, reductions in revenues from our
offerings, adverse effects to our DSO, longer sales cycles, slower adoption of new technologies and increased price competition,
which could adversely affect our liquidity. Customers and vendors filing for bankruptcy could also lead to costly and time-intensive
actions with adverse effects, including greater difficulty or delay in accounts receivable collection. The uncertain economic
environment could also have an impact on our foreign exchange forward contracts if our counterparties' credit deteriorates or if they
are otherwise unable to perform their obligations. Finally, volatility in the financial markets like we are currently experiencing could
affect our ability to access the capital markets at a time when we desire, or need, to do so which could have an impact on our
flexibility to pursue additional expansion opportunities and maintain our desired level of revenue growth in the future.
The market price of our stock may continue to be highly volatile, and the value of an investment in our common stock may
decline.
The market price of the shares of our common stock has recently been and may continue to be highly volatile. General
economic and market conditions, like the instability due to the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic, and market conditions for
telecommunications and REIT stocks in general, may affect the market price of our common stock.
Announcements by us or others, or speculations about our future plans, may also have a significant impact on the market price
of our common stock. These may relate to:
•news or regulations regarding the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic;
•our results of operations or forecasts;
•new issuances of equity, debt or convertible debt by us, including issuances through our 2020 ATM Program;
•increases in market interest rates and changes in other general market and economic conditions, including inflationary
concerns;
•changes to our capital allocation, tax planning or business strategy;
•our qualification for taxation as a REIT and our declaration of distributions to our stockholders;
•changes in U.S. or foreign tax laws;
•changes in management or key personnel;
•developments in our relationships with customers;
•announcements by our customers or competitors;
•changes in regulatory policy or interpretation;
•governmental investigations;
41
Table of Contents
•changes in the ratings of our debt or stock by rating agencies or securities analysts;
•our purchase or development of real estate and/or additional IBX data centers;
•our acquisitions of complementary businesses; or
•the operational performance of our IBX data centers.
The stock market has from time to time experienced extreme price and volume fluctuations, which have particularly affected the
market prices for telecommunications companies, and which have often been unrelated to their operating performance. These
broad market fluctuations may adversely affect the market price of our common stock. One of the factors that investors may
consider in deciding whether to buy or sell our common stock is our distribution rate as a percentage of our stock price relative to
market interest rates. If market interest rates increase, prospective investors may demand a higher distribution rate or seek
alternative investments paying higher dividends or interest. As a result, interest rate fluctuations and conditions in the capital
markets may affect the market value of our common stock. Furthermore, companies that have experienced volatility in the market
price of their stock have been subject to securities class action litigation. We may be the target of this type of litigation in the future.
Securities litigation against us could result in substantial costs and/or damages, and divert management's attention from other
business concerns, which could seriously harm our business.
Inadequate or inaccurate external and internal information, including budget and planning data, could lead to inaccurate
financial forecasts and inappropriate financial decisions.
Our financial forecasts are dependent on estimates and assumptions regarding budget and planning data, market growth,
foreign exchange rates, our ability to remain qualified for taxation as a REIT, and our ability to generate sufficient cash flow to
reinvest in the business, fund internal growth, make acquisitions, pay dividends and meet our debt obligations. Our financial
projections are based on historical experience and on various other assumptions that our management believes to be reasonable
under the circumstances and at the time they are made.
The ongoing COVID-19 pandemic is expected to have a material effect on many aspects of the economy, but the extent of its
impact on Equinix is difficult to predict at this time. We continue to evolve our forecasting models as the situation unfolds but if our
predictions are inaccurate and our results differ materially from our forecasts, we could make inappropriate financial decisions.
Additionally, inaccuracies in our models could adversely impact our compliance with REIT asset tests, future profitability, stock price
and/or stockholder confidence.
If our internal controls are found to be ineffective, our financial results or our stock price may be adversely affected.
Our most recent evaluation of our controls resulted in our conclusion that, as of December 31, 2020, in compliance with Section
404 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, our internal controls over financial reporting were effective. Our ability to manage our
operations and growth through, for example, the integration of recently acquired businesses, the adoption of new accounting
principles and tax laws, and our overhaul of our back office systems that, for example, support the customer experience from initial
quote to customer billing and our revenue recognition process, will require us to further develop our controls and reporting systems
and implement or amend new or existing controls and reporting systems in those areas where the implementation and integration is
still ongoing. All of these changes to our financial systems and the implementation and integration of acquisitions create an
increased risk of deficiencies in our internal controls over financial reporting. If, in the future, our internal control over financial
reporting is found to be ineffective, or if a material weakness is identified in our controls over financial reporting, our financial results
may be adversely affected. Investors may also lose confidence in the reliability of our financial statements which could adversely
affect our stock price.
We may be subject to securities class action and other litigation, which may harm our business and results of operations.
We may be subject to securities class action or other litigation. For example, securities class action litigation has often been
brought against a company following periods of volatility in the market price of its securities. Litigation can be lengthy, expensive,
and divert management's attention and resources. Results cannot be predicted with certainty and an adverse outcome in litigation
could result in monetary damages or injunctive relief. Further, any payments made in settlement may directly reduce our revenue
under U.S. GAAP and could negatively impact our
42
Table of Contents
results of operations for the period. For all of these reasons, litigation could seriously harm our business, results of operations,
financial condition or cash flows.
We may not be able to protect our intellectual property rights.
We cannot make assurances that the steps taken by us to protect our intellectual property rights will be adequate to deter
misappropriation of proprietary information or that we will be able to detect unauthorized use and take appropriate steps to enforce
our intellectual property rights. We also are subject to the risk of litigation alleging infringement of third-party intellectual property
rights. Any such claims could require us to spend significant sums in litigation, pay damages, develop non-infringing intellectual
property or acquire licenses to the intellectual property that is the subject of the alleged infringement.
We have various mechanisms in place that may discourage takeover attempts.
Certain provisions of our certificate of incorporation and bylaws may discourage, delay or prevent a third party from acquiring
control of us in a merger, acquisition or similar transaction that a stockholder may consider favorable. Such provisions include:
•ownership limitations and transfer restrictions relating to our stock that are intended to facilitate our compliance with certain
REIT rules relating to share ownership;
•authorization for the issuance of "blank check" preferred stock;
•the prohibition of cumulative voting in the election of directors;
•limits on the persons who may call special meetings of stockholders;
•limits on stockholder action by written consent; and
•advance notice requirements for nominations to the Board of Directors or for proposing matters that can be acted on by
stockholders at stockholder meetings.
In addition, Section 203 of the Delaware General Corporation Law, which restricts certain business combinations with interested
stockholders in certain situations, may also discourage, delay or prevent someone from acquiring or merging with us.
ITEM 1B.    Unresolved Staff Comments
There is no disclosure to report pursuant to Item 1B.
43
Table of Contents
ITEM 2.    Properties
Our executive offices are located in Redwood City, California, with sales offices in several cities throughout the U.S. Our Asia-
Pacific headquarters office is located in Hong Kong and we also have sales offices in several cities throughout Asia-Pacific. Our
EMEA headquarters office is located in Amsterdam, the Netherlands and we also have sales offices in several cities throughout
EMEA.
The following tables present the locations of our leased and owned IBX data centers and xScale data centers investments as
of December 31, 2021.
AMERICAS
Metro Leased Owned
Atlanta ● ●
Bogota ●
Boston ●
Calgary ● ●
Chicago ● ●
Culpeper ●
Dallas ● ●
Washington D.C./Ashburn ● ●
Denver ● ●
Houston ●
Kamloops ●
Los Angeles ● ●
Mexico City ●
Miami ● ●
Monterrey ●
Montreal ●
New York ● ●
Ottawa ●
Philadelphia ●
Rio de Janeiro ● ●
Saint John ●
Sao Paulo ● ●
Seattle ● ●
Silicon V alley ● ●
Toronto ● ●
Vancouver ●
Winnipeg ●TM
(1)  (1) (2)
44
Table of Contents
EMEA
Metro Leased Owned  
Abu Dhabi ●
Amsterdam ● ●
Barcelona ●
Bordeaux ●
Dubai ●
Dublin ● ●
Dusseldorf ●
East Netherlands ●
Frankfurt ● ●
Geneva ●
Genoa ●
Hamburg ●
Helsinki ● ●
Istanbul ●
Lisbon ●
London ● ●
Madrid ●
Manchester ●
Milan ● ●
Munich ● ●
Muscat ●
Paris ● ●
Seville ●
Sofia ●
Stockholm ● ●
Warsaw ● ●
Zurich ● ●(1)  (1)(2)
(3)
(3)
45
Table of Contents
Asia-Pacific
Metro Leased Owned
Adelaide ●
Brisbane ●
Canberra ●
Hong Kong ●
Melbourne ●
Mumbai ●
Osaka ● ●
Perth ●
Seoul ●
Singapore ● ●
Shanghai ● ●
Sydney ● ●
Tokyo ● ●
"●" denotes locations with one or more data centers.
Owned sites include IBX data centers subject to long-term ground leases.
The Genoa (GN1) and Munich (MU4) owned sites represent data centers opened in January 2022
The following table presents an overview of our portfolio of IBX data centers as of December 31, 2021:
# of IBXs Total Cabinet
Capacity Cabinets BilledCabinet Utilization % MRR per Cabinet
Americas 103 136,000 103,200 76 %$ 2,342 
EMEA 78 128,800 107,400 83 % 1,586 
Asia-Pacific 50 74,700 59,300 79 % 1,970 
Total 231 339,500 269,900 
Excludes nine unconsolidated entities (eight xScale  data centers and the MC1 IBX data center) and includes the MU4 and GN1 data
centers opened in January 2022
Cabinets represent a specific amount of space within an IBX data center . Customers can combine and use multiple adjacent cabinets within
an IBX data center , depending on their space requirements.
The cabinet utilization rate represents the percentage of cabinet space billed versus total cabine t capacity , taking into consideration power
limitations.
MRR per cabinet repres ents average monthly recurring revenue recognized divided by the average number of cabinets billing during the
fourth quarte r of the year. Americas MRR per cabinet excludes Brazil, Colombia and Infomart non-IBX tenant income and Asia-Pacific MRR
per Cabinet excludes Bit-isle MIS.(1)  (1) (2)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(1)  (1)(2) (1) (1)(3) (1)(4)
(1) TM
(2)
(3)
(4)
46
Table of Contents
The following table presents a summary of our significant IBX data center expansion projects under construction as of
December 31, 2021:
Property Property Location Target Open Date Sellable CabinetsTotal Capex
(in Millions) 
Americas:
MX2 phase II Mexico City Q1 2022 1,075 $ 54 
TR2 phase IV Toronto Q3 2022 300 24 
BG2 phase I Bogota Q4 2022 550 45 
CL3 phase II Calgary Q4 2022 550 38 
DC21 phase II Washington D.C. Q4 2022 950 32 
KA1 phase II Kamloops Q4 2022 250 22 
LA4 phase IV Los Angeles Q4 2022 350 22 
4,025 237 
EMEA:
MC1 phase II Muscat Q1 2022 475 19 
IL2 phase III Istanbul Q2 2022 525 15 
LD7 phase II London Q2 2022 2,275 111 
MD2 phase IV Madrid Q2 2022 375 16 
MA5 phase I Manchester Q2 2022 1,025 78 
PA10 phase I Paris Q2 2022 1,525 163 
ZH5 phase IV Zurich Q2 2022 250 42 
GV2 phase III Geneva Q3 2022 300 22 
LD8 phase IV London Q3 2022 550 36 
ML5 phase II Milan Q3 2022 500 20 
MD6 phase I Madrid Q3 2022 600 5 
FR5 phase V Frankfurt Q4 2022 650 43 
BX1 phase II & III Bordeaux Q1 2023 525 44 
PA6 phase II Paris Q1 2023 275 16 
DX3 phase I Dubai Q2 2023 900 61 
SM1 phase I Salalah Q2 2023 125 7 
SO2 phase II Sofia Q2 2023 350 12 
BX1 phase IV Bordeaux Q3 2023 275 21 
FR13 phase I Frankfurt Q4 2023 1,125 104 
12,625 835 
Asia-Pacific:
SG5 phase II Singapore Q1 2022 775 75 
SG5 phase III Singapore Q1 2022 700 19 
TY11 phase III Tokyo Q2 2022 900 31 
ME2 phase II Melbourne Q3 2022 500 16 
SG5 phase IV Singapore Q3 2022 600 26 
OS3 phase II Osaka Q4 2022 400 19 
3,875 186 
Total 20,525  $ 1,258  
Capital expenditures are approximate and may change based on final construction details.(1)
(1)
47
ITEM 3.    Legal Proceedings
None.
ITEM 4.    Mine Safety Disclosure
Not applicable.
48
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 5.    Market  for Registrant's Common Equity , Related Stockho lder Matters and Issuer Purchases
of Equity Securities
Our common stock is quoted on the NASDAQ Global Select Market under the symbol of "EQIX." Our common stock began
trading in August 2000. As of January 31, 2022, we had 90,643,998 shares of our common stock outstanding held by approximately
347 registered holders. During the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020, we did not issue or sell any securities on an
unregistered basis.
Stock Performance Graph
The graph set forth below compares the cumulative total stockholder return on Equinix's common stock between December 31,
2016 and December 31, 2021 with the cumulative total return of:
•the S&P 500 Index;
•the NASDAQ Composite Index; and
•the FTSE NAREIT All REITs Index.
The graph assumes the investment of $100.00 on December 31, 2016 in Equinix's common stock and in each index, and
assumes the reinvestment of dividends, if any.
Equinix cautions that the stock price performance shown in the graph below is not indicative of, nor intended to forecast, the
potential future performance of Equinix's common stock.
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary set forth in any of Equinix's previous or future filings under the Securities Act of 1933,
as amended, or the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, that might incorporate this Annual Report on Form 10-K or
future filings made by Equinix under those statutes, the stock performance graph shall not be deemed filed with the Securities and
Exchange Commission and shall not be deemed incorporated by reference into any of those prior filings or into any future filings
made by Equinix under those statutes.
49
Table of Contents
COMPARISON OF 5 YEAR CUMULATIVE TOTAL RETURN*
*$100 invested on 12/31/16 in stock or index, including reinvestment of dividends.
Fiscal year ending December 31.
ITEM 6.    [Reserved]
50
Table of Contents
ITEM 7.    Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
The following commentary should be read in conjunction with the financial statements and related notes contained elsewhere in
this Annual Report on Form 10-K. The information in this discussion contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of
Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
Such statements are based upon current expectations that involve risks and uncertainties. Any statements contained herein that are
not statements of historical fact may be deemed to be forward-looking statements. For example, the words "believes," "anticipates,"
"plans," "expects," "intends" and similar expressions are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Our actual results and the
timing of certain events may differ significantly from the results discussed in the forward-looking statements. Factors that might
cause such a discrepancy include, but are not limited to, those discussed in "Liquidity and Capital Resources" and "Risk Factors"
elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10-K. All forward-looking statements in this document are based on information available
to us as of the date hereof and we assume no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements.
Item 7 of this Form 10-K focuses on discussion of 2021 and 2020 items as well as 2021 results as compared to 2020 results.
For the discussion of 2019 items and 2020 results as compared to 2019 results, please refer to Item 7 of our 2020 Form 10-K as
filed with the SEC on February 19, 2021.
Our management's discussion and analysis of financial condition and results of operations is intended to assist readers in
understanding our financial information from our management's perspective and is presented as follows:
•Overview
•Results of Operations
•Non-GAAP Financial Measures
•Liquidity and Capital Resources
•Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates
•Recent Accounting Pronouncements
Overview
We provide a global, vendor-neutral data center, interconnection and edge services platform with offerings that aim to enable
our customers to reach everywhere, interconnect everyone and integrate everything. Global enterprises, service providers and
business ecosystems of industry partners rely on our IBX data centers and expertise around the world for the safe housing of their
critical IT equipment and to protect and connect the world's most valued information assets. They also look to Platform Equinix for
the ability to directly and securely®
51
Table of Contents
interconnect to the networks, clouds and content that enable today's information-driven global digital economy. Our recent IBX data
center openings and acquisitions, as well as xScale data center investments, have expanded our total global footprint to 240 data
centers, including eight xScale data centers and the MC1 data center that were held in unconsolidated joint ventures, across 66
markets around the world. Metrics also include the MU4 and GN1 data centers which opened in January 2022. Equinix offers the
following solutions:
•premium data center colocation;
•interconnection and data exchange solutions;
•edge services for deploying networking, security and hardware; and
•remote expert support and professional services.
Our interconnected data centers around the world allow our customers to increase information and application delivery
performance to users, and quickly access distributed IT infrastructures and business and digital ecosystems, while significantly
reducing costs. Our global platform and the quality of our IBX data centers, interconnection offerings and edge services have
enabled us to establish a critical mass of customers. As more customers choose Platform Equinix for bandwidth cost and
performance reasons, it benefits their suppliers and business partners to colocate in the same data centers. This adjacency creates
a “network effect” that enables our customers to capture the full economic and performance benefits of our offerings. These
partners, in turn, pull in their business partners, creating a "marketplace" for their services. Our global platform enables scalable,
reliable and cost-effective interconnection that increases data traffic exchange while lowering overall cost and increasing flexibility.
Our focused business model is built on our critical mass of enterprise and service provider customers and the resulting
"marketplace" effect. This global platform, combined with our strong financial position, has driven new customer growth and
bookings.
Historically, our market was served by large telecommunications carriers who bundled their products and services with their
colocation offerings. The data center market landscape has evolved to include private and vendor-neutral multi-tenant data center
("MTDC") providers, hyperscale cloud providers, managed infrastructure and application hosting providers, and systems integrators.
It is estimated that Equinix is one of more than 2,200 companies that provide MTDC offerings around the world. Each of these data
center solutions providers can bundle various colocation, interconnection and network offerings and outsourced IT infrastructure
solutions. We are able to offer our customers a global platform that reaches 27 countries with the industry’s largest and most active
ecosystem of partners in our sites, proven operational reliability, improved application performance and a highly scalable set of
offerings.
The cabinet utilization rate represents the percentage of cabinet space billed versus total cabinet capacity, which is used to
measure how efficiently we are managing our cabinet capacity. Our cabinet utilization rate varies from market to market among our
IBX data centers across our Americas, EMEA and Asia-Pacific regions. Our cabinet utilization rates were approximately 79%, as
of December 31, 2021 and 2020. Excluding the impact of our IBX data center expansion projects that have opened during the last
12 months, our cabinet utilization rate would have increased to approximately 81% as of December 31, 2021. We continue to
monitor the available capacity in each of our selected markets. To the extent we have limited capacity available in a given market, it
may limit our ability for growth in that market. We perform demand studies on an ongoing basis to determine if future expansion is
warranted in a market. In addition, power and cooling requirements for most customers are growing on a per unit basis. As a result,
customers are consuming an increasing amount of power per cabinet. Although we generally do not control the amount of power
our customers draw from installed circuits, we have negotiated power consumption limitations with certain high power-demand
customers. This increased power consumption has driven us to build out our new IBX data centers to support power and cooling
needs twice that of previous IBX data centers. We could face power limitations in our IBX data centers, even though we may have
additional physical cabinet capacity available within a specific IBX data center. This could have a negative impact on the available
utilization capacity of a given IBX data center, which could have a negative impact on our ability to grow revenues, affecting our
financial performance, results of operations and cash flows.
To serve the needs of the growing hyperscale data center market, including the world's largest cloud service providers, we have
entered into joint ventures to develop and operate xScale data centers. In the past two years, we entered into our EMEA 1 Joint
Venture, Asia-Pacific 1 Joint Venture and EMEA 2 Joint Venture, and entered into negotiations in connection with a new joint
venture (the "AMER 1 Joint Venture"), in the form of limited liability partnerships with GIC, Singapore's sovereign wealth fund
("GIC"). In October 2021, we entered into an agreement to form an additional joint venture in the form of a limited liability
partnership with PGIM Real Estate, to further expand our xScale data center portfolio in Asia-Pacific (the "Asia-Pacific 2 Joint
Venture"). See Note 5 within the Consolidated Financial Statements.TM
52
Table of Contents
Strategically, we will continue to look at attractive opportunities to grow our market share and selectively improve our footprint
and offerings. As was the case with our recent expansions and acquisitions, our expansion criteria will be dependent on a number
of factors, including but not limited to demand from new and existing customers, quality of the design, power capacity, access to
networks, clouds and software partners, capacity availability in the current market location, amount of incremental investment
required by us in the targeted property, automation capabilities, developer talent pool, lead-time to break even on a free cash flow
basis and in-place customers. Like our recent expansions and acquisitions, the right combination of these factors may be attractive
to us. Depending on the circumstances, these transactions may require additional capital expenditures funded by upfront cash
payments or through long-term financing arrangements in order to bring these properties up to our standards. Property expansion
may be in the form of purchases of real property, long-term leasing arrangements or acquisitions. Future purchases, construction or
acquisitions may be completed by us or with partners or potential customers to minimize the outlay of cash, which can be
significant.
Revenue:
Our business is based on a recurring revenue model comprised of colocation and related interconnection and managed
infrastructure offerings. We consider these offerings recurring because our customers are generally billed on a fixed and recurring
basis each month for the duration of their contract, which is generally one to three years in length. Our recurring revenues have
comprised more than 90% of our total revenues during the past three years. In addition, during the past three years, more than 80%
of our monthly recurring revenue bookings came from existing customers, contributing to our revenue growth. Our largest customer
accounted for approximately 3% of our recurring revenues for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019. Our 50 largest
customers accounted for approximately 39% of our recurring revenues for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019.
Our non-recurring revenues are primarily comprised of installation services related to a customer's initial deployment and
professional services we perform, as well as equipment sales. These services are considered to be non-recurring because they are
billed typically once, upon completion of the installation or the professional services work performed. The majority of these non-
recurring revenues are typically billed on the first invoice distributed to the customer in connection with their initial installation.
However, revenues from installation services are deferred and recognized ratably over the period of the contract term. Additionally,
revenue from contract settlements, when a customer wishes to terminate their contract early, is generally treated as a contract
modification and recognized ratably over the remaining term of the contract, if any. As a percentage of total revenues, we expect
non-recurring revenues to represent less than 10% of total revenues for the foreseeable future.
Operating Expenses:
Cost of Revenues. The largest components of our cost of revenues are depreciation, rental payments related to our leased IBX
data centers, utility costs, including electricity, bandwidth access, IBX data center employees' salaries and benefits, including stock-
based compensation, repairs and maintenance, supplies and equipment and security. A majority of our cost of revenues is fixed in
nature and should not vary significantly from period to period, unless we expand our existing IBX data centers or open or acquire
new IBX data centers. However, there are certain costs that are considered more variable in nature, including utilities and supplies
that are directly related to growth in our existing and new customer base. We expect the cost of our utilities, specifically electricity,
will generally increase in the future on a per-unit or fixed basis, in addition to the variable increase related to the growth
53
Table of Contents
in consumption by our customers. In addition, the cost of electricity is generally higher in the summer months, as compared to other
times of the year. Our costs of electricity may also increase as a result of the physical effects of climate change, increased
regulations driving alternative electricity generation due to environmental considerations or as a result of our election to use
renewable energy sources. To the extent we incur increased utility costs, such increased costs could materially impact our financial
condition, results of operations and cash flows.
Sales and Marketing. Our sales and marketing expenses consist primarily of compensation and related costs for sales and
marketing personnel, including stock-based compensation, amortization of contract costs, marketing programs, public relations,
promotional materials and travel, as well as bad debt expense and amortization of customer relationship intangible assets.
General and Administrative. Our general and administrative expenses consist primarily of salaries and related expenses,
including stock-based compensation; accounting, legal and other professional service fees; and other general corporate expenses,
such as our corporate regional headquarters office leases and some depreciation expense on back office systems.
Taxation as a REIT
We elected to be taxed as a REIT for U.S. federal income tax purposes beginning with our 2015 taxable year. As of
December 31, 2021, our REIT structure included all of our data center operations in the U.S., Canada (with the exception of one
data center in Montreal), Mexico, Japan, Singapore and the majority of our data centers in EMEA. Our data center operations in
other jurisdictions are operated as TRSs. We included our share of the assets in the EMEA and Asia-Pacific Joint Ventures in our
REIT structure.
As a REIT, we generally are permitted to deduct from our U.S. federal taxable income the dividends we pay to our stockholders.
The income represented by such dividends is not subject to U.S. federal income taxes at the entity level but is taxed, if at all, at the
stockholder level. Nevertheless, the income of our TRSs which hold our U.S. operations that may not be REIT compliant is subject
to U.S. federal and state corporate income taxes, as applicable. Likewise, our foreign subsidiaries continue to be subject to local
income taxes in jurisdictions in which they hold assets or conduct operations, regardless of whether held or conducted through
TRSs or through QRSs. We are also subject to a separate U.S. federal corporate income tax on any gain recognized from a sale of
a REIT asset where our basis in the asset is determined by reference to the basis of the asset in the hands of a C corporation (such
as an asset held by us or a QRS following the liquidation or other conversion of a former TRS). This built-in-gains tax is generally
applicable to any disposition of such an asset during the five-year period after the date we first owned the asset as a REIT asset to
the extent of the built-in-gain based on the fair market value of such asset on the date we first held the asset as a REIT asset. In
addition, should we have net income from "prohibited transactions," we will be subject to tax on this income at a 100% rate.
"Prohibited transactions," for this purpose, are defined as dispositions, at a gain, of inventory or property held primarily for sale to
customers in the ordinary course of a trade or business other than dispositions of foreclosure property and other than dispositions
excepted by statutory safe harbors. If we fail to remain qualified for U.S. federal income taxation as a REIT, we will be subject to
U.S. federal income taxes at regular corporate income tax rates. Even if we remain qualified for U.S. federal income taxation as a
REIT, we may be subject to some federal, state, local and foreign taxes on our income and property in addition to taxes owed with
respect to our TRSs' operations. In particular, while state income tax regimes often parallel the U.S. federal income tax regime for
REITs, many states do not completely follow federal rules, and some may not follow them at all.
We continue to monitor our REIT compliance in order to maintain our qualification for U.S. federal income taxation as a REIT.
For this and other reasons, as necessary, we may convert some of our data center operations in other countries into the REIT
structure in future periods.
On each of March 17, June 16, September 22, and December 15, 2021 we paid quarterly cash dividends of $2.87 per share.
We expect the amount of our applicable dividends and other applicable distributions to equal or exceed the REIT taxable income
that we recognized in 2021.
The Impact of the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic on Our Results and Operations
We have continued to closely monitor the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic on our people and business. All of our IBX data
centers have remained, and continue to remain, operational at the time of filing of this Annual Report on Form 10-K. We have begun
a phased plan for return-to-office for most of our non-IBX attached sites on a voluntary basis in accordance with guidance provided
by government agencies. Non-essential business travel
54
Table of Contents
remains limited, and while we continue to hold virtual events, we have also resumed certain in-person events as local travel
restrictions allow.
While we are experiencing some construction delays, including those due to supply chain impacts from the COVID-19
pandemic, to date, the construction delays and additional costs are insignificant relative to the overall project duration and budget.
We have not observed any significant disruption to our IBX data center operations. 
During the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020, the COVID-19 pandemic did not have a material impact on our results of
operations. We incurred one-time cash bonuses and compensation expense of $8.6 million for our IBX employees as well as other
employees to support their work-from-home requirements during the first quarter of 2020. We have also experienced some travel
expense savings during the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020 resulting from travel restrictions imposed in response to the
COVID-19 pandemic.
Looking ahead, the full impact of the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic on our future financial condition or results of operations
remains uncertain and will depend on a number of factors, including the duration and potential cyclicity of the health crisis and
further public policy actions to be taken in response, as well as the continued impact of the pandemic on the global economy and
our customers and vendors. Our past results may not be indicative of our future performance and historical trends may differ
materially.
For additional details regarding the risks to our business from the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic, refer to Part I, Item 1A. Risk
Factors included elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
2021 Highlights:
•In March, we issued €1.1 billion in Senior Notes due 2027 and 2033, or approximately $1.3 billion in U.S. dollars, at the
exchange rate in effect on March 10, 2021. Using a portion of the proceeds, we redeemed all of the remaining outstanding
2.875% Euro Senior Notes due 2026 for approximately $590.7 million in U.S. dollars, at the exchange rate in effect on
March 24, 2021. See Note 11 within the Consolidated Financial Statements.
•In May, we issued $2.6 billion in Senior Notes due 2026, 2028, 2031 and 2052. Using a portion of the proceeds, we repaid
approximately $659.9 million of term loans and redeemed all of our outstanding $1.25 billion 5.375% Senior Notes due
2027. See Note 11 within the Consolidated Financial Statements.
•In May, we sold 137,604 shares under our 2020 "at-the-market" stock offering program (the "2020 ATM Program") for
approximately $99.6 million in proceeds, net of payment of commissions to sales agents and other offering expenses. See
Note 12 within the Consolidated Financial Statements.
•In June, we entered into an agreement to form another joint venture in the form of a limited liability partnership with GIC, to
develop and operate additional xScale data centers in Europe and the Americas (the “EMEA 2 Joint Venture”). The
transaction is structured to close in phases over the course of two years, pending regulatory approval and other closing
conditions. Upon closing of the first phase of the transaction in September 2021, GIC contributed cash in exchange for an
80% partnership interest in the EMEA 2 Joint Venture and we sold certain data center sites and facilities located in
Frankfurt, Helsinki, Madrid, Milan and Paris to the EMEA 2 Joint Venture in exchange for a total consideration of
$144.0 million, including a 20% partnership interest in the JV. See Note 5 within the Consolidated Financial Statements.
•In September, we completed the acquisition of two data centers in Mumbai, India from GPX Global Systems, Inc. ("GPX
India") for a total purchase consideration of approximately $170.5 million. See Note 3 within the Consolidated Financial
Statements.
•In October, we entered into an agreement to form a joint venture in the form of a limited liability partnership with PGIM Real
Estate ("PGIM"), to develop and operate xScale data centers in Asia-Pacific (the "Asia-Pacific 2 Joint Venture"). Upon
closing, PGIM will contribute cash in exchange for an 80% partnership interest in the Asia-Pacific 2 Joint Venture. We
agreed to sell the Sydney 9 ("SY9") data center site in exchange for a 20% partnership interest in the Asia-Pacific 2 Joint
Venture and cash proceeds. The assets and liabilities of the SY9 data center, which are currently included within our Asia-
Pacific region, were classified as held for sale as of September 30, 2021 and remained held for sale as of December 31,
2021. See Note 5 within the Consolidated Financial Statements.TM
55
Table of Contents
•In November and December, we sold a total of 500,013 shares under our 2020 ATM Program for approximately
$398.4 million in proceeds, net of payment of commissions to sales agents and other offering expenses. See Note 12 within
the Consolidated Financial Statements.
•In December, we entered into an agreement to purchase MainOne Cable Company Ltd. ("MainOne") at an enterprise value
of approximately $320 million in an all-cash transaction. The acquisition is expected to close in the second quarter of 2022,
subject to customary conditions including regulatory approval. See Note 3 within the Consolidated Financial Statements.
Results of Operations
Our results of operations for the year ended December 31, 2021 include the results of operations from two data centers
acquired from GPX India from September 1, 2021. Our results of operations for the year ended December 31, 2020 include the
results of operations from the acquisitions of 12 data center sites across Canada from Bell from October 1, 2020 and one additional
data center acquired from Bell from November 2, 2020, Packet from March 2, 2020 and three data centers in Mexico from Axtel
from January 8, 2020. See Note 3 within the Consolidated Financial Statements for further details.
In order to provide a framework for assessing our performance excluding the impact of foreign currency fluctuations, we
supplement the year-over-year actual change in results of operations with comparative changes on a constant currency basis.
Presenting constant currency results of operations is a non-GAAP financial measure. See “Non-GAAP Financial Measures” below
for further discussion.
Years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020
Revenues. Our revenues for the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020 were generated from the following revenue
classifications and geographic regions (dollars in thousands):
Years Ended December 31, $ Change % Change
2021 % 2020 % Actual ActualConstant
Currency
Americas:
Recurring revenues $2,861,937 43% $2,582,800 43% $ 279,137 11% 11%
Non-recurring revenues 159,814 3% 124,958 2% 34,856 28% 28%
3,021,751 46% 2,707,758 45% 313,993 12% 12%
EMEA:
Recurring revenues 2,001,931 30% 1,864,720 31% 137,211 7% 7%
Non-recurring revenues 153,285 2% 131,669 2% 21,616 16% 12%
2,155,216 32% 1,996,389 33% 158,827 8% 7%
Asia-Pacific:
Recurring revenues 1,356,617 21% 1,210,510 20% 146,107 12% 10%
Non-recurring revenues 101,953 1% 83,888 2% 18,065 22% 21%
1,458,570 22% 1,294,398 22% 164,172 13% 11%
Total:
Recurring revenues 6,220,485 94% 5,658,030 94% 562,455 10% 9%
Non-recurring revenues 415,052 6% 340,515 6% 74,537 22% 20%
$6,635,537 100% $5,998,545 100% $ 636,992 11% 10%
56
Table of Contents
Revenues
(dollars in thousands)
Americas Revenues. During the year ended December 31, 2021, Americas revenue increased by $314.0 million or 12% (and
also 12% on a constant currency basis). Growth in Americas revenues was primarily due to:
•approximately $112.7 million of incremental revenues from the Packet and Bell acquisitions;
•$67.7 million of incremental revenues generated from our IBX data center expansions;
•higher non-recurring revenues, primarily due to increases in EIS product sales; and
•an increase in orders from both our existing customers and new customers during the period.
EMEA Revenues. During the year ended December 31, 2021, EMEA revenue increased by $158.8 million or 8% (7% on a
constant currency basis). Growth in EMEA revenues was primarily due to:
•approximately $32.0 million of incremental revenues generated from our IBX data center expansions;
•$28.2 million of incremental revenues from services provided to our joint ventures; and
•an increase in orders from both our existing customers and new customers during the period.
The increase was partially offset by a net increase of $75.0 million of realized cash flow hedge losses from foreign currency forward
contracts.
Asia-Pacific Revenues. During the year ended December 31, 2021, Asia-Pacific revenue increased by $164.2 million or 13%
(11% on a constant currency basis). Growth in Asia-Pacific revenue was primarily due to:
•approximately $86.4 million of incremental revenues generated from our IBX data center expansions;
•$20.6 million of incremental revenues from services provided to our joint ventures;
•$6.9 million of incremental revenues from the GPX India Acquisition; and
•an increase in orders from both our existing customers and new customers during the period.
57
Table of Contents
Cost of Revenues. Our cost of revenues for the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020 were split among the following
geographic regions (dollars in thousands):
Years Ended December 31, $ Change % Change
2021 % 2020 % Actual ActualConstant
Currency
Americas $1,458,699 42% $1,248,141 41% $210,558 17% 16%
EMEA 1,216,990 35% 1,094,335 36% 122,655 11% 9%
Asia-Pacific 796,733 23% 731,864 23% 64,869 9% 7%
Total $3,472,422 100% $3,074,340 100% $398,082 13% 12%
Cost of Revenues
(dollars in thousands; percentages indicate expenses as a percentage of revenues)
Americas Cost of Revenues. During the year ended December 31, 2021, Americas cost of revenues increased by
$210.6 million or 17% (16% on a constant currency basis). The increase in our Americas cost of revenues was primarily due to:
•approximately $115.2 million of incremental cost of revenues from the Packet and Bell acquisitions;
•$33.5 million of higher depreciation driven by IBX data center expansions;
•$17.8 million of higher costs related to increased EIS product revenues;
•$11.2 million of higher other cost of sales related to an increase in bandwidth for new vendors and an increase in
equipment;
•$11.1 million of higher repairs and maintenance expense driven by IBX data center expansions;
•$10.0 million of higher compensation costs, including salaries, bonuses and stock-based compensation, primarily due to
headcount growth;
•$8.8 million of higher tax, license, and insurance costs driven by IBX data center expansions; and
•$5.3 million of higher consulting services driven by increases in security and IBX data center expansions.
EMEA Cost of Revenues. During the year ended December 31, 2021, EMEA cost of revenues increased by $122.7 million or
11% (9% on a constant currency basis). The increase in our EMEA cost of revenues was primarily due to:
•$58.7 million of higher depreciation expenses driven by IBX data center expansions in the Netherlands, Germany,
Switzerland and the UK;
•$34.1 million of higher utilities costs driven by increased utility usage to support IBX data center expansions and utility price
increases, primarily in Germany, the UK and France;
58
Table of Contents
•$18.5 million of higher rent and facilities costs and repairs and maintenance expense, primarily in the UK and the
Netherlands;
•$18.2 million of higher compensation costs, including salaries, bonuses and stock-based compensation, primarily due to
headcount growth;
•$17.8 million of higher costs related to EIS product revenues; and
•$5.1 million of higher office expenses primarily due to additional software and support services.
This increase was partially offset by a net increase of $30.1 million of realized cash flow hedge gains from foreign currency forward
contracts and $9.7 million decrease of other third party costs, primarily in the Netherlands and the UK.
Asia-Pacific Cost of Revenues. During the year ended December 31, 2021, Asia-Pacific cost of revenues increased by
$64.9 million or 9% (7% on a constant currency basis). The increase in our Asia-Pacific cost of revenues was primarily due to:
•$27.5 million of higher depreciation expense, primarily from IBX data center expansions in Hong Kong, Australia and Japan;
•$10.1 million of higher costs related to increased EIS product revenues;
•$8.3 million of higher compensation costs, including salaries, bonuses and stock-based compensation, primarily due to
headcount growth;
•$7.2 million of higher utilities costs, primarily driven by increases in prices and higher utility usage in Singapore; and
•$5.2 million of higher costs related to dark fiber and customer installations, primarily in Hong Kong.
We expect Americas, EMEA and Asia-Pacific cost of revenues to increase in line with the growth of our business, including from
the impacts of acquisitions.
59
Table of Contents
Sales and Marketing Expenses. Our sales and marketing expenses for the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020 were
split among the following geographic regions (dollars in thousands):
Years ended December 31, $ Change % Change
2021 % 2020 % Actual ActualConstant
Currency
Americas $ 470,985 64% $ 457,551 64% $ 13,434 3% 3%
EMEA 172,930 23% 162,365 23% 10,565 7% 5%
Asia-Pacific 97,317 13% 98,440 13% (1,123) (1)% (3)%
Total $ 741,232 100% $ 718,356 100% $ 22,876 3% 2%
Sales and Marketing Expenses
(dollars in thousands; percentages indicate expenses as a percentage of revenues)
Americas Sales and Marketing Expenses. During the year ended December 31, 2021, Americas sales and marketing expenses
increased by $13.4 million or 3% (and also 3% on a constant currency basis). The increase in our Americas sales and marketing
expenses was primarily due to $12.0 million of higher compensation costs, including sales compensation, salaries and stock-based
compensation, partially due to additional compensation expenses incurred related to our recent acquisitions and higher bonus and
merit payments.
EMEA Sales and Marketing Expenses. During the year ended December 31, 2021, EMEA sales and marketing increased by
$10.6 million or 7% (5% on a constant currency basis). The increase in our EMEA sales and marketing expenses was primarily due
to $10.2 million of higher compensation costs, including sales compensation, salaries and stock-based compensation.
Asia-Pacific Sales and Marketing Expenses. Our Asia-Pacific sales and marketing expense did not materially change during the
year ended December 31, 2021 as compared to the year ended December 31, 2020.
We anticipate that we will continue to invest in sales and marketing initiatives across our three regions in line with the growth of
our business. We also expect travel and entertainment expenses to increase as travel restrictions that were imposed in response to
the COVID-19 pandemic are eased. We expect our Americas sales and marketing expenses as a percentage of revenues to be
higher than those of our other regions since certain global sales and marketing functions are located within the U.S.
60
Table of Contents
General and Administrative Expenses. Our general and administrative expenses for the years ended December 31, 2021
and 2020 were split among the following geographic regions (dollars in thousands):
Years Ended December 31, $ Change % Change
2021 % 2020 % Actual ActualConstant
Currency
Americas $ 902,037 69% $ 782,038 72% $119,999 15% 15%
EMEA 248,295 19% 203,619 19% 44,676 22% 20%
Asia-Pacific 151,465 12% 105,324 9% 46,141 44% 41%
Total $1,301,797 100% $1,090,981 100% $210,816 19% 19%
General and Administrative Expenses
(dollars in thousands; percentages indicate expenses as a percentage of revenues)
Americas General and Administrative Expenses. During the year ended December 31, 2021, Americas general and
administrative expenses increased by $120.0 million or 15% (and also 15% on a constant currency basis). The increase in our
Americas general and administrative expenses was primarily due to:
•$70.3 million of higher compensation costs, including salaries, bonuses, and stock-based compensation, primarily due to
additional compensation expenses incurred related to headcount growth, including that from our recent acquisitions;
•$39.9 million of higher depreciation expense associated with systems to support the integration of recent acquisitions and
the growth of our business; and
•$13.3 million of higher office expenses primarily due to additional software and support services.
EMEA General and Administrative Expenses. During the year ended December 31, 2021, EMEA general and administrative
expenses increased by $44.7 million or 22% (20% on a constant currency basis). The increase in our EMEA general and
administrative expenses was primarily due to:
•$41.1 million of higher compensation costs, including salaries, bonuses, and stock-based compensation, primarily due to
headcount growth; and
•$5.7 million of higher other operating expenses, primarily due to the prior year having lower costs attributable to a favorable
legal settlement in the first quarter of 2020.
This increase was partially offset by a net increase of $5.7 million of realized cash flow hedge gains from foreign currency forward
contracts.
61
Table of Contents
Asia-Pacific General and Administrative Expenses. During the year ended December 31, 2021, Asia-Pacific general and
administrative expenses increased by $46.1 million or 44% (41% on a constant currency basis). The increase in our Asia-Pacific
general and administrative expense was primarily due to:
•$28.5 million of higher compensation costs, including salaries, bonuses, and stock-based compensation, primarily due to
additional compensation expenses incurred related to headcount growth, including that from our recent acquisitions;
•$9.1 million of higher rent and facility costs, primarily related to our offices in Japan and Singapore; and
•$6.7 million of consulting costs in support of our business growth.
Going forward, although we are carefully monitoring our spending, we expect our general and administrative expenses to
increase across all three regions as we continue to invest in our operations to support our growth, including investments to enhance
our technology platform, to maintain our qualification for taxation as a REIT and to integrate recent acquisitions. We also expect
travel and entertainment expenses to increase as travel restrictions that were imposed in response to the COVID-19 pandemic are
eased. Additionally, given that our corporate headquarters is located in the U.S., we expect the Americas general and administrative
expenses as a percentage of revenues to be higher than those of other regions.
Transaction Costs. During the year ended December 31, 2021, we recorded transaction costs totaling $22.8 million, primarily
related to costs incurred in connection with the formation of the new joint ventures and the GPX India Acquisition. During the year
ended December 31, 2020, we recorded transaction costs totaling $55.9 million, primarily related to costs incurred in connection
with the acquisitions of Bell, Packet, and Axtel and the formation of the Asia-Pacific 1 Joint Venture.
Impairment Charges. During the year ended December 31, 2021, we did not record any impairment charge. During the year
ended December 31, 2020, we recorded impairment charges totaling $7.3 million in the Asia-Pacific region as a result of the fair
value adjustment of the Asia-Pacific 1 Joint Venture xScale data centers, which were classified as held for sale assets before they
were sold on December 17, 2020.
Gain on Asset Sales. During the year ended December 31, 2021, we recorded a gain of $10.8 million primarily related to the
sale of the Dublin 5 ("DB5") data center. During the year ended December 31, 2020, we did not record a significant amount of gain
on asset sales.
Income from Operations. Our income from operations for the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020 was split among the
following geographic regions (dollars in thousands):
Years Ended December 31, $ Change % Change
2021 % 2020 % Actual ActualConstant
Currency
Americas $ 165,380 15% $ 178,454 17% $ (13,074) (7)% (5)%
EMEA 530,888 48% 531,530 50% (642) —% 1%
Asia-Pacific 411,894 37% 342,944 33% 68,950 20% 18%
Total $1,108,162 100% $1,052,928 100% $ 55,234 5% 6%
Americas Income from Operations. During the year ended December 31, 2021, Americas income from operations decreased by
$13.1 million or 7% (5% on a constant currency basis), primarily due to higher operating expenses as a percentage of revenues,
which included higher depreciation expenses driven by expansion activity and an increase in compensation costs, as well as margin
dilution from recent acquisitions and increases in EIS product sales.
EMEA Income from Operations. During the year ended December 31, 2021, EMEA income from operations did not materially
change as compared to the year ended December 31, 2020.
Asia-Pacific Income from Operations. During the year ended December 31, 2021, Asia-Pacific income from operations
increased by $69.0 million or 20% (18% on a constant currency basis), primarily due to higher revenues as a result of our IBX data
center expansion activity and organic growth, as described above, as well as lower cost of revenues and sales and marketing
expense as a percentage of revenues.
62
Table of Contents
Interest Income. Interest income was not significant for the year ended December 31, 2021 and was $8.7 million for the year
ended December 31, 2020. The average yield for the year ended December 31, 2021 was 0.17% versus 0.43% for the year ended
December 31, 2020.
Interest Expense. Interest expense decreased to $336.1 million for the year ended December 31, 2021 from $406.5 million for
the year ended December 31, 2020, primarily due to interest savings as a result of our recent refinancing activities. During the
years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020, we capitalized $24.5 million and $26.8 million, respectively, of interest expense to
construction in progress. See Note 11 within the Consolidated Financial Statements.
Other Income or Expense. We recorded net other expense of $50.6 million for the year ended December 31, 2021, primarily
due to approximately $32.0 million impairment charge resulting from the settlement of a pre-acquisition uncertain tax position, refer
to below "Income Taxes" section for further information, as well as foreign currency exchange gains and losses. For the year ended
December 31, 2020, we recorded net other income of $6.9 million, which was primarily due to foreign currency exchange gains and
losses, net of the impact from derivative instruments used to manage foreign exchange risks.
Loss on Debt Extinguishment. During the year ended December 31, 2021, we recorded $115.1 million of net loss on debt
extinguishment primarily due to the redemption of 2.875% Euro Senior Notes due 2026 and the 5.375% Senior Notes due 2027.
During the year ended December 31, 2020, we recorded $145.8 million of loss on debt extinguishment primarily related to the
redemption of the Senior Notes due 2022, 2024, 2025, and 2026.
Income Taxes. We operate as a REIT for U.S. federal income tax purposes. As a REIT, we are generally not subject to U.S.
federal income taxes on our taxable income distributed to stockholders. We intend to distribute or have distributed the entire taxable
income generated by the operations of our REIT and QRSs for the tax years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively. As
such, other than tax attributable to state income taxes and foreign income and withholding taxes, no provision for income taxes has
been included for the REIT and its QRSs in the accompanying consolidated financial statements for the years ended December 31,
2021 and 2020.
We have made TRS elections for some of our subsidiaries in and outside the U.S. In general, a TRS may provide services that
would otherwise be considered impermissible for REITs to provide and may hold assets that may not be REIT compliant.
U.S. income taxes for the TRS entities located in the U.S. and foreign income taxes for our foreign operations regardless of
whether the foreign operations are operated as QRSs or TRSs have been accrued, as necessary, for the years ended
December 31, 2021 and 2020.
For the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020, we recorded $109.2 million and $146.2 million of income tax expenses,
respectively. Our effective tax rates were 17.9% and 28.3%, respectively, for the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020. The
lower effective tax rate in 2021 as compared to 2020 is primarily due to the reversal of uncertain tax positions of $69.8 million
resulting from the settlements of various tax audits in the United Kingdom ("UK"), Germany, and Australia, partially offset by
$12.3 million resulting from the revaluation of our deferred tax liabilities in the EMEA region due to the UK corporate tax rate
increase from 19% to 25% and the Dutch corporate tax rate increase from 25% to 25.8% enacted in the current period.
Of the unrecognized tax benefits being realized in the year ended December 31, 2021, approximately $32.0 million is related to
the uncertain tax position inherited from the Metronode Acquisition in 2018. The uncertain tax position was covered by an
indemnification agreement with the Seller. The realization of the unrecognized tax benefits resulted in an impairment of the
indemnification asset for the same amount, which has been included in Other Income (Expense) on the Consolidated Statements of
Operations for the year ended December 31, 2021.
Adjusted EBITDA. Adjusted EBITDA is a key factor in how we assess the operating performance of our segments and develop
regional growth strategies such as IBX data center expansion decisions. We define adjusted EBITDA as income or loss from
operations excluding depreciation, amortization, accretion, stock-based compensation expense, restructuring charges, impairment
charges, transaction costs and gain on asset sales. See "Non-GAAP Financial Measures" below for more information about
adjusted EBITDA and a reconciliation of adjusted EBITDA to income or loss from operations. Our adjusted EBITDA for the years
ended December 31, 2021 and 2020 was split among the following geographic regions (dollars in thousands):
63
Table of Contents
Years Ended December 31, $ Change % Change
2021 % 2020 % Actual ActualConstant
Currency
Americas $1,326,460 42 %$1,186,022 42 %$140,438 12 % 12 %
EMEA 1,033,333 33 % 974,246 34 % 59,087 6 % 5 %
Asia-Pacific 784,591 25 % 692,630 24 % 91,961 13 % 11 %
Total $3,144,384 100 %$2,852,898 100 %$291,486 10 % 9 %
Americas Adjusted EBITDA. During the year ended December 31, 2021, Americas adjusted EBITDA increased by $140.4
million or 12% (and also 12% on a constant currency basis), primarily due to higher revenues as a result of our IBX data center
expansion activity and organic growth as described above.
EMEA Adjusted EBITDA. During the year ended December 31, 2021, EMEA adjusted EBITDA increased by $59.1 million or 6%
(5% on a constant currency basis), primarily due to higher revenues as a result of our IBX data center expansion activity and
organic growth, as described above.
Asia-Pacific Adjusted EBITDA. During the year ended December 31, 2021, Asia-Pacific adjusted EBITDA increased by $92.0
million or 13% (11% on a constant currency basis), primarily due to higher revenues as a result of our IBX data center expansion
activity and organic growth as described above.
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
We provide all information required in accordance with GAAP, but we believe that evaluating our ongoing operating results may
be difficult if limited to reviewing only GAAP financial measures. Accordingly, we use non-GAAP financial measures to evaluate our
operations.
Non-GAAP financial measures are not a substitute for financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP. Non-GAAP
financial measures should not be considered in isolation, but should be considered together with the most directly comparable
GAAP financial measures and the reconciliation of the non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable GAAP
financial measures. We have presented such non-GAAP financial measures to provide investors with an additional tool to evaluate
our results of operations in a manner that focuses on what management believes to be our core, ongoing business operations. We
believe that the inclusion of these non-GAAP financial measures provides consistency and comparability with past reports and
provides a better understanding of the overall performance of the business and ability to perform in subsequent periods. We believe
that if we did not provide such non-GAAP financial information, investors would not have all the necessary data to analyze Equinix
effectively.
Investors should note that the non-GAAP financial measures used by us may not be the same non-GAAP financial measures,
and may not be calculated in the same manner, as those of other companies. Investors should therefore exercise caution when
comparing non-GAAP financial measures used by us to similarly titled non-GAAP financial measures of other companies.
Our primary non-GAAP financial measures, adjusted EBITDA and adjusted funds from operations ("AFFO"), exclude
depreciation expense as these charges primarily relate to the initial construction costs of our IBX data centers and do not reflect our
current or future cash spending levels to support our business. Our IBX data centers are long-lived assets and have an economic
life greater than 10 years. The construction costs of an IBX data center do not recur with respect to such data center, although we
may incur initial construction costs in future periods with respect to additional IBX data centers, and future capital expenditures
remain minor relative to our initial investment. This is a trend we expect to continue. In addition, depreciation is also based on the
estimated useful lives of our IBX data centers. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on
historical costs incurred to build out our IBX data centers and are not indicative of current or expected future capital expenditures.
Therefore, we exclude depreciation from our results of operations when evaluating our operations.
64
Table of Contents
In addition, in presenting adjusted EBITDA and AFFO, we exclude amortization expense related to acquired intangible assets.
Amortization expense is significantly affected by the timing and magnitude of our acquisitions and these charges may vary in
amount from period to period. We exclude amortization expense to facilitate a more meaningful evaluation of our current operating
performance and comparisons to our prior periods. We exclude accretion expense, both as it relates to asset retirement obligations
as well as accrued restructuring charge liabilities, as these expenses represent costs which we believe are not meaningful in
evaluating our current operations. We exclude stock-based compensation expense, as it can vary significantly from period to period
based on share price, the timing, size and nature of equity awards. As such, we, and many investors and analysts, exclude stock-
based compensation expense to compare our results of operations with those of other companies. We also exclude restructuring
charges. The restructuring charges relate to our decisions to exit leases for excess space adjacent to several of our IBX data
centers, which we did not intend to build out, or our decision to reverse such restructuring charges. We also exclude impairment
charges generally related to certain long-lived assets. The impairment charges are related to expense recognized whenever events
or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of long-lived assets are not recoverable. We also exclude gain or
loss on asset sales as it represents profit or loss that is not meaningful in evaluating the current or future operating performance.
Finally, we exclude transaction costs from AFFO and adjusted EBITDA to allow more comparable comparisons of our financial
results to our historical operations. The transaction costs relate to costs we incur in connection with business combinations and the
formation of joint ventures, including advisory, legal, accounting, valuation, and other professional or consulting fees. Such charges
generally are not relevant to assessing our long-term performance. In addition, the frequency and amount of such charges vary
significantly based on the size and timing of the transactions. Management believes items such as restructuring charges,
impairment charges, gain or loss on asset sales and transaction costs are non-core transactions; however, these types of costs
may occur in future periods.
Adjusted EBITDA
The following table shows the reconciliation from income from operations to adjusted EBITDA (in thousands):
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
Income from operations $ 1,108,162 $ 1,052,928 $ 1,169,631 
Depreciation, amortization, and accretion expense 1,660,524 1,427,010 1,285,296 
Stock-based compensation expense 363,774 311,020 236,539 
Transaction costs 22,769 55,935 24,781 
Impairment charges — 7,306 15,790 
Gain on asset sales (10,845) (1,301) (44,310)
Adjusted EBITDA $ 3,144,384 $ 2,852,898 $ 2,687,727 
Our adjusted EBITDA results have improved each year in total dollars due to our steady operating results, as discussed in
"Results of Operations", as well as the nature of our business model consisting of a recurring revenue stream and a cost structure
which has a large base that is fixed in nature, as also discussed in "Overview".
Funds from Operations ("FFO") and AFFO
We use FFO and AFFO, which are non-GAAP financial measures commonly used in the REIT industry. FFO is calculated in
accordance with the standards established by the National Association of Real Estate Investment Trusts. FFO represents net
income (loss), excluding gain (loss) from the disposition of real estate assets, depreciation and amortization on real estate assets
and adjustments for unconsolidated joint ventures' and non-controlling interests' share of these items.
65
Table of Contents
In presenting AFFO, we exclude certain items that we believe are not good indicators of our current or future operating
performance. AFFO represents FFO excluding depreciation and amortization expense on non-real estate assets, accretion, stock-
based compensation, restructuring charges, impairment charges, transaction costs, an installation revenue adjustment, a straight-
line rent expense adjustment, a contract cost adjustment, amortization of deferred financing costs and debt discounts and
premiums, gain (loss) on debt extinguishment, an income tax expense adjustment, recurring capital expenditures, net income (loss)
from discontinued operations, net of tax, and adjustments from FFO to AFFO for unconsolidated joint ventures' and noncontrolling
interests' share of these items. The adjustments for installation revenue, straight-line rent expense and contract costs are intended
to isolate the cash activity included within the straight-lined or amortized results in the consolidated statement of operations. We
exclude the amortization of deferred financing costs and debt discounts and premiums as these expenses relate to the initial costs
incurred in connection with debt financings that have no current or future cash obligations. We exclude gain (loss) on debt
extinguishment since it generally represents the write-off of initial costs incurred in connection with debt financings or a cost that is
incurred to reduce future interest costs and is not a good indicator of our current or future operating performance. We include an
income tax expense adjustment, which represents the non-cash tax impact due to changes in valuation allowances, uncertain tax
positions and deferred taxes that do not relate to current period's operations. We deduct recurring capital expenditures, which
represent expenditures to extend the useful life of its IBX data centers or other assets that are required to support current revenues.
We also exclude net income (loss) from discontinued operations, net of tax, which represents results that may not recur and are not
a good indicator of our current future operating performance.
66
Table of Contents
Our FFO and AFFO were as follows (in thousands):
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
Net income $ 499,728 $ 370,074 $ 507,245 
Net gain (loss) attributable to non-controlling interests 463 (297) 205 
Net income attributable to Equinix 500,191 369,777 507,450 
Adjustments:
Real estate depreciation 1,073,148 924,064 845,798 
(Gain) loss on disposition of real estate property (6,439) 4,063 (39,337)
Adjustments for FFO from unconsolidated joint ventures 6,097 2,726 645 
FFO $ 1,572,997 $ 1,300,630 $ 1,314,556 
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
FFO $ 1,572,997 $ 1,300,630 $ 1,314,556 
Adjustments:
Installation revenue adjustment 27,928 (125) 11,031 
Straight-line rent expense 9,677 10,787 8,167 
Contract cost adjustment (63,064) (35,675) (40,861)
Amortization of deferred financing costs and debt discounts and premiums 17,135 15,739 13,042 
Stock-based compensation expense 363,774 311,020 236,539 
Non-real estate depreciation expense 377,658 300,258 242,761 
Amortization expense 205,484 199,047 196,278 
Accretion expense 4,234 3,641 459 
Recurring capital expenditures (199,089) (160,637) (186,002)
Loss on debt extinguishment 115,125 145,804 52,825 
Transaction costs 22,769 55,935 24,781 
Impairment charges 31,847 7,306 15,790 
Income tax expense (benefit) adjustment (38,505) 33,220 39,676 
Adjustments for AFFO from unconsolidated joint ventures 3,259 2,195 2,080 
AFFO $ 2,451,229 $ 2,189,145 $ 1,931,122 
Impairment charges for 2021 relate to the impairment of an indemnification asset in Q2 2021  resulting from the settlement of a pre-
acquisition uncertain tax position, which was recorded as Other Income (Expense) on the Consolidated Statements of Operations. This
impairment charge was offset by the recognition of tax benefits in the same amount, which was included within the Income tax expense
(benefit) adjustment line on the table above.
Our AFFO results have improved due to the improved operating results discussed earlier in "Results of Operations," as well as
due to the nature of our business model which consists of a recurring revenue stream and a cost structure which has a large base
that is fixed in nature as discussed earlier in "Overview."(1)
(1)
(1)
67
Table of Contents
Constant Currency Presentation
Our revenues and certain operating expenses (cost of revenues, sales and marketing and general and administrative
expenses) from our international operations have represented and will continue to represent a significant portion of our total
revenues and certain operating expenses. As a result, our revenues and certain operating expenses have been and will continue to
be affected by changes in the U.S. dollar against major international currencies. During the year ended December 31, 2021 as
compared to the same period in 2020, the U.S. dollar was stronger relative to the Brazilian real and Japanese yen, which resulted in
an unfavorable foreign currency impact on revenue, operating income and adjusted EBITDA, and a favorable foreign currency
impact on operating expenses. During the year ended December 31, 2021 as compared to the same period in 2020, the U.S. dollar
was weaker relative to the Australian dollar, British Pound, Euro and Singapore dollar, which resulted in a favorable foreign currency
impact on revenue, operating income and adjusted EBITDA, and an unfavorable foreign currency impact on operating expenses. In
order to provide a framework for assessing how each of our business segments performed excluding the impact of foreign currency
fluctuations, we present period-over-period percentage changes in our revenues and certain operating expenses on a constant
currency basis in addition to the historical amounts as reported. Our constant currency presentation excludes the impact of our
foreign currency cash flow hedging activities. Presenting constant currency results of operations is a non-GAAP financial measure
and is not meant to be considered in isolation or as an alternative to GAAP results of operations. However, we have presented this
non-GAAP financial measure to provide investors with an additional tool to evaluate our results of operations. To present this
information, our current period revenues and certain operating expenses from entities reporting in currencies other than the U.S.
dollar are converted into U.S. dollars at constant exchange rates rather than the actual exchange rates in effect during the
respective periods (i.e. average rates in effect for the year ended December 31, 2020 are used as exchange rates for the year
ended December 31, 2021 when comparing the year ended December 31, 2021 with the year ended December 31, 2020).
Liquidity and Capital Resources
Sources and Uses of Cash
Customer collections are our primary source of cash. We believe we have a strong customer base, and have continued to
experience relatively strong collections. As of December 31, 2021, our principle sources of liquidity were $1.5 billion of cash, cash
equivalents and short-term investments. In addition to our cash and investment portfolio, we had $1.9 billion of additional liquidity
available to us from our $2.0 billion revolving facility and general access to both public and private debt and the equity capital
markets. We also have additional liquidity available to us from our ATM program, under which we may offer and sell from time to
time our common stock in "at the market" transactions. As of December 31, 2021, we had $1.0 billion available for sale under the
2020 ATM Program.
We believe we have sufficient cash, coupled with anticipated cash generated from operating activities and external financing
sources, to meet our operating requirements, including repayment of the current portion of our debt as it becomes due, distribution
of dividends and completion of our publicly-announced acquisitions, ordinary costs to operate the business, and expansion projects.
We also believe that our financial resources will allow us to manage future possible impacts of the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic on
our business operations for the foreseeable future, which could include reductions in revenue and delays in payments from
customers and partners.
As we continue to grow, we may pursue additional expansion opportunities, primarily the build out of new IBX data centers, in
certain of our existing markets which are at or near capacity within the next year, as well as potential acquisitions and joint ventures.
If the opportunity to expand is greater than planned we may further increase the level of capital expenditure to support this growth
as well as pursue additional business and real estate acquisitions or joint ventures provided that we have or can access sufficient
funding to pursue such expansion opportunities. We may elect to access the equity or debt markets from time to time
opportunistically, particularly if financing is available on attractive terms. We will continue to evaluate our operating requirements
and financial resources in light of future developments, including those relating to the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic.
68
Table of Contents
Cash Flow
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 Change
(in thousands)
Net cash provided by operating activities $ 2,547,206 $ 2,309,826 $ 237,380 
Net cash used in investing activities (3,006,738) (3,426,972) 420,234 
Net cash provided by financing activities 413,765 815,526 (401,761)
Operating Activities
Our cash provided by our operations is generated by colocation, interconnection, managed infrastructure and other revenues.
Our primary uses of cash from our operating activities include compensation and related costs, interest payments, other general
corporate expenditures and taxes. Net cash provided by operating activities increased by $237.4 million during the year ended
December 31, 2021 as compared to December 31, 2020, primarily driven by improved results of operations partially offset by
increases in cash paid for costs and operating expenses.
Investing Activities
Net cash used in investing activities decreased by $420.2 million during the year ended December 31, 2021 as compared to
December 31, 2020, primarily due to $1.0 billion less spent on business acquisitions, which consisted of the Bell, Packet and Axtel
acquisitions in 2020 and the GPX acquisition in 2021 and a $20.2 million decrease in purchases of investments. This decrease was
partially offset by a $469.0 million increase in capital expenditures as a result of our expansion activity, a $125.8 million decrease in
the proceeds from the sale of assets to our Joint Ventures and a $25.3 million decrease in proceeds from the sale of investments.
Financing Activities
Net cash provided by financing activities decreased by $401.8 million for the year ended December 31, 2021 as compared to
December 31, 2020, primarily driven by a decrease of $1.7 billion in proceeds from public offerings of common stock, a $750.8
million decrease in proceeds from the revolving credit facility and term loan facilities, a $553.0 million decrease in proceeds from
senior notes, a $95.0 million increase in dividend distributions and a $50.3 million increase in repayments of finance lease liabilities.
This decrease is partially offset by a $2.4 billion decrease in the repayment of senior notes, a $199.6 million increase in proceeds
from the ATM program, a $112.5 million decrease in the repayment of mortgage and loans payable, a $17.1 million decrease in debt
issuance costs, a $15.5 million increase in proceeds from employee awards and a $12.5 million decrease in debt extinguishment
costs.
Material Cash Commitments
As of December 31, 2021, our principle commitments were primarily comprised of:
•approximately $11.1 billion of principal from our senior notes (gross of debt issuance cost and debt discount);
•approximately $2.7 billion of interest on mortgage payable, loans payable, senior notes and term loans, based on their
respective interest rates and recognized over the life of these instruments, and the credit facility fee for the revolving credit
facility;
•$620.0 million of principal from our term loans, mortgage and loans payable (gross of debt issuance cost, debt discount,
plus mortgage premium);
•approximately $4.9 billion of total lease payments, which represents lease payments under finance and operating lease
arrangements, including renewal options that are reasonably certain to be exercised;
•approximately $1.0 billion of unaccrued capital expenditure contractual commitments, primarily for IBX equipment not yet
delivered and labor not yet provided in connection with the work necessary to complete construction and open IBX data
center expansion projects prior to making them available to customers for installation, the majority of which is payable
within the next 12 months; and
•approximately $1.3 billion of other non-capital purchase commitments, such as commitments to purchase power in select
locations and other open purchase orders, which contractually bind us for goods, services
69
Table of Contents
or arrangements to be delivered or provided during 2022 and beyond, the majority of which is payable within the next two
years.
We believe that our sources of liquidity, including our expected future operating cash flows, are sized to adequately meet both
the near and long term material cash commitments for the foreseeable future. For further information on maturities of lease liabilities
and debt instruments, see Notes 10 and 11, respectively, within the Consolidated Financial Statements.
Other Contractual Obligations
We have additional future equity contributions and commitments to the Joint Ventures with GIC that are in EMEA and APAC.
For additional information, see the "Equity Method Investments" footnote within the Consolidated Financial Statements.
Additionally, we entered into lease agreements with various landlords primarily for data center spaces and ground leases which
have not yet commenced as of December 31, 2021. For additional information, see “Maturities of Lease Liabilities” in Note 10 within
the Consolidated Financial Statements.
Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates
Our consolidated financial statements are prepared in accordance with U.S. GAAP. The preparation of our financial statements
requires management to make estimates and assumptions about future events that affect the reported amounts of assets and
liabilities and the disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the financial statements and the reported amounts of
revenues and expenses during the reporting period. On an ongoing basis, management evaluates the accounting policies,
assumptions, estimates and judgments to ensure that our consolidated financial statements are presented fairly and in accordance
with GAAP. Management bases its assumptions, estimates and judgments on historical experience, current trends and various
other factors that are believed to be reasonable under the circumstances, the results of which form the basis for making judgments
about the carrying values of assets and liabilities that are not readily apparent from other sources. However, because future events
and their effects cannot be determined with certainty, actual results may differ from these assumptions and estimates, and such
differences could be material.
Our significant accounting policies are discussed in Note 1 to Consolidated Financial Statements in Item 8 of this Annual Report
on Form 10-K. Management believes that the following accounting policies and estimates are the most critical to aid in fully
understanding and evaluating our consolidated financial statements, and they require significant judgments, resulting from the need
to make estimates about the effect of matters that are inherently uncertain:
•    Accounting for income taxes;
•    Accounting for business combinations;
•    Accounting for impairment of goodwill and other intangible assets;
•    Accounting for property, plant and equipment; and
•    Accounting for leases.
70
Table of Contents
Description Judgments and Uncertainties Effect if Actual Results Differ from Assumptions
Accounting for Income T axes.
Deferred tax assets and liabilities are
recognized based on the future tax
consequences attributable to temporary
differences that exist between the
financial statement carrying value of
assets and liabilities and their respective
tax bases, as well as tax attributes such
as operating loss, capital loss and tax
credit carryforwards on a taxing
jurisdiction basis. W e measure deferred
tax assets and liabilities using enacted tax
rates that will apply in the years in which
we expect the temporary dif ferences to be
recovered or settled.
 
The accounting standard for income taxes
requires a reduction of the carrying
amounts of deferred tax assets by
recording a valuation allowance if, based
on the available evidence, it is more likely
than not (defined by the accounting
standard as a likelihood of more than
50%) that such assets will not be realized.
A tax benefit from an uncertain income tax
position may be recognized in the
financial statements only if it is more likely
than not that the position is sustainable,
based solely on its technical merits and
consideration of the relevant taxing
authority's widely understood
administrative practices and precedents.
We recognize interest and penalties
related to unrecognized tax benefits within
income tax benefit (expense) in the
consolidated statements of operations.The valuation of deferred tax assets requires
judgment in assessing the likely future tax
consequences of events that have been
recognized in our financial statements or tax
returns. Our accounting for deferred tax
consequences represents our best estimate of
those future tax consequences.
In assessing the need for a valuation
allowance, we consider both positive and
negative evidence related to the likelihood of
realization of the deferred tax assets. If, based
on the weight of that available evidence, it is
more likely than not the deferred tax assets will
not be realized, we record a valuation
allowance. The weight given to the positive
and negative evidence is commensurate with
the extent to which the evidence may be
objectively verified.
This assessment, which is completed on a
taxing jurisdiction basis, takes into account a
number of types of evidence, including the
following: 1) the nature, frequency and severity
of current and cumulative financial reporting
losses, 2) sources of future taxable income, 3)
taxable income in carryback years permitted by
the tax law , and 4) tax planning strategies.
In assessing the tax benefit from an uncertain
income tax position, the tax position that meets
the more-likely-than-not recognition threshold
is initially and subsequently measured as the
largest amount of tax benefit that is greater
than a 50% likelihood of being realized upon
ultimate settlement with a taxing authority that
has full knowledge of all relevant information.
For purposes of the quarterly REIT  asset tests,
we estimate the fair market value of assets
within our QRSs and TRSs using a discounted
cash flow approach, by calculating the present
value of forecasted future cash flows. W e
apply discount rates based on industry
benchmarks relative to the market and
forecasting risks. Other significant assumptions
used to estimate the fair market value of
assets in QRSs and TRSs include projected
revenue growth, projected operating margins
and projected capital expenditure. W e revisit
significant assumptions periodically to reflect
any changes due to business or economic
environment.As of December 31, 2021 and 2020, we had net total
deferred tax liabilities of $280.5 million and $224.0
million, respectively . As of December 31, 2021 and
2020, we had a total valuation allowance of $100.7
million and $82.3 million, respectively . If and when we
increase or reduce our valuation allowances, it may
have an unfavorable or favorable impact, respectively ,
to our financial position and results of operations in
the periods when such determinations are made. W e
will continue to assess the need for our valuation
allowances, by jurisdiction, in the future.
During the year ended December 31, 2021, we
established full valuation allowances against the
deferred tax assets of one of our Hong Kong legal
entities as well as certain deferred tax assets
acquired in India and Canada that are not expected to
be realizable in the foreseeable future.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, we
provided full valuation allowances against certain
deferred tax assets acquired in Canada and the
Netherlands that are not expected to be realizable in
the foreseeable future.
As of December 31, 2021 and 2020, we had
unrecognized tax benefits of $148.3 million and
$207.8 million, respectively , exclusive of interest and
penalties. During the year ended December 31, 2021,
the unrecognized tax benefit decreased by $59.5
million primarily due to the settlements of various tax
audits in the UK, Germany , and Australia, which was
partially of fset by the integrations in the EMEA  region.
During the year ended December 31, 2020, the
unrecognized tax benefit increased by $34.1 million
primarily due to integrations in the EMEA  region,
which was partially of fset by the recognition of
unrecognized tax benefits related to our tax positions
in a few countries as a result of a lapse in statutes of
limitations and the partial payment related to the UK
integration. The unrecognized tax benefits of $148.3
million as of December 31, 2021, of which $3.4 million
is subject to an indemnification agreement, if
subsequently recognized, will af fect our ef fective tax
rate favorably at the time when such a benefit is
recognized.
71
Table of Contents
Description Judgments and Uncertainties Effect if Actual Results Differ from Assumptions
Accounting for Business
Combinations
In accordance with the accounting
standard for business combinations, we
allocate the purchase price of an acquired
business to its identifiable assets and
liabilities based on estimated fair values.
The excess of the purchase price over the
fair value of the assets acquired and
liabilities assumed, if any , is recorded as
goodwill.
 
We use all available information to
estimate fair values. W e typically engage
outside appraisal firms to assist in
determining the fair value of identifiable
intangible assets such as customer
contracts, leases and any other significant
assets or liabilities and contingent
consideration, as well as the estimated
useful life of intangible assets. W e adjust
the preliminary purchase price allocation,
as necessary , up to one year after the
acquisition closing date if we obtain more
information regarding asset valuations
and liabilities assumed.Our purchase price allocation methodology
contains uncertainties because it requires
assumptions and management's judgment to
estimate the fair value of assets acquired and
liabilities assumed at the acquisition date. Key
judgments used to estimate the fair value of
intangible assets include projected revenue
growth and operating margins, discount rates,
customer attrition rates, as well as the
estimated useful life of intangible assets.
Management estimates the fair value of assets
and liabilities based upon quoted market
prices, the carrying value of the acquired
assets and widely accepted valuation
techniques, including discounted cash flows
and market multiple analyses. Our estimates
are inherently uncertain and subject to
refinement. Unanticipated events or
circumstances may occur which could af fect
the accuracy of our fair value estimates,
including assumptions regarding industry
economic factors and business strategies.During the last three years, we have completed a
number of business combinations, including the
acquisition of GPX in India in the third quarter of
2021, Bell Data Centers in Canada in the fourth
quarter of 2020, Packet in March 2020, Axtel in
Mexico in January 2020, and Switch Datacenters'
AMS1 data center business in Amsterdam,
Netherlands in April 2019. The purchase price
allocation for these acquisitions has been finalized,
except for the GPX India acquisition.
As of December 31, 2021 and 2020, we had net
intangible assets of $1.9 billion and $2.2 billion,
respectively . We recorded amortization expense for
intangible assets of $205.5 million, $199.0 million and
$196.3 million for the years ended December 31,
2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively .
 
We do not believe there is a reasonable likelihood
that there will be a material change in the estimates
or assumptions we used to complete the purchase
price allocations and the fair value of assets acquired
and liabilities assumed. However , if actual results are
not consistent with our estimates or assumptions, we
may be exposed to losses or gains that could be
material, which would be recorded in our consolidated
statements of operations in 2021 or beyond.
72
Table of Contents
Description Judgments and Uncertainties Effect if Actual Results Differ from Assumptions
Accounting for Impairment of Goodwill
and Other Intangible Assets
In accordance with the accounting
standard for goodwill and other intangible
assets, we perform goodwill and other
intangible assets impairment reviews
annually , or whenever events or changes
in circumstances indicate that the carrying
value of an asset may not be recoverable.
 
We complete the annual goodwill
impairment assessment for the Americas,
EMEA  and Asia-Pacific reporting units to
determine if the fair values of the
reporting units exceeded their carrying
values.
 
We perform a review of other intangible
assets for impairment by assessing
events or changes in circumstances that
indicate the carrying amount of an asset
may not be recoverable.To perform annual goodwill impairment
assessment, we elected to assess qualitative
factors to determine whether it is more likely
than not that the fair value of a reporting unit is
less than its carrying value. This analysis
requires assumptions and estimates before
performing the quantitative goodwill
impairment test, where the assessment
requires assumptions and estimates derived
from a review of our actual and forecasted
operating results, approved business plans,
future economic conditions and other market
data. Additionally , we periodically review our
assessment of our reporting units to determine
if changes in facts and circumstances warrant
changes to our conclusions. There were no
specific factors present in 2021 or 2020 that
indicated a potential goodwill impairment.
We performed our annual review of other
intangible assets by assessing if there were
events or changes in circumstances indicating
that the carrying amount of an asset may not
be recoverable, such as a significant decrease
in market price of an asset, a significant
adverse change in the extent or manner in
which an asset is being used, a significant
adverse change in legal factors or business
climate that could af fect the value of an asset
or a continuous deterioration of our financial
condition. This assessment requires
assumptions and estimates derived from a
review of our actual and forecasted operating
results, approved business plans, future
economic conditions and other market data.
There were no specific events in 2021 or 2020
that indicated a potential impairment.As of December 31, 2021, goodwill attributable to the
Americas, the EMEA  and the Asia-Pacific reporting
units was $2.2 billion, $2.5 billion and $0.7 billion,
respectively .
Future events, changing market conditions and any
changes in key assumptions may result in an
impairment charge. While we have not recorded an
impairment charge against our goodwill to date, the
development of adverse business conditions in our
Americas, EMEA  or Asia-Pacific reporting units, such
as higher than anticipated customer churn
or significantly increased operating costs, or
significant deterioration of our market comparables
that we use in the market approach, could result in an
impairment charge in future periods.
The balance of our other intangible assets, net, for
the year ended December 31, 2021 and 2020 was
$1.9 billion and $2.2 billion, respectively . While we
have not recorded an impairment charge against our
other intangible assets to date, future events or
changes in circumstances, such as a significant
decrease in market price of an asset, a significant
adverse change in the extent or manner in which an
asset is being used, a significant adverse change in
legal factors or business climate, may result in an
impairment charge in future periods.
Any potential impairment charge against our goodwill
and other intangible assets would not exceed the
amounts recorded on our consolidated balance
sheets.
73
Table of Contents
Description Judgments and Uncertainties Effect if Actual Results Differ from Assumptions
Accounting for Property , Plant and
Equipment
We have a substantial amount of
property , plant and equipment recorded
on our consolidated balance sheet. The
vast majority of our property , plant and
equipment represent the costs incurred to
build out or acquire our IBX data centers.
Our IBX data centers are long-lived
assets. W e depreciate our property , plant
and equipment using the straight-line
method over the estimated useful lives of
the respective assets (subject to the term
of the lease in the case of leased assets
or leasehold improvements and integral
equipment located in leased properties).
Accounting for property , plant and
equipment includes determining the
appropriate period in which to depreciate
such assets, assessing such assets for
potential impairment, capitalizing interest
during periods of construction and
assessing the asset retirement obligations
required for certain leased properties that
require us to return the leased properties
back to their original condition at the time
we decide to exit a leased property .Judgments are required in arriving at the
estimated useful life of an asset and changes
to these estimates would have significant
impact on our financial position and results of
operations. When we lease a property for our
IBX data centers, we generally enter into long-
term arrangements with renewal options
generally available to us. In the next several
years, a number of leases for our IBX data
centers will come up for renewal. As we start
approaching the end of these initial lease
terms, we will need to reassess the estimated
useful lives of our property , plant and
equipment. In addition, we may find that our
estimates for the useful lives of non-leased
assets may also need to be revised
periodically . We periodically review the
estimated useful lives of certain of our
property , plant and equipment and changes in
these estimates in the future are possible.
The assessment of long-lived assets for
impairment requires assumptions and
estimates of undiscounted and discounted
future cash flows. These assumptions and
estimates require significant judgment and are
inherently uncertain.As of December 31, 2021 and 2020, we had property ,
plant and equipment of $15.4 billion and $14.5 billion,
respectively . During the years ended December 31,
2021, 2020 and 2019, we recorded depreciation
expense of $1.5 billion, $1.2 billion, and $1.1 billion,
respectively . While we evaluated the appropriateness,
we did not revise the estimated useful lives of our
property , plant and equipment during the years ended
December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019. Further changes
in our estimated useful lives of our property , plant and
equipment could have a significant impact on our
results of operations.
Accounting for Leases
A significant portion of our data center
spaces, of fice spaces and equipment are
leased. Each time we enter into a new
lease or lease amendments, we analyze
each lease or lease amendment for the
proper accounting, including determining
if an arrangement is or contains a lease at
inception and making assessment of the
leased properties to determine if they are
operating or finance leases.Determination of accounting treatment,
including the result of the lease classification
test for each new lease or lease amendment,
is dependent on a variety of judgments, such
as identification of lease and non-lease
components, allocation of total consideration
between lease and non-lease components,
determination of lease term, including
assessing the likelihood of lease renewals,
valuation of leased property , and establishing
the incremental borrowing rate to calculate the
present value of the minimum lease payment
for the lease test. The judgments used in the
accounting for leases are inherently subjective;
different assumptions or estimates could result
in dif ferent accounting treatment for a lease.Lease assumptions and estimates are determined
and applied at the inception of the leases or at the
lease modification date. As of December 31, 2021
and 2020, operating right-of-use ("ROU") lease assets
were at $1.3 billion and $1.5 billion, respectively , and
operating lease liabilities were at $1.3 billion and $1.5
billion respectively . As of December 31, 2021 and
2020, finance ROU assets were $1.9 billion and $1.7
billion, respectively , and finance lease liabilities were
$2.1 billion and $1.9 billion, respectively . For the
years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, we
recorded the finance lease cost of $275.0 million,
$233.9 million and $193.6 million , respectively , and
recorded rent expense of approximately
$221.8 million, $217.3 million and $219.0 million,
respectively .
Recent Accounting Pronouncements
See "Recent Accounting Pronouncements" in Note 1 within the Consolidated Financial Statements.
74
Table of Contents
ITEM 7A.    Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk
Market Risk
The following discussion about market risk involves forward-looking statements. Actual results could differ materially from those
projected in the forward-looking statements. We may be exposed to market risks related to changes in interest rates and foreign
currency exchange rates and fluctuations in the prices of certain commodities, primarily electricity.
The uncertainty that exists with respect to the economic impact of the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic introduced significant
volatility in the financial markets. See Part I, Item 1A. Risk Factors for additional information regarding potential risks to our
business, financial condition and results of operations related to the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic.
We employ foreign currency forward and option contracts, cross-currency interest rate swaps and interest rate locks for the
purpose of hedging certain specifically identified exposures. The use of these financial instruments is intended to mitigate some of
the risks associated with fluctuations in currency exchange and interest rates, but does not eliminate such risks. We do not use
financial instruments for trading or speculative purposes.
Investment Portfolio Risk
We maintain an investment portfolio of various holdings, types, and maturities that is prioritized on meeting REIT asset
requirements. All of our marketable securities are recorded on our consolidated balance sheets at fair value with changes in fair
values recognized in net income. We consider various factors in determining whether we should recognize an impairment charge
for our securities, including the length of time and extent to which the fair value has been less than our cost basis and our intent and
ability to hold the investment for a period of time sufficient to allow for any anticipated recovery. We anticipate that we will recover
the entire cost basis of these securities and have determined that no other-than-temporary impairments associated with credit
losses were required to be recognized during the year ended December 31, 2021.
As of December 31, 2021, our investment portfolio of cash equivalents and marketable securities consisted of money market
funds, certificates of deposits and publicly traded equity securities. The amount in our investment portfolio that could be susceptible
to market risk totaled $585.7 million.
Interest Rate Risk 
We are exposed to interest rate risk related to our outstanding debt. An immediate increase or decrease in current interest rates
from their position as of December 31, 2021 would not have a material impact on our interest expense due to the fixed coupon rate
on the majority of our debt obligations. However, the interest expense associated with our senior credit facility and term loans that
bear interest at variable rates could be affected. For every 100-basis point increase or decrease in interest rates, our annual interest
expense could increase by approximately $5.5 million or decrease by approximately $1.4 million based on the total balance of our
term loan borrowings as of December 31, 2021. As of December 31, 2021, we had not employed any interest rate derivative
products to hedge our variable rate debt obligations. However, we may enter into interest rate hedging agreements in the future to
mitigate our exposure to interest rate risk.
We periodically enter into interest rate locks to hedge the interest rate exposure created by anticipated fixed rate debt
issuances, which are designated as cash flow hedges. When interest rate locks are settled, any accumulated gain or loss included
as a component of other comprehensive income (loss) will be amortized to interest expense over the term of the forecasted hedged
transaction which is equivalent to the term of the interest rate locks.
The fair value of our long-term fixed interest rate debt is subject to interest rate risk. Generally, the fair value of fixed interest
rate debt will increase as interest rates fall and decrease as interest rates rise. These interest rate changes may affect the fair value
of the fixed interest rate debt but do not impact our earnings or cash flows. The fair value of our mortgage and loans payable, which
are not traded in the market, is estimated by considering our credit rating, current rates available to us for debt of the same
remaining maturities and the terms of the debt. The fair value of our other senior notes, which are traded in the market, was based
on quoted market prices. The following table represents the carrying value and estimated fair value of our mortgage and loans
payable and senior notes as of (in thousands):
75
Table of Contents
December 31, 2021 December 31, 2020
Carrying
Value Fair V alueCarrying
 Value Fair V alue
Mortgage and loans payable $ 618,388 $ 621,051 $ 1,370,970 $ 1,379,129 
Senior notes 11,102,130 11,049,834 9,261,050 9,705,486 
The carrying value is gross of debt issuance cost, debt discount and debt premium.
Foreign Currency Risk
To help manage the exposure to foreign currency exchange rate fluctuations, we have implemented a number of hedging
programs, in particular (i) a cash flow hedging program to hedge the forecasted revenues and expenses in our EMEA region, (ii) a
balance sheet hedging program to hedge the re-measurement of monetary assets and liabilities denominated in foreign currencies,
and (iii) a net investment hedging program to hedge the long term investments in our foreign subsidiaries. Our hedging programs
reduce, but do not entirely eliminate, the impact of currency exchange rate movements and their impact on the consolidated
statements of operations.
We have entered into various foreign currency debt obligations. As of December 31, 2021, the total principal amount of foreign
currency debt obligations was $1.8 billion, including $1.3 billion denominated in Euro and $549.7 million denominated in British
Pound. As of December 31, 2021, we have designated $1.5 billion of the total principal amount of foreign currency debt obligations
as net investment hedges against our net investments in foreign subsidiaries. For a net investment hedge, changes in the fair value
of the hedging instrument designated as a net investment hedge are recorded as a component of other comprehensive income
(loss) in the consolidated balance sheets. Fluctuations in the exchange rates between these foreign currencies and the U.S. Dollar
will impact the amount of U.S. Dollars that we will require to settle the foreign currency debt obligations at maturity. If the U.S. Dollar
would have been weaker or stronger by 10% in comparison to these foreign currencies as of December 31, 2021, we estimate our
obligation to cash settle the principal of these foreign currency debt obligations in U.S. Dollars would have increased or decreased
by approximately $200.2 million and $163.8 million, respectively.
We are also party to cross-currency interest rate swaps. As of December 31, 2021 and 2020, the total notional amounts of
cross-currency interest rate swap contracts outstanding were $4.0 billion and $3.3 billion, respectively. The cross-currency interest
rate swaps are designated as hedges of our net investment in foreign subsidiaries and changes in the fair value of these swaps are
recorded as a component of accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) in the consolidated balance sheets. If the U.S. Dollar
weakened or strengthened by 10% in comparison to foreign currencies, we estimate our obligation to cash settle these hedges
would have increased or decreased by approximately $456.3 million and $374.0 million, respectively.
The U.S. Dollar strengthened relative to certain of the currencies of the foreign countries in which we operate during the year
ended December 31, 2021. This has impacted our consolidated financial position and results of operations during this period,
including the amount of revenues that we reported. Continued strengthening or weakening of the U.S. Dollar will continue to impact
us in future periods.
With the existing cash flow hedges in place, a hypothetical additional 10% strengthening of the U.S. Dollar during the year
ended December 31, 2021 would have resulted in a reduction of our revenues and a reduction of our operating expenses including
depreciation and amortization expense by approximately $205.1 million and $202.2 million, respectively.
With the existing cash flow hedges in place, a hypothetical additional 10% weakening of the U.S. Dollar during the year ended
December 31, 2021 would have resulted in an increase of our revenues and an increase of our operating expenses including
depreciation and amortization expenses, by approximately $255.4 million and $253.7 million, respectively.(1) (1)
(1)
76
Table of Contents
Commodity Price Risk
Certain operating costs incurred by us are subject to price fluctuations caused by the volatility of underlying commodity prices.
The commodities most likely to have an impact on our results of operations in the event of price changes are electricity, supplies
and equipment used in our IBX data centers. We closely monitor the cost of electricity at all of our locations. We have entered into
several power contracts to purchase power at fixed prices in certain locations in the Australia, Brazil, Bulgaria, Canada, China,
Finland, France, Germany, Ireland, Italy, Japan, the Netherlands, Poland, Portugal, Singapore, Spain, Sweden, Switzerland, the
United Kingdom and the U.S..
In addition, as we are building new, or expanding existing, IBX data centers, we are subject to commodity price risk for building
materials related to the construction of these IBX data centers, such as steel and copper. In addition, the lead-time to procure
certain pieces of equipment, such as generators, is substantial. Any delays in procuring the necessary pieces of equipment for the
construction of our IBX data centers could delay the anticipated openings of these new IBX data centers and, as a result, increase
the cost of these projects.
We do not currently employ forward contracts or other financial instruments to address commodity price risk other than the
power contracts discussed above.
ITEM 8.    Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
The financial statements and supplementary data required by this Item 8 are listed in Item 15(a)(1) and begin at page F-1 of this
Annual Report on Form 10-K.
ITEM 9.    Changes in and Disagreements W ith Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure
There is no disclosure to report pursuant to Item 9.
ITEM 9A.    Controls and Procedures
Conclusion Regarding the Effectiveness of Disclosure Controls and Procedures
Under the supervision and with the participation of our management, including our Chief Executive Officer and our Chief
Financial Officer, we conducted an evaluation of our disclosure controls and procedures, as such term is defined under Rule 13a-
15(e) promulgated under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"). Based on this evaluation, our
Chief Executive Officer and our Chief Financial Officer concluded that our disclosure controls and procedures were effective at the
reasonable assurance level as of December 31, 2021.
Management's Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
Our management is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting, as such term
is defined in Exchange Act Rule 13a-15(f). Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not
prevent or detect misstatements. Also, projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that
controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or
procedures may deteriorate.
Under the supervision and with the participation of our management, including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial
Officer, we conducted an evaluation of the effectiveness of our internal control over financial reporting based on the framework in
Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway
Commission.
Based on our evaluation under the framework in Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013), our management concluded
that our internal control over financial reporting was effective as of December 31, 2021.
The effectiveness of our internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2021 has been audited by
PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, an independent registered public accounting firm, as stated in their report which is included herein
on page F-1 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
77
Table of Contents
Limitations on the Effectiveness of Controls
Our management, including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, believes that our disclosure controls and
procedures and internal control over financial reporting are designed and operated to be effective at the reasonable assurance
level. However, our management does not expect that our disclosure controls and procedures or our internal control over financial
reporting will prevent all errors and all fraud. A control system, no matter how well conceived and operated, can provide only
reasonable, not absolute, assurance that the objectives of the control system are met. Further, the design of a control system must
reflect the fact that there are resource constraints, and the benefits of controls must be considered relative to their costs. Because
of the inherent limitations in all control systems, no evaluation of controls can provide absolute assurance that all control issues and
instances of fraud, if any, have been detected. These inherent limitations include the realities that judgments in decision making can
be faulty, and that breakdowns can occur because of a simple error or mistake. Additionally, controls can be circumvented by the
individual acts of some persons, by collusion of two or more people or by management override of the controls. The design of any
system of controls is also based in part upon certain assumptions about the likelihood of future events, and there can be no
assurance that any design will succeed in achieving its stated goals under all potential future conditions; over time, controls may
become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or the degree of compliance with policies or procedures may deteriorate.
Because of the inherent limitations in a cost effective control system, misstatements due to error or fraud may occur and not be
detected.
Changes in Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
There was no change in our internal controls over financial reporting during the fourth quarter of fiscal 2021 that has materially
affected, or is reasonable likely to affect, our internal controls over financial reporting.
ITEM 9B.    Other Information
There is no disclosure to report pursuant to Item 9B.
ITEM 9C.    Disclosure Regarding Foreign Jurisdictions that Prevent Inspections
There is no disclosure to report pursuant to Item 9C.
PART III
ITEM 10.    Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance
The information required by this Item is incorporated by reference to the definitive Proxy Statement for our 2022 Annual Meeting
of Stockholders, which will be filed with the SEC no later than 120 days after December 31, 2021 pursuant to Regulation 14A.
We have adopted a Code of Ethics applicable for the Chief Executive Officer and Senior Financial Officers and a Code of
Business Conduct, which are both "Code(s) of Ethics for Senior Financial Officers" as defined by applicable rules of the SEC. This
information is incorporated by reference to the Equinix Proxy Statement for the 2022 Annual Meeting of Stockholders and is also
available on our website, www.equinix.com.
ITEM 11.    Executive Compensation
The information required by this Item is incorporated by reference to the definitive Proxy Statement for our 2022 Annual Meeting
of Stockholders, which will be filed with the SEC no later than 120 days after December 31, 2021 pursuant to Regulation 14A.
78
Table of Contents
ITEM 12.    Security Ownersh ip of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related
Stockholder Matters
Information required by this item is incorporated by reference to the Equinix Proxy Statement for the 2022 Annual Meeting of
Stockholders, which will be filed with the SEC no later than 120 days after December 31, 2021 pursuant to Regulation 14A.
ITEM 13.    Certain Relationships and Related T ransactions, and Director Independence
The information required by this Item is incorporated by reference to the definitive Proxy Statement for our 2022 Annual Meeting
of Stockholders, which will be filed with the SEC no later than 120 days after December 31, 2021 pursuant to Regulation 14A.
ITEM 14.    Principal Accountant Fees and Services
The information required by this Item is incorporated by reference to the definitive Proxy Statement for our 2022 Annual Meeting
of Stockholders, which will be filed with the SEC no later than 120 days after December 31, 2021 pursuant to Regulation 14A.
79
Table of Contents
PART IV
ITEM 15.    Exhibits, Financial Statement Schedules
(a)(1) Financial Statements:
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm (PCAOB ID 238) F-1
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2021 and 2020 F-4
Consolidated Statements of Operations for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 F-5
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income (Loss) for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 F-6
Consolidated Statements of Stockholders' Equity and Other Comprehensive Income (Loss) for the years ended December
31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 F-7
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 F-9
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements F-10
(a)(2) Financial statements and schedule:
Schedule III- Schedule of Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation at December 31, 2021 with reconciliations for the
years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 F-64
(a)(3) Exhibits:    
Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
Number Exhibit Description FormFiling Date/
Period End Date ExhibitFiled
Herewith
2.1 Rule 2.7 Announcement, dated as May 29, 2015.
Recommended Cash and Share Offer for Telecity
Group plc by Equinix, Inc.8-K 5/29/2015 2.1
2.2 Cooperation Agreement, dated as of May 29, 2015,
by and between Equinix, Inc. and Telecity Group plc.8-K 5/29/2015 2.2
2.3 Amendment to Cooperation Agreement, dated as of
November 24, 2015, by and between Equinix, Inc.
and Telecity Group plc.10-K 12/31/2015 2.3
2.4 Transaction Agreement, dated as of December 6,
2016, by and between Verizon Communications Inc.
and Equinix, Inc.8-K 12/6/2016 2.1
2.5 Amendment No. 1 to the Transaction Agreement,
dated February 23, 2017, by and between Verizon
Communications Inc. and Equinix, Inc.10-K 12/31/2016 2.5
2.6 Amendment No.2 to the Transaction Agreement,
dated April 30, 2017, by and between Verizon
Communications Inc. and Equinix, Inc.8-K 5/1/2017 2.1
2.7 Amendment No.3 to the Transaction Agreement,
dated June 29, 2018, by and between Verizon
Communications Inc. and Equinix, Inc.10-Q 8/8/2018 2.7
3.1 Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation of
the Registrant, as amended to date.10-K/A 12/31/2002 3.1
80
Table of Contents
Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
Number Exhibit Description FormFiling Date/
Period End Date ExhibitFiled
Herewith
3.2 Certificate of Amendment to the Amended and
Restated Certificate of Incorporation of the
Registrant.8-K 6/14/2011 3.1
3.3 Certificate of Amendment to the Amended and
Restated Certificate of Incorporation of the
Registrant.8-K 6/11/2013 3.1
3.4 Certificate of Amendment to the Amended and
Restated Certificate of Incorporation of the
Registrant.10-Q 6/30/2014 3.4
3.5 Certificate of Designation of Series A and Series A-1
Convertible Preferred Stock.10-K/A 12/31/2002 3.3
3.6 Amended and Restated Bylaws of the Registrant. 8-K 3/29/2016 3.1
4.1 Reference is made to Exhibits 3.1, 3.2, 3.3, 3.4, 3.5
and 3.6.
4.2 Indenture, dated as of November 20, 2014, between
Equinix, Inc. and U.S. Bank National Association as
trustee.8-K 11/20/2014 4.1
4.3 Fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March
22, 2017 between Equinix, Inc. and U.S. Bank
National Association, as trustee.8-K 3/22/2017 4.2
4.4 Form of 5.375% Senior Notes due 2027 (see Exhibit
4.3).
4.5 Fifth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of September
20, 2017, among Equinix, Inc. and U.S. Bank
National Association, as trustee, and Elavon
Financial Services DAC, UK Branch, as paying
agent.8-K 9/20/2017 4.2
4.6 Indenture, dated as of December 12, 2017, between
Equinix, Inc. and U.S. Bank National Association, as
trustee.8-K 12/5/2017 4.1
4.7 Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 2,
2018, among Equinix, Inc. and U.S. Bank National
Association, as trustee.8-K 4/3/2018 4.2
4.8 Form of 5.00% Senior Notes due October 2020 (see
Exhibit 4.7).
4.9 Form of 5.00% Senior Notes due April 2021 (see
Exhibit 4.7).
4.10 Fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 18, 2019, among Equinix, Inc and U.S.
Bank National Association, as trustee.8-K 11/18/2019 4.2
4.11 Form of 2.625% Senior Notes due 2024 (See Exhibit
4.10).
4.12 Fifth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November
18, 2019, among Equinix, Inc. and U.S. Bank
National Association, as trustee.8-K 11/18/2019 4.4
4.13 Form of 2.900% Senior Notes due 2026 (See Exhibit
4.12).
81
Table of Contents
Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
Number Exhibit Description FormFiling Date/
Period End Date ExhibitFiled
Herewith
4.14 Sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November
18, 2019, among Equinix, Inc. and U.S. Bank
National Association, as trustee.8-K 11/18/2019 4.6
4.15 Form of 3.200% Senior Notes due 2029 (See Exhibit
4.14)8-K 6/22/2020
4.16 Seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June
22, 2020, among Equinix, Inc. and U.S. Bank
National Association, as trustee8-K 6/22/2020 4.2
4.17 Form of 1.250% Senior Note due 2025 (See Exhibit
4.16)8-K 6/22/2020 4.3
4.18 Eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 22,
2020, among Equinix, Inc. and U.S. Bank National
Association, as trustee8-K 6/22/2020 4.4
4.19 Form of 1.800% Senior Note due 2027 (See Exhibit
4.18)8-K 6/22/2020 4.5
4.20 Ninth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 22,
2020, among Equinix, Inc. and U.S. Bank National
Association, as trustee8-K 6/22/2020 4.6
4.21 Form of 2.150% Senior Note due 2030 (see Exhibit
4.20)8-K 6/22/2020 4.7
4.22 Tenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 22,
2020, among Equinix, Inc. and U.S. Bank National
Association, as trustee8-K 6/22/2020 4.8
4.23 Form of 3.000% Senior Note due 2050 (See Exhibit
4.22)8-K 6/22/2020 4.9
4.24 Eleventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
October 7, 2020, among Equinix, Inc. and U.S. Bank
National Association, as trustee8-K 10/7/2020 4.2
4.25 Form of 1.000% Senior Note due 2025 (included in
Exhibit 4.24)8-K 10/7/2020 4.3
4.26 Twelfth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of October
7, 2020, among Equinix, Inc. and U.S. Bank National
Association, as trustee8-K 10/7/2020 4.4
4.27 Form of 1.550% Senior Note due 2028 (included in
Exhibit 4.26)8-K 10/7/2020 4.5
4.28 Thirteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
October 7, 2020, among Equinix, Inc. and U.S. Bank
National Association, as trustee8-K 10/7/2020 4.6
4.29 Form of 2.950% Senior Note due 2051 (included in
Exhibit 4.28)8-K 10/7/2020 4.7
4.30 Fourteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
March 10, 2021, between Equinix, Inc. and U.S.
Bank National Association, as trustee8-K 3/11/2021 4.2
4.31 Form of 0.250% Senior Note due 2027 (included in
Exhibit 4.30)8-K 3/11/2021 4.3
4.32 Fifteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March
10, 2021, between Equinix, Inc. and U.S. Bank
National Association, as trustee8-K 3/11/2021 4.4
82
Table of Contents
Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
Number Exhibit Description FormFiling Date/
Period End Date ExhibitFiled
Herewith
4.33 Form of 1.000% Senior Note due 2033 (included in
Exhibit 4.32)8-K 3/11/2021 4.5
4.34 Sixteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of May
17, 2021, between Equinix, Inc. and U.S. Bank8-K 5/17/2021 4.2
4.35 Form of 1.450% Senior Note due 2026 (included in
Exhibit 4.34) Form of 1.450% Senior Note due 2026
(included in Exhibit 4.34)8-K 5/17/2021 4.3
4.36 Seventeenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
May 17, 2021, between Equinix, Inc. and U.S. Bank
National Association, as Trustee8-K 5/17/2021 4.4
4.37 Form of 2.000% Senior Note due 2028 (included in
Exhibit 4.36)8-K 5/17/2021 4.5
4.38 Eighteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated May 17,
2021, between Equinix, Inc. and U.S. Bank National
Association, as Trustee8-K 5/17/2021 4.6
4.39 Form of 2.500% Senior Note due 2031 (included in
Exhibit 4.38)8-K 5/17/2021 4.7
4.40 Nineteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated May 17,
2021, between Equinix, Inc. and U.S. Bank National
Association, as Trustee8-K 5/17/2021 4.8
4.41 Form of 3.400% Senior Note due 2052 (included in
Exhibit 4.40)8-K 5/17/2021 4.9
4.42 Form of Registrant's Common Stock Certificate. 10-K 12/31/2014 4.13
4.43 Description of Securities. X
10.1** Form of Indemnification Agreement between the
Registrant and each of its officers and directors.S-4 (File No.
333-93749)12/29/1999 10.5
10.2** 2000 Equity Incentive Plan, as amended. X
10.3** 2020 Equity Incentive Plan DEF14A 4/27/2020 Appendix A
10.4** Equinix, Inc. 2004 Employee Stock Purchase Plan,
as amended.10-Q 6/30/2014 10.5
10.5** 2019 Form of Revenue/AFFO per Share Restricted
Stock Unit Agreement for Executives.10-Q 3/31/2019 10.29
10.6** 2019 Form of TSR Restricted Stock Unit Agreement
for Executives.10-Q 3/31/2019 10.3
10.7** 2019 Form of Time-Based Restricted Stock Unit
Agreement for Executives.10-Q 3/31/2019 10.31
10.8** 2020 Form of Revenue/AFFO per Share Restricted
Stock Unit Agreement for Executives.10-Q 3/31/2020 10.19
10.9** 2020 Form of TSR Restricted Stock Unit Agreement
for Executives.10-Q 3/31/2020 10.2
83
Table of Contents
Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
Number Exhibit Description FormFiling Date/
Period End Date ExhibitFiled
Herewith
10.10** 2020 Form of Time-Based Restricted Stock
Agreement for Executives.10-Q 3/31/2020 10.21
10.11** 2021 Form of Revenue/AFFO per Share Restricted
Stock Unit Agreement for Executives.10-Q 3/31/2021 10.11
10.12** 2021 Form of TSR Restricted Stock Unit Agreement
for Executives.10-Q 3/31/2021 10.12
10.13** 2021 Form of Time-Based Restricted Stock Unit
Agreement for Executives.10-Q 3/31/2021 10.13
10.14** 2021 Equinix, Inc. Annual Incentive Plan. 10-Q 3/31/2021 10.14
10.15 Agreement for Purchase and Sale of Shares Among
RW Brasil Fundo de Investimentos em Participação,
Antônio Eduardo Zago De Carvalho and Sidney
Victor da Costa Breyer, as Sellers, and Equinix Brasil
Participaçãoes Ltda., as Purchaser, and Equinix
South America Holdings LLC., as a Party for Limited
Purposes and ALOG Soluções de Tecnologia em
Informática S.A. as Intervening Consenting Party
dated July 18, 2014.10-Q 9/30/2014 10.67
10.16 Share Purchase Agreement with Digital Realty Trust,
L.P., relating to the sale and purchase of shares in
TelecityGroup UK LON Limited, Telecity Netherlands
AMS01 AMS04 BV, Equinix Real Estate (TCY
AMS04) B.V. and TelecityGroup Germany Fra2
GmbH, dated May 14, 2016.10-Q 6/30/2016 10.55
10.17 Credit Agreement dated as of December 12, 2017
among Equinix, Inc. as Borrower, The Guarantors
Parties (defined therein), Bank of America, N.A., as
Administrative Agent, Lender and L/C issuer,
Barclays Bank PLS, Goldman Sachs Bank USA,
HSBC Securities (USA) Inc. ING Capital LLC, TD
Securities (USA) LLC, and Wells Fargo Bank,
National Association as Co-Documentation Agents,
the Other Lenders Party (defined therein) and Bank
of America, N.A., Citibank, N.A., JPMorgan Chase
Bank, N.A., MUFG, and RBC Capital Markets as
Joint Lead Arrangers and Joint Book Runners.10-K 12/31/2017 10.40
10.18 Consent and First Amendment to Credit Agreement,
dated as of June 28, 2018 by and among Equinix,
Inc. as Borrower, the Guarantors (defined therein),
the Lenders (as such term is defined in the Credit
Agreement referred to therein), and BANK OF
AMERICA, N.A., as Administrative Agent.10-Q 8/8/2018 10.35
10.19 Second Amendment to Credit Agreement, dated as of
July 26, 2018, by and between Equinix, Inc. as
Borrower, the financial institutions defined therein,
MUFG Bank, Ltd., as Technical Agent and Bank of
America, N.A. as Administrative Agent, under that
certain Credit Agreement dated December 12, 2017.10-Q 8/8/2018 10.36
84
Table of Contents
Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
Number Exhibit Description FormFiling Date/
Period End Date ExhibitFiled
Herewith
10.20 Third Amendment to Credit Agreement, dated as of
April 26, 2019, by and among Equinix, Inc., Delaware
corporation ("Equinix" or the "Borrower"), each
"Lender" (as such term is defined in the Credit
Agreement referred to therein) party hereto, and
BANK OF AMERICA, N.A., as Administrative Agent,
under that certain Credit Agreement dated December
12, 2017.10-Q 6/30/2019 10.34
10.21 Credit Agreement dated April 15, 2020, by and
among Equinix, as borrower, a syndicate of financial
institutions, as lenders, MUFG Bank, Ltd.as
administrative agent, and MUFG Union Bank, N.A.,
Sumitomo, Mitsui Banking Corporation, TD Securities
(USA) LLC and Mizuho Bank, Ltd., as joint lead
arrangers.10-Q 6/30/2020 10.25
10.22 Credit Agreement dated January 7, 2021 by and
among Equinix, as borrower, a syndicate of financial
institutions, as lenders, Bank of America, N.A., as
administrative agent, Citibank, N.A., JPMorgan
Chase Bank, N.A., MUFG Bank, Ltd., RBC Capital
Markets, Goldman Sachs Bank USA and HSBC
Securities (USA) Inc., as co-syndication agents,
Barclays Bank PLC, BNP Paribas, Deutsche Bank
AG New York Branch, ING Bank N.V., Dublin Branch,
Morgan Stanley Senior Funding, Inc., Sumitomo
Mitsui Banking Corporation, The Bank of Nova Scotia
and TD Securities (USA) LLC, as co-documentation
agents, and BofA Securities, Inc., Citibank, N.A.,
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., MUFG Bank, Ltd., RBC
Capital Markets, Goldman Sachs Bank USA and
HSBC Securities (USA) Inc., as joint lead arrangers
and book runnersX
10.23** Relocation Letter Agreement by and between
Equinix, Inc. and Charles Meyers dated October 12,
2018.10-K 2/22/2019 10.37
10.24** Change in Control Severance Agreement between
Equinix, Inc and Mike Campbell dated October 3,
2019.10-Q 9/30/2019 10.25
10.25** Change in Control Severance Agreement between
Equinix, Inc and Brandi Galvin Morandi dated
October 3, 2019.10-Q 9/30/2019 10.26
10.26** Change in Control Severance Agreement between
Equinix, Inc and Karl Strohmeyer dated October 3,
2019.10-Q 9/30/2019 10.27
10.27** Change in Control Severance Agreement between
Equinix, Inc and Peter Van Camp dated October 3,
2019.10-Q 9/30/2019 10.28
10.28** Change in Control Severance Agreement between
Equinix, Inc and Charles Meyers dated October 4,
2019.10-Q 9/30/2019 10.29
85
Table of Contents
Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
Number Exhibit Description FormFiling Date/
Period End Date ExhibitFiled
Herewith
10.29** Change in Control Severance Agreement between
Equinix, Inc and Keith Taylor dated October 3, 2019.10-Q 9/30/2019 10.31
10.30** Change in Control Severance Agreement between
Equinix, Inc and Sara Baack dated October 3, 2019.10-Q 9/30/2019 10.32
10.31** Side Letter Agreement Regarding RSUs between
Equinix, Inc. and Sara Baack dated October 3, 2019.10-Q 9/30/2019 10.33
10.32** Side Letter Agreement Regarding RSUs between
Equinix, Inc. and Charles Meyers dated October 4,
2019.10-Q 9/30/2019 10.34
10.33** Side Letter Agreement Regarding RSUs between
Equinix, Inc. and Keith Taylor dated October 3, 2019.10-Q 9/30/2019 10.36
10.34** Side Letter Agreement Regarding RSUs between
Equinix, Inc. and Mike Campbell dated October 3,
2019.10-Q 9/30/2019 10.37
10.35** Side Letter Agreement Regarding RSUs between
Equinix, Inc. and Brandi Galvin Morandi dated
October 3, 2019.10-Q 9/30/2019 10.38
10.36** Side Letter Agreement Regarding RSUs between
Equinix, Inc. and Karl Strohmeyer dated October 3,
2019.10-Q 9/30/2019 10.39
10.37** Side Letter Agreement Regarding RSUs between
Equinix, Inc. and Peter Van Camp dated October 3,
2019.10-Q 9/30/2019 10.40
10.38** Separation Agreement and General Release of
Claims between Equinix, Inc. and Sara Baack dated
September 20, 2021.10-Q 9/30/2021 10.37
21.1 Subsidiaries of Equinix, Inc. X
23.1 Consent of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP,
Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm.X
31.1 Chief Executive Officer Certification pursuant to
Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
31.2 Chief Financial Officer Certification pursuant to
Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
32.1 Chief Executive Officer Certification pursuant to
Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
32.2 Chief Financial Officer Certification pursuant to
Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
101.INS XBRL Instance Document - the instance document
does not appear in the Interactive Data File because
its XBRL tags are embedded within the Inline XBRL
document.X
86
Table of Contents
Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
Number Exhibit Description FormFiling Date/
Period End Date ExhibitFiled
Herewith
101.SCH Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema
Document.X
101.CAL Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Calculation
Linkbase Document.X
101.DEF Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Definition Linkbase
Document.X
101.LAB Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Label Linkbase
Document.X
101.PRE Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Presentation
Linkbase Document.X
104 Cover Page Interactive Data File - the cover page
interactive data file does not appear in the Interactive
Data File because its XBRL tags are embedded
within the Inline XBRL document.X
** Management contracts or compensation plans or arrangements in which directors or executive officers are eligible to participate.
(b) Exhibits.
See (a) (3) above.
(c) Financial Statement Schedule.
See (a) (2) above.
ITEM 16.    Form 10-K Summary
Not applicable.
87
Table of Contents
Signatures
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this
Annual Report on Form 10-K to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
EQUINIX, INC.
(Registrant)
February 18, 2022 By /s/ CHARLES MEYERS
Charles Meyers
Chief Executive Officer and President
Power of Attorney
KNOW ALL PERSONS BY THESE PRESENTS, that each person whose signature appears below constitutes and appoints
Charles Meyers or Keith D. Taylor, or either of them, each with the power of substitution, their attorney-in-fact, to sign any
amendments to this Annual Report on Form 10-K (including post-effective amendments), and to file the same, with exhibits thereto
and other documents in connection therewith, with the Securities and Exchange Commission, hereby ratifying and confirming all
that each of said attorneys-in-fact, or their substitute or substitutes, may do or cause to be done by virtue hereof.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following
persons on behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated.
88
Table of Contents
Signature Title Date
/s/ CHARLES MEYERS Chief Executive Officer and President (Principal Executive
Officer)February 18, 2022
Charles Meyers
/s/ KEITH D. TAYLOR Chief Financial Officer (Principal Financial Officer) February 18, 2022
Keith D. Taylor
/s/ SIMON MILLER Chief Accounting Officer (Principal Accounting Officer) February 18, 2022
Simon Miller
/s/ PETER F. VAN CAMP Executive Chairman February 18, 2022
Peter F. Van Camp
/s/ NANCI CALDWELL Director February 18, 2022
Nanci Caldwell
/s/ ADAIRE FOX-MARTIN Director February 18, 2022
Adaire Fox-Martin
Director
Ron Guerrier
/s/ GARY F. HROMADKO Director February 18, 2022
Gary F. Hromadko
/s/ IRVING F. LYONS, III Director February 18, 2022
Irving F. Lyons, III
/s/ CHRISTOPHER B. PAISLEY Director February 18, 2022
Christopher B. Paisley
/s/ SANDRA RIVERA Director February 18, 2022
Sandra Rivera
89
Table of Contents
Index to Exhibits
Exhibit
Number Description of Document
4.43 Description of Securities
10.2** 2000 Equity Incentive Plan, as amended
10.22 Credit Agreement dated January 7, 2021 by and among Equinix, as borrower, a syndicate of financial institutions,
as lenders, Bank of America, N.A., as administrative agent, Citibank, N.A., JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., MUFG
Bank, Ltd., RBC Capital Markets, Goldman Sachs Bank USA and HSBC Securities (USA) Inc., as co-syndication
agents, Barclays Bank PLC, BNP Paribas, Deutsche Bank AG New York Branch, ING Bank N.V., Dublin Branch,
Morgan Stanley Senior Funding, Inc., Sumitomo Mitsui Banking Corporation, The Bank of Nova Scotia and TD
Securities (USA) LLC, as co-documentation agents, and BofA Securities, Inc., Citibank, N.A., JPMorgan Chase
Bank, N.A., MUFG Bank, Ltd., RBC Capital Markets, Goldman Sachs Bank USA and HSBC Securities (USA) Inc.,
as joint lead arrangers and book runners
21.1 Subsidiaries of Equinix, Inc.
23.1 Consent of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm.
31.1 Chief Executive Officer Certification pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
31.2 Chief Financial Officer Certification pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
32.1 Chief Executive Officer Certification pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
32.2 Chief Financial Officer Certification pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
101.INS XBRL Instance Document - the instance document does not appear in the Interactive Data File because its XBRL
tags are embedded within the Inline XBRL document.
101.SCH Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema Document.
101.CAL Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Calculation Document.
101.DEF Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Definition Document.
101.LAB Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Labels Document.
101. PRE Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Presentation Document.
104 Cover Page Interactive Data File - the cover page interactive data file does not appear in the Interactive Data File
because its XBRL tags are embedded within the Inline XBRL document.
** Management contracts or compensation plans or arrangements in which directors or executive officers are eligible to participate.
90
Table of Contents
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
To the Board of Directors and Stockholders of Equinix, Inc.
Opinions on the Financial Statements and Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Equinix, Inc. and its subsidiaries (the “Company”) as of
December 31, 2021 and 2020, and the related consolidated statements of operations, of comprehensive income (loss), of
stockholders' equity and other comprehensive income (loss) and of cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended
December 31, 2021, including the related notes and financial statement schedule listed in the index appearing under Item 15(a)(2)
(collectively referred to as the “consolidated financial statements”). We also have audited the Company's internal control over
financial reporting as of December 31, 2021, based on criteria established in Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013) issued
by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO).
In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of
the Company as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in
the period ended December 31, 2021 in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
Also in our opinion, the Company maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2021, based on criteria established in Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the COSO.
Change in Accounting Principle
As discussed in Note 1 to the consolidated financial statements, the Company changed the manner in which it accounts for leases
as of January 1, 2019.
Basis for Opinions
The Company's management is responsible for these consolidated financial statements, for maintaining effective internal control
over financial reporting, and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting, included in
Management's Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting appearing under Item 9A. Our responsibility is to express
opinions on the Company's consolidated financial statements and on the Company's internal control over financial reporting based
on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
(PCAOB) and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and
the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audits to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the consolidated financial statements are free of material misstatement,
whether due to error or fraud, and whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material respects.
Our audits of the consolidated financial statements included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of
the consolidated financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such
procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the consolidated financial
statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as
well as evaluating the overall presentation of the consolidated financial statements. Our audit of internal control over financial
reporting included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material
weakness exists, and testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk.
Our audits also included performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our
audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinions.
F-1
Table of Contents
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company's internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability
of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles. A company's internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (i) pertain to
the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of
the company; (ii) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial
statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are
being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (iii) provide reasonable
assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company's assets that
could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also,
projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because
of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matter communicated below is a matter arising from the current period audit of the consolidated financial
statements that was communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (i) relates to accounts or
disclosures that are material to the consolidated financial statements and (ii) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or
complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on the consolidated financial
statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matter below, providing a separate opinion on the
critical audit matter or on the accounts or disclosures to which it relates.
Income taxes - Real estate investment trust asset tests
As described in Notes 1 and 14 to the consolidated financial statements, the Company recorded income tax expense of $109.2
million for the year ended December 31, 2021. The Company has been operating as a real estate investment trust for federal
income tax purposes ("REIT") effective January 1, 2015. As a result, the Company may deduct the dividends made to its
stockholders from taxable income generated by the Company and that of its qualified REIT subsidiaries ("QRSs"). The Company’s
qualification and taxation as a REIT depend on its satisfaction of certain asset, income, organizational, distribution, stockholder
ownership and other requirements on a continuing basis. The Company’s ability to satisfy quarterly asset tests depends upon its
analysis and the fair market values of its REIT and non-REIT assets. For purposes of the quarterly REIT asset tests, management
estimates the fair market value of assets within its QRSs and taxable REIT subsidiaries (“TRSs”) using a discounted cash flow
approach, by calculating the present value of forecasted future cash flows. Management applies discount rates based on industry
benchmarks relative to the market and forecasting risks. Other significant assumptions used by management to estimate the fair
market value of assets in QRSs and TRSs include projected revenue growth, projected operating margins, and projected capital
expenditures. Management revisits significant assumptions periodically to reflect any changes due to business or economic
environment.
The principal considerations for our determination that performing procedures relating to income taxes - REIT asset tests is a critical
audit matter are (i) the significant judgment by management when determining the fair market value of REIT and non-REIT assets,
which in turn led to a high degree of subjectivity in performing procedures relating to the REIT asset tests, (ii) the significant audit
effort and judgment in evaluating audit evidence related to the significant assumptions used in the REIT asset test, related to the
discount rates, projected revenue growth, projected operating margins, and projected capital expenditures, and (iii) the audit effort
involved the use of professionals with specialized skill and knowledge.
Addressing the matter involved performing procedures and evaluating audit evidence in connection with forming our overall opinion
on the consolidated financial statements. These procedures included testing the effectiveness of controls relating to the REIT asset
tests, including controls over management's determination of the fair market value of REIT and non-REIT assets. These procedures
also included, among others, testing management’s process for estimating the fair market value of the REIT and non-REIT assets;
evaluating the appropriateness of the
F-2
Table of Contents
discounted cash flow approach; testing the completeness and accuracy of underlying data used in the approach; and evaluating the
significant assumptions used by management related to the discount rates, projected revenue growth, projected operating margins,
and projected capital expenditures. Evaluating management’s assumptions related to projected revenue growth, projected operating
margins, and projected capital expenditures involved considering the current and past performance of the Company, economic and
industry trends, as well as whether these assumptions were consistent with evidence obtained in other areas of the audit.
Professionals with specialized skill and knowledge were used to assist in the evaluation of the Company’s discounted cash flow
approach and the assumptions related to discount rates.
/s/ PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP
San Jose, California
February 18, 2022
We have served as the Company's auditor since 2000.
F-3
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
Consolidated Balance Sheets
(in thousands, except share and per share data)
December 31,
2021 2020
Assets
Current assets:
Cash and cash equivalents $ 1,536,358 $ 1,604,869 
Short-term investments — 4,532 
Accounts receivable, net of allowance of $11,635 and $10,677 681,809 676,738 
Other current assets 462,739 323,016 
Assets held for sale 276,195 — 
Total current assets 2,957,101 2,609,155 
Property, plant and equipment, net 15,445,775 14,503,084 
Operating lease right-of-use assets 1,282,418 1,475,057 
Goodwill 5,372,071 5,472,553 
Intangible assets, net 1,935,267 2,170,945 
Other assets 926,066 776,047 
Total assets $27,918,698 $27,006,841 
Liabilities and Stockholders' Equity
Current liabilities:
Accounts payable and accrued expenses $ 879,144 $ 844,862 
Accrued property, plant and equipment 187,334 301,155 
Current portion of operating lease liabilities 144,029 154,207 
Current portion of finance lease liabilities 147,841 137,683 
Current portion of mortgage and loans payable 33,087 82,289 
Current portion of senior notes — 150,186 
Other current liabilities 214,519 354,368 
Total current liabilities 1,605,954 2,024,750 
Operating lease liabilities, less current portion 1,107,180 1,308,627 
Finance lease liabilities, less current portion 1,989,668 1,784,816 
Mortgage and loans payable, less current portion 586,577 1,287,254 
Senior notes, less current portion 10,984,144 9,018,277 
Other liabilities 763,411 948,999 
Total liabilities 17,036,934 16,372,723 
Commitments and contingencies (Note 15)
Equinix stockholders' equity:
Preferred stock, $0.001 par value per share: 100,000,000 shares authorized in 2021 and
2020; zero shares issued and outstanding — — 
Common stock, $0.001 par value per share: 300,000,000 shares authorized in 2021 and
2020; 90,872,826 issued and 90,571,406 outstanding in 2021 and 89,462,304 issued and
89,134,252 outstanding in 2020 91 89 
Additional paid-in capital 15,984,597 15,028,357 
Treasury stock, at cost; 301,420 shares in 2021 and 328,052 shares in 2020 (112,208) (122,118)
Accumulated dividends (6,165,140) (5,119,274)
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (1,085,751) (913,368)
Retained earnings 2,260,493 1,760,302 
Total Equinix stockholders' equity 10,882,082 10,633,988 
Non-controlling interests (318) 130 
Total stockholders' equity 10,881,764 10,634,118 
Total liabilities and stockholders' equity $27,918,698 $27,006,841 
See accompanying notes to consolidated financial statements.
F-4
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
Consolidated Statements of Operations
(in thousands, except per share data)
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
Revenues $ 6,635,537 $ 5,998,545 $ 5,562,140 
Costs and operating expenses:
Cost of revenues 3,472,422 3,074,340 2,810,184 
Sales and marketing 741,232 718,356 651,046 
General and administrative 1,301,797 1,090,981 935,018 
Transaction costs 22,769 55,935 24,781 
Impairment charges — 7,306 15,790 
Gain on asset sales (10,845) (1,301) (44,310)
Total costs and operating expenses 5,527,375 4,945,617 4,392,509 
Income from operations 1,108,162 1,052,928 1,169,631 
Interest income 2,644 8,654 27,697 
Interest expense (336,082) (406,466) (479,684)
Other income (expense) (50,647) 6,913 27,778 
Loss on debt extinguishment (115,125) (145,804) (52,825)
Income before income taxes 608,952 516,225 692,597 
Income tax expense (109,224) (146,151) (185,352)
Net income 499,728 370,074 507,245 
Net (income) loss attributable to non-controlling interests 463 (297) 205 
Net income attributable to Equinix $ 500,191 $ 369,777 $ 507,450 
Earnings per share ("EPS") attributable to Equinix:
Basic EPS $ 5.57 $ 4.22 $ 6.03 
Weighted-average shares for basic EPS 89,772 87,700 84,140 
Diluted EPS $ 5.53 $ 4.18 $ 5.99 
Weighted-average shares for diluted EPS 90,409 88,410 84,679 
See accompanying notes to consolidated financial statements.
F-5
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income (Loss)
(in thousands)
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
Net income $ 499,728 $ 370,074 $ 507,245 
Other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax:
Foreign currency translation adjustment ("CTA") gain (loss), net of tax
effects of $0, $0 and $(51) (559,969) 548,560 (58,334)
Net investment hedge CTA gain (loss), net of tax effects of $0, $0 and $10 326,982 (444,553) 73,294 
Unrealized gain (loss) on cash flow hedges, net of tax effects of $(16,980),
$14,521 and $2,938 60,562 (82,790) (3,842)
Net actuarial gain (loss) on defined benefit plans, net of tax effects of $(14),
$(23) and $(9) 57 85 (48)
Total other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax (172,368) 21,302 11,070 
Comprehensive income, net of tax 327,360 391,376 518,315 
Net (income) loss attributable to non-controlling interests 463 (297) 205 
Other comprehensive (income) loss attributable to non-controlling interests (15) (57) 19 
Comprehensive income attributable to Equinix $ 327,808 $ 391,022 $ 518,539 
See accompanying notes to consolidated financial statements.
F-6
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
Consolidated Statements of Stockholders' Equity and Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)
For the Three Years Ended December 31, 2021
(in thousands, except share data)
AOCI
(Loss)Retained
EarningsEquinix
Stockholders'
EquityNon-
controlling
InterestsTotal
Stockholders'
EquityCommon stock Treasury stock Additional
Paid-in
CapitalAccumulated
Dividends Shares Amount Shares Amount
Balance as of
December 31,
2018 81,119,117 $81 (396,859)$(145,161)$10,751,313 $(3,331,200)$(945,702)$889,948 $7,219,279 $ — $7,219,279 
Adjustment
from adoption
of new
accounting
standard — — — — — — — (5,973) (5,973) — (5,973)
Net income
(loss) — — — — — — — 507,450 507,450 (205) 507,245 
Other
comprehensive
income (loss) — — — — — — 11,089 — 11,089 (19) 11,070 
Issuance of
common stock
and release of
treasury stock
for employee
equity awards 692,706 1 4,292 905 51,111 — — — 52,017 — 52,017 
Issuance of
common stock
for equity
offering 2,985,575 3 — — 1,213,431 — — — 1,213,434 — 1,213,434 
Issuance of
common stock
under ATM
Program 903,555 1 — — 447,541 — — — 447,542 — 447,542 
Dividend
distribution on
common stock,
$9.84 per
share — — — — — (825,893) — — (825,893) — (825,893)
Settlement of
accrued
dividends on
vested equity
awards — — — — 308 (688) — — (380) — (380)
Accrued
dividends on
unvested
equity awards — — — — — (10,688) — — (10,688) — (10,688)
Stock-based
compensation,
net of
estimated
forfeitures — — — — 232,729 — — — 232,729 — 232,729 
Balance as of
December 31,
2019 85,700,953 86 (392,567)(144,256)12,696,433 (4,168,469)(934,613)1,391,425 8,840,606 (224) 8,840,382 
Adjustment
from adoption
of new
accounting
standard — — — — — — — (900) (900) — (900)
Net income — — — — — — — 369,777 369,777 297 370,074 
Other
comprehensive
income — — — — — — 21,245 — 21,245 57 21,302 
Issuance of
common stock
and release of
treasury stock
for employee
equity awards 758,339 — 64,515 22,138 39,979 — — — 62,117 — 62,117 
Issuance of
common stock
for equity
offering 2,587,500 3 — — 1,683,103 — — — 1,683,106 — 1,683,106 
Issuance of
common stock
under ATM
Program 415,512 — — — 298,269 — — — 298,269 — 298,269 
Dividend
distribution on
common stock,
$10.64 per
share — — — — — (936,269) — — (936,269) — (936,269)
Settlement of
accrued
dividends on
vested equity
awards — — — — 189 (770) — — (581) — (581)
Accrued
dividends on
unvested
equity awards — — — — — (13,766) — — (13,766) — (13,766)
Stock-based
compensation,
net of
estimated
forfeitures — — — — 310,384 — — — 310,384 — 310,384 
F-7
Table of Contents
EQUINIX INC.
Consolidated Statements of Stockholders' Equity and Other Comprehensive Income (Loss) - Continued
For the Three Years Ended December 31, 2021
(in thousands, except share data)
AOCI (Loss)Retained
EarningsEquinix
Stockholders'
EquityNon-
controlling
InterestsTotal
Stockholders'
EquityCommon stock Treasury stock Additional
Paid-in
CapitalAccumulated
Dividends Shares Amount Shares Amount
Balance as of
December 31,
2020 89,462,304 89 (328,052)(122,118)15,028,357 (5,119,274) (913,368)1,760,302 10,633,988 130 10,634,118 
Net income
(loss) — — — — — — — 500,191 500,191 (463) 499,728 
Other
comprehensive
income (loss) — — — — — — (172,383) — (172,383) 15 (172,368)
Issuance of
common
stock and
release of
treasury
stock for
employee
equity awards 772,905 1 26,632 9,910 67,718 — — — 77,629 — 77,629 
Issuance of
common
stock under
ATM Program 637,617 1 — — 497,869 — — — 497,870 — 497,870 
Dividend
distribution
on common
stock, $11.48
per share — — — — — (1,030,005) — — (1,030,005) — (1,030,005)
Settlement of
accrued
dividends on
vested equity
awards — — — — — (839) — — (839) — (839)
Accrued
dividends on
unvested
equity awards — — — — — (15,022) — — (15,022) — (15,022)
Stock-based
compensation,
net of
estimated
forfeitures — — — — 390,653 — — — 390,653 — 390,653 
Balance as of
December 31,
2021 90,872,826 $91 (301,420)$(112,208)$15,984,597 $(6,165,140)$(1,085,751)$2,260,493 $10,882,082 $ (318)$10,881,764 
See accompanying notes to consolidated financial statements.
F-8
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
(in thousands)
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
Cash flows from operating activities:
Net income $ 499,728 $ 370,074 $ 507,245 
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:
Depreciation 1,450,806 1,224,322 1,088,559 
Stock-based compensation 363,774 294,952 236,539 
Amortization of intangible assets 205,484 199,047 196,278 
Amortization of debt issuance costs and debt discounts and premiums 17,135 15,739 13,042 
Provision for credit loss allowance 10,016 5,069 8,459 
Impairment charges — 7,306 15,790 
Gain on asset sales (10,845) (1,301) (44,310)
Loss on debt extinguishment 115,125 145,804 52,825 
Other items 28,717 16,643 11,620 
Changes in operating assets and liabilities:
Accounts receivable (1,873) 25,412 (26,909)
Income taxes, net (16,602) (22,641) 32,495 
Other assets (114,268) (129,817) (100,144)
Operating lease right-of-use assets 140,590 153,650 149,031 
Operating lease liabilities (177,533) (142,863) (152,091)
Accounts payable and accrued expenses 64,596 25,801 (27,928)
Other liabilities (27,644) 122,629 32,227 
Net cash provided by operating activities 2,547,206 2,309,826 1,992,728 
Cash flows from investing activities:
Purchases of investments (107,533) (127,763) (60,909)
Sales of investments 4,057 29,352 40,386 
Business acquisitions, net of cash and restricted cash acquired (158,498) (1,180,272) (34,143)
Real estate acquisitions (201,837) (200,182) (169,153)
Purchases of other property, plant and equipment (2,751,512) (2,282,504) (2,079,521)
Proceeds from sale of assets, net of cash transferred 208,585 334,397 358,773 
Net cash used in investing activities (3,006,738) (3,426,972) (1,944,567)
Cash flows from financing activities:
Proceeds from employee equity awards 77,628 62,118 52,018 
Payment of dividends (1,042,909) (947,933) (836,164)
Proceeds from public offering of common stock, net of issuance costs 497,870 1,981,375 1,660,976 
Proceeds from senior notes, net of debt discounts 3,878,662 4,431,627 2,797,906 
Proceeds from mortgage and loans payable — 750,790 — 
Repayment of senior notes (1,990,650) (4,363,761) (2,206,289)
Repayments of finance lease liabilities (165,539) (115,288) (126,486)
Repayments of mortgage and loans payable (717,010) (829,466) (73,227)
Debt extinguishment costs (99,185) (111,700) (43,311)
Debt issuance costs (25,102) (42,236) (23,341)
Net cash provided by financing activities 413,765 815,526 1,202,082 
Effect of foreign currency exchange rates on cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash (30,474) 40,702 8,766 
Net increase (decrease) in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash (76,241) (260,918) 1,259,009 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at beginning of period 1,625,695 1,886,613 627,604 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at end of period $ 1,549,454 $ 1,625,695 $ 1,886,613 
Supplemental cash flow information
Cash paid for taxes $ 134,411 $ 143,934 $ 136,583 
Cash paid for interest $ 426,439 $ 498,408 $ 553,815 
Cash and cash equivalents $ 1,536,358 $ 1,604,869 $ 1,869,577 
Current portion of restricted cash included in other current assets 12,188 11,135 7,090 
Non-current portion of restricted cash included in other assets 908 9,691 9,946 
Total cash, cash equivalents, and restricted cash shown in the consolidated statement of cash
flows $ 1,549,454 $ 1,625,695 $ 1,886,613 
See accompanying notes to consolidated financial statements.
F-9
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
1.    Nature of Business and Summary of Significant Accounting Policies
Nature of Business
Equinix, Inc. ("Equinix," the "Company," "we," "our," or "us") was incorporated in Delaware on June 22, 1998. Equinix provides
colocation space and related offerings. Global enterprises, content providers, financial companies and network service providers
rely upon Equinix's insight and expertise to safehouse and connect their most valued information assets. We operate International
Business Exchange ("IBX") data centers, or IBX data centers, across the Americas; Europe, Middle East and Africa ("EMEA")
and Asia-Pacific geographic regions where customers directly interconnect with a network ecosystem of partners and customers.
More than 2,000 network service providers offer access to the world's internet routes inside our IBX data centers. This access to
internet routes provides Equinix customers improved reliability and streamlined connectivity while significantly reducing costs by
reaching a critical mass of networks within a centralized physical location. As of December 31, 2021, we operated 240 IBX data
centers in 66 markets around the world.
We have been operating as a real estate investment trust for federal income tax purposes ("REIT") effective January 1, 2015.
See "Income Taxes" in Note 14 below for additional information.
Basis of Presentation, Consolidation and Foreign Currency
The accompanying consolidated financial statements include the accounts of Equinix and its subsidiaries, including the
acquisitions of:
•Switch Datacenters' AMS1 data center business in Amsterdam, Netherlands from April 18, 2019;
•Three data centers in Mexico acquired from Axtel S.A.B. de C.V ("Axtel") from January 8, 2020;
•Packet Host, Inc. (“Packet”), including its operations and technology, from March 2, 2020;
•12 data center sites across Canada from BCE Inc. ("Bell") from October 1, 2020 and one additional data center site from
November 2, 2020; and
•Two data center sites in Mumbai, India from GPX India ("GPX India Acquisition") from September 1, 2021.
We consolidate all entities that are wholly owned and those entities in which we own less than 100% of the equity but control,
including variable interest entities ("VIEs") for which we are the primary beneficiary. Our investment in consolidated VIEs have not
been material to our consolidated financial statements as of and for the periods presented. All intercompany accounts and
transactions have been eliminated in consolidation. Foreign exchange gains or losses resulting from foreign currency transactions,
including intercompany foreign currency transactions, that are anticipated to be repaid within the foreseeable future, are reported
within other income (expense) on our accompanying consolidated statements of operations. For additional information on the
impact of foreign currencies to our consolidated financial statements, see "Accumulated Other Comprehensive Loss" in Note 12.
Use of Estimates
The preparation of consolidated financial statements in conformity with the accounting principles generally accepted in the
United States of America ("GAAP") requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of
assets and liabilities and disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the consolidated financial statements and the
reported amounts of revenues and expenses during the reporting period. Actual results could differ from these estimates. On an
ongoing basis, we evaluate our estimates, including, but not limited to, those related to the allowance for credit losses, fair values of
financial and derivative instruments, intangible assets and goodwill, assets acquired and liabilities assumed from acquisitions,
useful lives of intangible assets and property, plant and equipment, leases, asset retirement obligations, other accruals, and income
taxes. We base our estimates on historical experience and on various other assumptions that are believed to be reasonable.TM ®
F-10
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
Cash, Cash Equivalents and Short-Term Investments
We consider all highly liquid instruments with an original maturity from the date of purchase of 90 days or less to be cash
equivalents. Cash equivalents consist of money market mutual funds and certificates of deposit with original maturities up to 90
days. Short-term investments generally consist of certificates of deposit with original maturities of between 90 days and 1 year.
Publicly traded equity securities are measured at fair value with changes in the fair values recognized within other income
(expense) in our consolidated statements of operations. We review our investment portfolio quarterly to determine if any securities
may be other-than-temporarily impaired due to increased credit risk, changes in industry or sector of a certain instrument or ratings
downgrades.
Equity Method Investments
We enter into joint venture or partnership arrangements to invest in certain entities for business development objectives. At the
inception of these arrangements and if a reconsideration event has occurred, we assess our interests with such entities to
determine whether any of the entities meet the definition of a VIE. A VIE is an entity that either (i) has insufficient equity to permit the
entity to finance its activities without additional subordinated financial support, or (ii) has equity investors who lack the
characteristics of a controlling financial interest. We are required to consolidate the assets and liabilities of VIEs when we are
deemed to be the primary beneficiary. The primary beneficiary of a VIE is the entity that meets both of the following criteria: (i) has
the power to make decisions that most significantly affect the economic performance of the VIE; and (ii) has the obligation to absorb
losses or the right to receive benefits that in either case could potentially be significant to the VIE. For VIEs where we are not the
primary beneficiary, and other joint ventures or partnerships that are not VIEs, where we have the ability to exercise significant
influence over the entity, we account for our investment under the equity method of accounting.
Equity method investments are initially measured at cost, or at fair value when the investment represents a retained equity
interest in a deconsolidated business or derecognized distinct non-financial assets. Equity investments are subsequently adjusted
for cash contributions, distributions and our share of the income and losses of the investees. We record our equity method
investments in other assets in the consolidated balance sheet. Our proportionate shares of the income or loss from our equity
method investments are recorded in other income in the consolidated statement of operations.
We review our investments quarterly to determine if any investments may be impaired considering both qualitative and
quantitative factors that may have a significant impact on the investees' fair value. We did not record any impairment charges
related to our equity method investments for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019. For further information on our
Equity Method Investments, see Note 6.
Non-marketable Equity Investments
We also have investments in non-marketable equity securities, where we do not have the ability to exercise significant influence
over the investees. We elected the measurement alternative under which the securities are measured at cost minus impairment, if
any, and adjusted for changes resulting from qualifying observable price changes. We record non-marketable equity investment in
other assets in the consolidated balance sheet. We review our non-marketable equity investments quarterly to determine if any
investments may be impaired considering both qualitative and quantitative factors that may have a significant impact on the
investees' fair value. We did not record any impairment charges related to our non-marketable equity investments for the years
ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019.
Financial Instruments and Concentration of Credit Risk
Financial instruments which potentially subject us to concentrations of credit risk consist of cash and cash equivalents, short-
term investments and accounts receivable. Risks associated with cash and cash equivalents and short-term investments are
mitigated by our investment policy, which limits our investing to only those marketable securities rated at least A-1/P-1 Short Term
Rating or A-/A3 Long Term Rating, as determined by independent credit rating agencies.
A significant portion of our customer base is comprised of businesses throughout the Americas. However, a portion of our
revenues are derived from our EMEA and Asia-Pacific operations. The following table sets forth percentages of our revenues by
geographic region for the years ended December 31:
F-11
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
2021 2020 2019
Americas 46 % 45 % 47 %
EMEA 32 % 33 % 32 %
Asia-Pacific 22 % 22 % 21 %
For further information on segment information, see Note 17.
Property, Plant and Equipment
Property, plant and equipment are stated at our original cost or at fair value for property, plant and equipment acquired through
acquisitions, net of depreciation. Depreciation is computed using the straight-line method over the estimated useful lives of the
respective assets. Buildings under finance leases, Leasehold improvements and integral equipment at leased locations are
amortized over the shorter of the lease term or the estimated useful life of the asset or improvement.
We capitalize certain internal and external costs associated with the development and purchase of internal-use software in
property, plant and equipment, net on the consolidated balance sheets. This includes costs incurred in cloud computing
arrangements ("CCA"), where it is both feasible and contractually permissible without significant penalty for us to take possession of
the software. All other CCAs are considered service contracts, and the licensing and implementation costs incurred associated with
such contracts are capitalized in other assets on the consolidated balance sheets. Capitalized internal-use software costs and
capitalized implementation costs are amortized on a straight-line basis over the estimated useful lives of the software or
arrangements.
Our estimated useful lives of property, plant and equipment are generally as follows:
Core systems 3-40 years
Buildings 12-60 years
Leasehold improvements 12-40 years
Personal Property, including capitalized internal-use software 3-10 years
Our construction in progress includes direct and indirect expenditures for the construction and expansion of IBX data centers
and is stated at original cost. We contracted out substantially all of the construction and expansion efforts of our IBX data centers to
independent contractors under construction contracts. Construction in progress includes costs incurred under construction contracts
including project management services, engineering and schematic design services, design development, construction services
and other construction-related fees and services. In addition, we capitalized interest costs during the construction phase. Once an
IBX data center or expansion project becomes operational, these capitalized costs are allocated to certain property, plant and
equipment categories and are depreciated over the estimated useful life of the underlying assets.
We review our property, plant and equipment for impairment whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the
carrying amount of an asset or an asset group may not be recoverable, such as a significant decrease in market price of an asset, a
significant adverse change in the extent or manner in which an asset or an asset group is being used or its physical condition, a
significant adverse change in legal factors or business climate that could affect the value of an asset or an asset group or a
continuous deterioration of our financial condition. Recoverability of assets or asset groups to be held and used is assessed by
comparing the carrying amount of an asset or an asset group to estimated undiscounted future net cash flows expected to be
generated by the asset or the asset group. If the carrying amount of the asset or the asset group exceeds its estimated
undiscounted future cash flows, an impairment charge is recognized in the amount by which the carrying amount of the asset or the
asset group exceeds the fair value of the asset. We did not record any impairment charges related to our property, plant and
equipment during the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019.
F-12
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
We enter into non-cancellable lease arrangements as the lessee primarily for our data center spaces, office spaces and
equipment. Assets acquired through finance leases are included in property, plant and equipment, net on the consolidated balance
sheets. In addition, a portion of our property, plant and equipment are used for revenue arrangements which are accounted for as
operating leases where we are the lessor.
Assets Held for Sale
Assets and liabilities to be disposed of that meet all of the criteria to be classified as held for sale are reported at the lower of
their carrying amounts or fair values less costs to sell. We recorded an impairment charge of $7.3 million relating to assets held for
sale for the year ended December 31, 2020. Assets are not depreciated or amortized while they are classified as held for sale. For
further information on our assets held for sale, see Note 5.
Asset Retirement Costs and Asset Retirement Obligations
Our asset retirement obligations are primarily related to our IBX data centers, of which the majority are leased under long-term
arrangements and are required to be returned to the landlords in their original condition. The majority of our IBX data center leases
have been subject to significant development by us in order to convert them from, in most cases, vacant buildings or warehouses
into IBX data centers. The fair value of a liability for an asset retirement obligation is recognized in the period in which it is incurred.
The associated retirement costs are capitalized and included as part of the carrying value of the long-lived asset and amortized
over the useful life of the asset. Subsequent to the initial measurement, we accrete the liability in relation to the asset retirement
obligations over time and the accretion expense is recorded as a cost of revenue. For further information on our leases, see Note 7.
Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets
We have three reportable segments comprised of the 1) Americas, 2) EMEA and 3) Asia-Pacific geographic regions, which we
also determined are our reporting units. Goodwill is not amortized and is tested for impairment at least annually or more often if and
when circumstances indicate that goodwill is not recoverable.
We assess qualitative factors to determine whether it is more likely than not that the fair value of a reporting unit is less than its
carrying value. Qualitative factors considered in the assessment include industry and market conditions, overall financial
performance, and other relevant events and factors affecting the reporting unit. If, after assessing the qualitative factors, we
determine that it is not more likely than not that the fair value of a reporting unit is less than its carrying value, then performing a
quantitative impairment test is unnecessary. However, if we conclude otherwise, then we are required to perform a quantitative
goodwill impairment test. The quantitative impairment test, which is used to identify both the existence of impairment and the
amount of impairment loss, compares the fair value of a reporting unit with its carrying amount, including goodwill. If the fair value of
a reporting unit exceeds its carrying amount, goodwill of the reporting unit is not considered impaired. If the carrying value of the
reporting unit exceeds its fair value, any excess of the reporting unit goodwill carrying value over the respective implied fair value is
recognized as an impairment loss.
As of December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, we concluded that it was more likely than not that goodwill attributed to our
Americas, EMEA and Asia-Pacific reporting units was not impaired as the fair value of each reporting unit exceeded the carrying
value of its respective reporting unit, including goodwill.
Substantially all of our intangible assets are subject to amortization and are amortized using the straight-line method over their
estimated period of benefit. We perform a review of intangible assets for impairment by assessing events or changes in
circumstances that indicate the carrying amount of an asset may not be recoverable. Recoverability of assets to be held and used is
assessed by comparing the carrying amount of an asset to estimated undiscounted future net cash flows expected to be generated
by the asset. If the carrying amount of the asset exceeds its estimated undiscounted future cash flows, an impairment charge is
recognized by the amount by which the carrying amount of the asset exceeds the fair value of the asset. We did not record any
impairment charges related to our other intangible assets during the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019. For further
information on goodwill and other intangible assets, see Note 3 and Note 7 below.
F-13
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
Debt Issuance Costs
Costs and fees incurred upon debt issuances are capitalized and are amortized over the life of the related debt based on the
effective interest method. Such amortization is included as a component of interest expense. Debt issuance costs related to
outstanding debt are presented as a reduction of the carrying amount of the debt obligation and debt issuance costs related to the
revolving credit facility are presented as other assets. For further information on debt facilities, see Note 11 below.
Derivatives and Hedging Activities
We use derivative instruments, including foreign currency forwards and options and cross-currency interest rate swaps, to
manage certain foreign currency exposures. Derivative instruments are viewed as risk management tools by us and are not used
for speculative purposes. We recognize all derivatives on our consolidated balance sheets at fair value. The accounting for changes
in the value of a derivative depends on whether the contract qualifies and has been designated for hedge accounting. In order to
qualify for hedge accounting, a derivative must be considered highly effective at reducing the risk associated with the exposure
being hedged and there must be documentation of the risk management objective and strategy, including identification of the
hedging instrument, the hedged item and the risk exposure, and the effectiveness assessment methodology. For cash flow hedges,
we use regression analysis at the time they are designated to assess their effectiveness. Hedge designations are reviewed on a
quarterly basis to assess whether circumstances have changed that would disrupt the hedge instrument's relationship to the
forecasted transactions or net investment.
We use the forward method to assess effectiveness of qualifying foreign currency forwards that are designated as cash flow
hedges, whereby, the change in the fair value of the derivative is recorded in other comprehensive income (loss) and reclassified to
the same line item in the consolidated statement of operations that is used to present the earnings effect of the hedged item when
the hedged item affects earnings. We use the spot method to assess effectiveness of qualifying foreign currency exchange options
that are designated as cash flow hedges, whereby, the change in fair value due to foreign currency exchange spot rates is recorded
in other comprehensive income (loss) and reclassified to the same line item in the consolidated statement of operations that is used
to present the earnings effect of the hedged item when the hedged item affects earnings, and the change in fair value of the
excluded component is recorded in other comprehensive income (loss) and amortized on a straight-line basis to the same line item
in the consolidated statement of operations that is used to present the earnings effect of the hedged item. When two or more
derivative instruments in combination are jointly designated as a cash flow hedging instrument, as with foreign currency exchange
option collars, they are treated as a single instrument. If the hedge relationship is terminated for any derivatives designated as cash
flow hedges, then the change in fair value of the derivative recorded in other comprehensive income (loss) is recognized in earnings
when the previously hedged item affects earnings, consistent with the original hedge strategy. For hedge relationships that are
discontinued because the forecasted transaction is not expected to occur according to the original strategy, then any related
derivative amounts recorded in other comprehensive income (loss) are immediately recognized in earnings.
From time to time, we use derivative instruments, including treasury locks and swap locks (collectively, "interest rate locks") to
manage certain interest rate exposures. An interest rate lock is a synthetic forward sale of a benchmark interest rate, which is
settled in cash based upon the difference between an agreed upon rate at inception and the prevailing benchmark rate at
settlement. It effectively fixes the benchmark rate component of an upcoming debt issuance. The interest rate lock transactions are
designated as cash flow hedges, with all changes in value reported in other comprehensive income (loss). Subsequent to
settlement, amounts in other comprehensive income are amortized to interest expense over the term of the forecasted hedged
transaction which is equivalent to the term interest rate locks.
We use the spot method to assess effectiveness of cross-currency interest rate swaps that are designated as net investment
hedges, whereby, the change in fair value due to foreign currency exchange spot rates is recorded in other comprehensive income
(loss) and the change in fair value of the excluded component is recorded in other comprehensive income (loss) and amortized to
interest expense on a straight-line basis.
From time to time, we also use foreign exchange forward contracts to hedge against the effect of foreign exchange rate
fluctuations on a portion of its net investment in the foreign subsidiaries. We use the spot method to assess effectiveness of
qualifying foreign currency forwards that are designated as net investment hedges, whereby, the change in fair value due to foreign
currency exchange spot rates is recorded in other comprehensive
F-14
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
income (loss) and the change in fair value of the excluded component is recorded in other comprehensive income (loss) and
amortized to interest expense on a straight-line basis.
Foreign currency gains or losses associated with derivatives that are not designated as hedging instruments for accounting
purposes are recorded within other income (expense) in our consolidated statements of operations, with the exception of (i) foreign
currency embedded derivatives contained in certain of our customer contracts and (ii) foreign exchange forward contracts that are
entered into to hedge the accounting impact of the foreign currency embedded derivatives, which are recorded within revenues in
our consolidated statements of operations. For further information on derivatives and hedging activities, see Note 8 below.
Fair Value of Financial Instruments
The carrying value of our cash and cash equivalents, short-term investments and derivative instruments represent their fair
value, while our accounts receivable, accounts payable and accrued expenses and accrued property, plant and equipment
approximate their fair value due primarily to the short-term maturity of the related instruments. The fair value of our debt, which is
traded in the public debt market, is based on quoted market prices. The fair value of our debt, which is not publicly traded, is
estimated by considering our credit rating, current rates available to us for debt of the same remaining maturities and terms of the
debt.
Fair Value Measurements
We measure and report certain financial assets and liabilities at fair value on a recurring basis, including our investments in
money market funds, certificates of deposit, publicly traded equity securities and derivatives.
We also follow the accounting standard for the measurement of fair value for non-financial assets and liabilities on a
nonrecurring basis. These include:
•Non-financial assets and non-financial liabilities initially measured at fair value in a business combination or other new basis
event, but not measured at fair value in subsequent reporting periods;
•Reporting units and non-financial assets and non-financial liabilities measured at fair value for goodwill impairment tests;
•Indefinite-lived intangible assets measured at fair value for impairment assessments;
•Non-financial long-lived assets or asset groups measured at fair value for impairment assessments or disposal;
•Asset retirement obligations initially measured at fair value but not subsequently measured at fair value; and
•Assets and liabilities classified as held for sale are measured at fair value less costs to sell and reported at the lower of the
carrying amounts or the fair values less costs to sell.
For further information on fair value measurements, see Note 5 and Note 9 below.
Leases
On January 1, 2019, we adopted Topic 842 using the alternative transition method and recognized an insignificant cumulative
effect of initially applying the standard as an adjustment to the opening balance of retained earnings.
We enter into lease arrangements primarily for land, data center spaces, office spaces and equipment. At its inception, we
determine whether an arrangement is or contains a lease. We recognize a right-of-use ("ROU") asset and lease liability on the
consolidated balance sheet for all leases with a term longer than 12 months, including renewals options that we are reasonably
certain to exercise.
ROU assets represent our right to use an underlying asset for the lease term. Lease liabilities represent our obligation to make
lease payments arising from the lease. ROU assets and liabilities are classified and recognized at the commencement date. When
there is a lease modification, including a change in lease term, we reassess its classification and remeasure the ROU asset and
lease liability.
F-15
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
ROU lease liabilities are measured based on the present value of fixed lease payments over the lease term. ROU assets
consist of (i) initial measurement of the lease liability; (ii) lease payments made to the lessor at or before the commencement date
less any lease incentives received; and (iii) initial direct costs incurred by us. Lease payments may vary because of changes in
facts or circumstances occurring after the commencement, including changes in inflation indices. Variable lease payments that
depend on an index or a rate (such as the Consumer Price Index or a market interest rate) are included in the measurement of
ROU assets and lease liabilities using the index or rate at the commencement date. Subsequent changes to lease payments based
on changes to the index and rate are accounted for as variable lease payments and recognized in the period they are incurred.
Variable lease payments that do not depend on an index or a rate are excluded from the measurement of ROU assets and lease
liabilities and are recognized in the period in which the obligation for those payments is incurred. Since most of our leases do not
provide an implicit rate, we use our own incremental borrowing rate ("IBR") on a collateralized basis in determining the present
value of lease payments. We utilize a market-based approach to estimate the IBR. The approach requires significant judgment.
Therefore, we utilize different data sets to estimate IBRs via an analysis of (i) sovereign rates; (ii) yields on our outstanding public
debt; and (iii) indicative pricing on both secured and unsecured debt received from banking partners. We also apply adjustments to
account for considerations related to (i) tenor; and (ii) country credit rating that may not be fully incorporated by the aforementioned
data sets.
The majority of our lease arrangements include options to extend the lease. If we are reasonably certain to exercise such
options, the periods covered by the options are included in the lease term. The depreciable lives of certain fixed assets and
leasehold improvements are limited by the expected lease term. We have certain leases with an initial term of 12 months or less.
For such leases, we elected not to recognize any ROU asset or lease liability on the consolidated balance sheet. We have lease
agreements with lease and non-lease components. We elected to account for the lease and non-lease components as a single
lease component for all classes of underlying assets for which we have identified as lease arrangements. For further information on
leases, see Note 10 below.
Revenue
Revenue Recognition
Equinix derives more than 90% of its revenues from recurring revenue streams, consisting primarily of (1) colocation, which
includes the licensing of cabinet space and power; (2) interconnection offerings, such as cross connects and Equinix Exchange
ports; (3) managed infrastructure solutions and (4) other revenues consisting of rental income from tenants or subtenants. The
remainder of our revenues are from non-recurring revenue streams, such as installation revenues, professional services, contract
settlements and equipment sales. Revenues by service lines and geographic areas are included in segment information. For further
information on segment information, see Note 17 below.
Under the revenue accounting guidance, revenues are recognized when control of these products and services is transferred to
its customers, in an amount that reflects the consideration it expects to be entitled to in exchange for the products and services.
Revenues from recurring revenue streams are generally billed monthly and recognized ratably over the term of the contract,
generally 1 to 3 years for IBX data center colocation customers. Non-recurring installation fees, although generally paid upfront
upon installation, are deferred and recognized ratably over the contract term. Professional service fees and equipment sales are
recognized in the period when the services were provided. For the contracts with customers that contain multiple performance
obligations, we account for individual performance obligations separately if they are distinct or as a series of distinct obligations if
the individual performance obligations meet the series criteria. Determining whether products and services are considered distinct
performance obligations that should be accounted for separately versus together may require significant judgment. The transaction
price is allocated to the separate performance obligation on a relative standalone selling price basis. The standalone selling price is
determined based on overall pricing objectives, taking into consideration market conditions, geographic locations and other factors.
Other judgments include determining if any variable consideration should be included in the total contract value of the arrangement
such as price increases.
Revenue is generally recognized on a gross basis as a principal versus on a net basis as an agent, as we are primarily
responsible for fulfilling the contract, bear inventory risk and have discretion in establishing the price when selling to the customer.
To the extent we do not meet the criteria for recognizing revenue on a gross basis, we record the revenue on a net basis. Revenue
from contract settlements, when a customer wishes to terminate their
F-16
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
contract early, is treated as a contract modification and recognized ratably over the remaining term of the contract, if any.
We guarantee certain service levels, such as uptime, as outlined in individual customer contracts. If these service levels are not
achieved due to any failure of the physical infrastructure or offerings, or in the event of certain instances of damage to customer
infrastructure within our IBX data centers, we would reduce revenue for any credits or cash payments given to the customer.
Historically, these credits and cash payments have not been significant.
We enter into revenue contracts with customers for data centers and office spaces, which contain both lease and non-lease
components. We elected to adopt the practical expedient which allows lessors to combine lease and non-lease components, by
underlying class of asset, and account for them as one component if they have the same timing and pattern of transfer. The
combined component is accounted for in accordance with the current lease accounting guidance ("Topic 842") if the lease
component is predominant, and in accordance with Topic 606 if the non-lease component is predominant. Lessors are permitted to
adopt this practical expedient on a retrospective or prospective basis. We elected to apply the practical expedient prospectively
based on classes of underlying assets. In general, customer contracts for data centers are accounted for under Topic 606 and
customer contracts for the use of office space are accounted for under Topic 842, which are generally classified as operating leases
and are recognized on a straight-line basis over the lease term.
Certain customer agreements are denominated in currencies other than the functional currencies of the parties involved. Under
applicable accounting rules, we are deemed to have foreign currency forward contracts embedded in these contracts. We assessed
these embedded contracts and concluded them to be foreign currency embedded derivatives (see Note 8). These instruments are
separated from their host contracts and held on our consolidated balance sheet at their fair value. The majority of these foreign
currency embedded derivatives arise in certain of our subsidiaries where the local currency is the subsidiary's functional currency
and the customer contract is denominated in the U.S. dollar. Changes in their fair values are recognized within revenues in our
consolidated statements of operations.
Contract Balances
The timing of revenue recognition, billings and cash collections result in accounts receivables, contract assets and deferred
revenues. A receivable is recorded at the invoice amount, net of an allowance for credit losses and is recognized in the period when
we have transferred products or provided services to our customers and when its right to consideration is unconditional. Payment
terms and conditions vary by contract type, although terms generally include a requirement of payment within 30 to 45 days. In
instances where the timing of revenue recognition differs from the timing of invoicing, we have determined that our contracts
generally do not include a significant financing component. We assess collectability based on a number of factors, including past
transaction history with the customer and the credit-worthiness of the customer. We generally do not request collateral from our
customers although in certain cases we obtain a security interest in a customer's equipment placed in our IBX data centers or
obtain a deposit. We also maintain an allowance for estimated losses on a lifetime loss basis resulting from the inability of our
customers to make required payments for which we had expected to collect the revenues in accordance with the new credit loss
guidance accounting guidance ("Topic 326"). The financial condition of our customers were to deteriorate or if they became
insolvent, resulting in an impairment of their ability to make payments, greater allowances for credit losses may be required.
Management specifically analyzes accounts receivable and current economic news, conditions and trends, historical loss rates,
customer concentrations, customer credit-worthiness, changes in customer payment terms and any applicable long term forecast
when evaluating revenue recognition and the adequacy of our reserves. Any amounts that were previously recognized as revenue
and subsequently determined to be uncollectable are charged to bad debt expense included in sales and marketing expense in the
consolidated statements of operations. A specific bad debt reserve of up to the full amount of a particular invoice value is provided
for certain problematic customer balances. An additional reserve is established for all other accounts based on an analysis of
historical credits issued. Delinquent account balances are written off after management has determined that the likelihood of
collection is not probable.
A contract asset exists when we have transferred products or provided services to our customers but customer payment is
conditioned on reasons other than the passage of time, such as upon the satisfaction of additional performance obligations. Certain
contracts include terms related to price arrangements such as price increases and free months. We recognize revenues ratably
over the contract term, which could potentially give rise to contract
F-17
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
assets during certain periods of the contract term. Contract assets are recorded in other current assets and other assets in the
consolidated balance sheet.
Deferred revenue (a contract liability) is recognized when we have an unconditional right to a payment before it transfers
products or services to customers. Deferred revenue is included in other current liabilities and other liabilities, respectively, in the
consolidated balance sheet.
Contract Costs
Direct and indirect incremental costs solely related to obtaining revenue contracts are capitalized as costs of obtaining a
contract, when they are incremental and if they are expected to be recovered. Such costs consist primarily of commission fees and
sales bonuses, as well as indirect related payroll costs. In 2021, contract costs are amortized over the estimated period of 5.5 years
on a straight-line basis. We elected to apply the practical expedient which allows us to expense contract costs when incurred, if the
amortization period is one year or less.
For further information on revenue recognition, see Note 2 below.
Income Taxes
Income taxes are accounted for under the asset and liability method. Under this method, deferred tax assets and liabilities are
recognized based on the future tax consequences attributable to differences that exists between the financial statement carrying
amounts of assets and liabilities and their respective tax bases, as well as tax attributes such as operating loss, capital loss and tax
credits carryforwards on a taxing jurisdiction basis. Deferred tax assets and liabilities are measured using enacted tax rates
expected to apply to taxable income in the year in which those temporary differences are expected to be recovered or settled. The
effect on deferred tax assets and liabilities of a change in tax rates is recognized in income in the period that includes the enactment
date. Valuation allowances are established when necessary to reduce deferred tax assets to the amounts that are expected more
likely than not to be realized in the future. A tax benefit from an uncertain income tax position may be recognized in the financial
statements only if it is more likely than not that the position is sustainable, based solely on its technical merits and consideration of
the relevant taxing authority's widely understood administrative practices and precedents. Recognized income tax positions are
measured at the largest amount that has a greater than 50 percent likelihood of being realized. Any subsequent changes in
recognition or measurement are reflected in the period in which the change in judgment occurs.
We elected to be taxed as a REIT for U.S. federal income tax purposes beginning with our 2015 taxable year. As a result, we
may deduct the dividends made to our stockholders from taxable income generated by us and that of our qualified REIT
subsidiaries ("QRSs"). Our dividends paid deduction generally eliminates the U.S. federal taxable income of our REIT and QRSs,
resulting in no U.S. federal income tax due. However, our domestic taxable REIT subsidiaries ("TRSs") are subject to the U.S.
corporate income taxes on any taxable income generated by them. In addition, our foreign operations are subject to local income
taxes regardless of whether the foreign operations are operated as QRSs or TRSs.
Our qualification and taxation as a REIT depend on our satisfaction of certain asset, income, organizational, distribution,
stockholder ownership and other requirements on a continuing basis. Our ability to satisfy quarterly asset tests depends upon our
analysis and the fair market values of our REIT and non-REIT assets. For purposes of the quarterly REIT asset tests, we estimate
the fair market value of assets within our QRSs and TRSs using a discounted cash flow approach, by calculating the present value
of forecasted future cash flows. We apply discount rates based on industry benchmarks relative to the market and forecasting risks.
Other significant assumptions used to estimate the fair market value of assets in QRSs and TRSs include projected revenue
growth, projected operating margins, and projected capital expenditures. We revisit significant assumptions periodically to reflect
any changes due to business or economic environment.
For further information on income taxes, see Note 14 below.
Stock-Based Compensation
Stock-based compensation cost is measured at the grant date for all stock-based awards made to employees and directors
based on the fair value of the award. We generally recognize stock-based compensation expense on a straight-line basis over the
requisite service period of the awards, which is generally the vesting period. However,
F-18
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
for awards with market conditions or performance conditions, stock-based compensation expense is recognized on a straight-line
basis over the requisite service period for each vesting tranche of the award. We elected to estimate forfeitures based on
historical forfeiture rates. 
We grant restricted stock units ("RSUs") or restricted stock awards ("RSAs") to our employees and these equity awards
generally have only a service condition. We grant RSUs to our executives and these awards generally have a service and
performance condition or a service and market condition. Performance conditions contained in an equity award are generally tied to
our financial performance or a specific region of our company. We assess the probability of meeting these performance conditions
on a quarterly basis. The majority of our RSUs vest over four years, although certain equity awards for executives vest over a range
of two to four years. Our RSAs vest over three years. The valuation of RSUs and RSAs with only a service condition or a service
and performance condition requires no significant assumptions as the fair value for these types of equity awards is based solely on
the fair value of our stock price on the date of grant. We use a Monte Carlo simulation option-pricing model to determine the fair
value of RSUs with a service and market condition.
We use the Black-Scholes option-pricing model to determine the fair value of our employee stock purchase plan ("ESPP"). The
determination of the fair value of shares purchased under the ESPP is affected by assumptions regarding a number of complex and
subjective variables including our expected stock price volatility over the term of the awards and actual and projected employee
stock purchase behaviors. We estimated the expected volatility by using the average historical volatility of its common stock that it
believed was best representative of future volatility. The risk-free interest rate used was based on U.S. Treasury zero-coupon issues
with remaining terms similar to the expected term of the equity awards. The expected dividend rate used was based on average
dividend yields and the expected term used was equal to the term of each purchase window.
The accounting standard for stock-based compensation does not allow the recognition of unrealized tax benefits associated
with the tax deductions in excess of the compensation recorded (excess tax benefit) until the excess tax benefit is realized (i.e.,
reduces taxes payable). We record the excess tax benefits from stock-based compensation as income tax expense through the
statement of operations. For further information on stock-based compensation, see Note 13 below.
Foreign Currency Translation
The financial position of foreign subsidiaries is translated using the exchange rates in effect at the end of the period, while
income and expense items are translated at average exchange rates during the period. Gains or losses from translation of foreign
operations where the local currency is the functional currency are included as other comprehensive income (loss). The net gains
and losses resulting from foreign currency transactions are recorded in net income in the period incurred and recorded within other
income (expense). Certain inter-company balances are designated as loans of a long-term investment-type nature. Accordingly,
exchange gains and losses associated with these long-term inter-company balances are recorded as a component of other
comprehensive income (loss), along with translation adjustments.
Earnings Per Share
We compute basic and diluted EPS for net income. Basic EPS is computed using net income and the weighted-average
number of common shares outstanding. Diluted EPS is computed using net income and the weighted-average number of common
shares outstanding plus any dilutive potential common shares outstanding. Dilutive potential common shares include the assumed
exercise, vesting and issuance activity of employee equity awards using the treasury stock method. For further information on
earnings per share, see Note 4 below.
Treasury Stock
We account for treasury stock under the cost method. When treasury stock is re-issued at a higher price than its cost, the
difference is recorded as a component of additional paid-in capital to the extent that there are gains to
F-19
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
offset the losses. If there are no treasury stock gains in additional paid-in capital, the losses are recorded as a component of
retained earnings.
Coronavirus (COVID-19) Update
During the year ended December 31, 2021, the COVID-19 pandemic did not have a material impact on our financial
statements. During the year ended December 31, 2020, we recorded an insignificant amount of revenue reserve and allowance for
credit losses related to our response to the COVID-19 pandemic, and incurred one-time cash bonuses and compensation expense
of $8.6 million for our IBX data center employees, as well as other employees to support their work-from-home requirements. This
was partially offset by lower travel expenses due to travel restrictions as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic. During the year ended
December 31, 2021 and 2020, we also evaluated our goodwill, long-lived assets, including property, plant and equipment, lease
right-of-use assets and intangible assets, noting no indicators of impairment resulting from the pandemic.
The full impact that the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic will have on our future consolidated financial statements remains
uncertain and ultimately will depend on many factors, including the duration and potential cyclicity of the health crisis, further public
policy actions to be taken in response, as well as the continued impact of the pandemic on the global economy and our customers
and vendors. We will continue to evaluate the nature and extent of these potential impacts to our business and consolidated
financial statements.
Recent Accounting Pronouncements
Accounting Standards Not Yet Adopted
In October 2021, the Financial Accounting Standards Board ("FASB") issued Accounting Standards Update ("ASU") 2021-08
Business Combinations ("Topic 805"): Accounting for Contract Assets and Contract Liabilities from Contracts with Customers. The
ASU requires contract assets and contract liabilities acquired in a business combination to be recognized and measured by the
acquirer on the acquisition date in accordance with ASC 606, Revenue from Contracts with Customers, as if it had originated the
contracts. Under the current business combinations guidance, such assets and liabilities were recognized by the acquirer at fair
value on the acquisition date. The ASU is effective for fiscal years, and interim periods within those fiscal years, beginning after
December 15, 2022, with early adoption permitted. We are currently evaluating the extent of the impact of this ASU, but do not
expect the adoption of this standard to have a significant impact on our consolidated financial statements.
In August 2020, FASB issued ASU 2020-06: Debt-Debt with Conversion and Other Options (Subtopic 470-20) and Derivatives
and Hedging-Contracts in Entity’s Own Equity (Subtopic 815-40). The ASU simplifies the accounting for convertible instruments by
reducing the number of accounting models for convertible debt instruments and convertible preferred stock and modifies the
disclosure requirement for the convertible instruments. Additionally, this ASU improves the consistency of EPS calculations by
eliminating the use of the treasury stock method to calculate diluted EPS for convertible instruments and clarifies certain areas
under the current EPS guidance. The ASU is effective for fiscal years, and interim periods within those fiscal years, beginning after
December 15, 2021, with early adoption permitted at the beginning of the fiscal year after December 15, 2020. We are currently
evaluating the extent of the impact of this ASU, but do not expect the adoption of this standard to have a significant impact on our
consolidated financial statements.
Accounting Standards Recently Adopted
Financial Instruments - Credit Losses
In June 2016, FASB issued ASU 2016-13, Financial Instruments - Credit Losses ("Topic 326"): Measurement of Credit Losses
on Financial Instruments. The ASU requires the measurement of all expected credit losses for financial assets held at the reporting
date based on historical experience, current conditions, and reasonable and supportable forecasts. The ASU requires enhanced
qualitative and quantitative disclosures to help investors and other financial statement users better understand significant estimates
and judgments used in estimating credit losses, as well as the credit quality and underwriting standards of an organization's
portfolio. The ASU is effective for fiscal years, and interim periods within those fiscal years, beginning after December 15, 2019, with
early adoption permitted. We adopted this new ASU on January 1, 2020 using the modified retrospective approach and recorded a
net decrease to retained earnings of $0.9 million and a corresponding increase to allowance for credit
F-20
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
losses. The adoption did not have a significant impact on other financial assets within the scope of Topic 326, such as contract
assets.
Income Taxes
In December 2019, FASB issued ASU 2019-12, Income Taxes ("Topic 740"): Simplifying the Accounting for Income Taxes.  The
ASU simplifies accounting for income taxes by removing certain exceptions to the general principles in Topic 740. The ASU also
improves consistent application of and simplifies generally accepted accounting principles ("GAAP") for other areas of Topic 740 by
clarifying and amending existing guidance. The ASU is effective for fiscal years, and interim periods within those fiscal years,
beginning after December 15, 2020, with early adoption permitted including adoption in any interim period for periods for which
financial statements have not yet been issued. On January 1, 2021, we adopted this ASU on a prospective basis and the adoption
of this standard did not have an impact on our consolidated financial statements.
Reference Rate Reform
In March 2020, FASB issued ASU 2020-04, Reference Rate Reform ("Topic 848"): Facilitation of the Effects of Reference Rate
Reform on Financial Reporting. In addition, FASB issued ASU 2021-01, Reference Rate Reform ("Topic 848"), which clarifies the
scope of Topic 848. Collectively, the guidance provides optional expedients and exceptions for applying GAAP to contracts, hedging
relationships, and other transactions affected by reference rate reform if certain criteria are met. ASU 2021-01 is effective upon
issuance and ASU 2020-04 was effective for all entities as of March 12, 2020, and together remain effective through December 31,
2022. We adopted these ASUs upon their respective issuances and there was no impact on our consolidated financial statements
as a result of adopting the guidance. We will evaluate our debt, derivative and lease contracts that may become eligible for
modification relief and may apply the elections prospectively as needed.
F-21
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
2.    Revenue
Contract Balances
The following table summarizes the opening and closing balances of our accounts receivable, net; contract assets, current;
contract assets, non-current; deferred revenue, current; and deferred revenue, non-current (in thousands):
Accounts
receivable, netContract
assets,
currentContract
assets, non-
currentDeferred
revenue,
currentDeferred
revenue, non-
current
Beginning balances as of January 1, 2021 $ 676,738 $ 13,534 $ 54,050 $ 101,258 $ 71,242 
Closing balances as of December 31, 2021 681,809 65,392 55,486 109,736 87,495 
Increase $ 5,071 $ 51,858 $ 1,436 $ 8,478 $ 16,253 
Beginning balances as of January 1, 2020 $ 689,134 $ 10,033 $ 31,521 $ 76,193 $ 46,555 
Closing balances as of December 31, 2020 676,738 13,534 54,050 101,258 71,242 
Increase (Decrease) $ (12,396)$ 3,501 $ 22,529 $ 25,065 $ 24,687 
The net change in our allowance for credit losses was insignificant during the year ended December 31, 2021.
The difference between the opening and closing balances of our accounts receivable, net, contract assets and deferred
revenues primarily results from revenue growth and the timing difference between the satisfaction of our performance obligation and
the customer's payment, as well as business combinations closed during the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020. The
amounts of revenue recognized during the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 from the opening deferred revenue
balance were $93.1 million, $87.0 million and $87.3 million, respectively. For the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019,
no impairment loss related to contract balances was recognized in the consolidated statement of operations.
Contract Costs
The ending balances of net capitalized contract costs as of December 31, 2021 and 2020 were $325.5 million and $268.0
million, respectively, which were included in other assets in the consolidated balance sheet. $87.6 million, $85.4 million, and $72.9
million of contract costs were amortized during years ended December 31, 2021, 2020, and 2019, respectively, which were included
in sales and marketing expense in the consolidated statement of operations.
Remaining performance obligations
As of December 31, 2021, approximately $9.1 billion of total revenues, including deferred installation revenues, are expected to
be recognized in future periods. Most of our revenue contracts have an initial term varying from one to three years, and thereafter,
automatically renew in one-year increments. Included in the remaining performance obligations are contracts that are either under
the initial term or under one-year renewal periods. We expect to recognize approximately 70% of our remaining performance
obligations as revenues over the next two years, with more revenues expected to be recognized in the first year due to the impact
of contracts renewal. The remainder of the balance is generally expected to be recognized over the next three to five years. We
estimate our remaining performance obligations at a point in time. Actual amounts and timing of revenue recognition may differ from
these estimates due to changes in actual deployments dates, contract modifications, renewals and/or terminations.
The remaining performance obligations do not include variable consideration related to unsatisfied performance obligations
such as the usage of metered power, service fees from xScale data centers, which are calculated based on future events or
actual costs incurred in the future, or any contracts that could be terminated without any significant penalties such as the majority of
interconnection revenues. The remaining performance obligations above include revenues to be recognized in the future related to
arrangements where we are considered the lessor.(1)
(1) 
TM
F-22
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
3.    Acquisitions
Pending Acquisition
Acquisition of MainOne Cable Company Ltd. (the "MainOne Acquisition")
On December 6, 2021, we entered into an agreement to purchase MainOne Cable Company Ltd. ("MainOne"), representing
three operational data centers, with an additional facility under construction. We intend to acquire MainOne and its assets in an all-
cash transaction at an enterprise value of approximately $320 million. The acquisition is expected to close in the second quarter of
2022, subject to customary conditions including regulatory approval. Upon the close of the acquisition, the operating results of the
acquired business will be reported in the EMEA region. The MainOne Acquisition supports our ongoing expansion to meet customer
demand in the West African market.
2021 Acquisition
Acquisition of GPX India (the "GPX India Acquisition")
On September 1, 2021, we completed the acquisition of GPX India, representing two data centers in Mumbai, India, for a total
purchase consideration of approximately INR12.5 billion, or $170.5 million at the exchange rate in effect on that date. The GPX
India Acquisition supports our ongoing expansion to meet customer demand in the market.
2020 Acquisitions
Acquisition of Bell Data Centers (the "Bell Acquisition")
On October 1, 2020, we completed the acquisition of 12 data center sites across Canada from Bell, with one additional data
center in Ottawa Canada acquired on November 2, 2020, for a total combined purchase consideration of approximately
C$934.3 million, or $704.0 million at the exchange rates in effect on those dates. The acquisition supports our ongoing expansion to
meet customer demand in Canada.
Acquisition of Packet (the "Packet Acquisition")
On March 2, 2020, we acquired all outstanding shares and equity awards of Packet, a leading bare metal automation platform
for a total purchase consideration of approximately $290.3 million in cash. In addition, we paid $16.1 million in cash to accelerate
the vesting of unvested Packet equity awards for certain Packet employees, which was recorded as stock-based compensation
expense during the three months ended March 31, 2020. In connection with the acquisition, we also issued restricted stock awards
with an aggregated fair value of $30.2 million and a three-year vesting period, which will be recognized as stock-based
compensation costs over the vesting period. The acquisition, combined with Equinix Metal, is expected to accelerate our strategy
to help enterprises deploy hybrid multicloud architectures on our data center platform.
Acquisition of data centers from Axtel (the "Axtel Acquisition")
On January 8, 2020, we completed the acquisition of three data centers in Mexico from Axtel for a total purchase consideration
of approximately $189.0 million, including $175.0 million in cash and $14.0 million we paid to the seller for recoverable value-added
taxes ("VAT") incurred prior to the acquisition, which related to a corresponding VAT receivable acquired upon acquisition. The
acquisition supports our ongoing expansion to meet customer demand in our Americas region.
Purchase price allocation
Each of these acquisitions constitute a business under the accounting standard for business combinations and, therefore, were
accounted for as business combinations using the acquisition method of accounting. Under this method, the total purchase price is
allocated to the assets acquired and liabilities assumed measured at fair value on the date of acquisition.
As of December 31, 2021, we had not completed the detailed valuation analysis to derive the fair value of assets acquired and
liabilities assumed from the GPX India Acquisition, including property, plant and equipment,TM
F-23
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
intangible assets and the related tax impacts; therefore, the purchase price allocation is based on provisional estimates and subject
to continuing management analysis.
A summary of the final allocation of total purchase consideration is presented as follows (in thousands):
GPX India Bell Packet Axtel
Provisional Final
Cash and cash equivalents $ 9,406 $ — $ 1,068 $ — 
Accounts receivable 4,399 — 5,098 — 
Other current assets 8,883 696 299 14,048 
Property, plant and equipment 88,108 538,717 27,945 76,407 
Operating lease right-of-use assets 62 14,359 1,519 1,646 
Intangible assets 15,472 75,857 58,500 22,750 
Goodwill 77,162 172,387 230,620 78,902 
Deferred tax and other assets 20 722 138 — 
Total assets acquired 203,512 802,738 325,187 193,753 
Accounts payable and accrued liabilities (1,569) (895) (1,275) (238)
Other current liabilities (478) — (860) — 
Operating lease liabilities (62) (13,340) (1,519) (1,586)
Finance lease liabilities (20,565) (80,026) (27,945) — 
Deferred tax and other liabilities (10,373) (4,495) (3,290) (2,911)
Net assets acquired $ 170,465 $ 703,982 $ 290,298 $ 189,018 
For the GPX India Acquisition, the purchase price allocation adjustments since the provisional amounts reported as of September 30, 2021
were not significant.
For the Bell Acquisition, the purchase price allocation adjustments since the provisional amounts reported as of December 31, 2020 were
not significant.
Property, plant and equipment - The fair values of property, plant and equipment acquired from these four acquisitions were
estimated by applying the cost approach, with the exception of land, which was estimated by applying the market approach. The
key assumptions of the cost approach include replacement cost new, physical deterioration, functional and economic obsolescence,
economic useful life, remaining useful life, age and effective age.
Intangible assets - The following table presents certain information on the acquired intangible assets (in thousands):
Intangible Assets Fair V alueEstimated Useful
Lives (Y ears)Weighted-average
Estimated Useful
Lives (Y ears) Discount Rate
GPX India:
Customer relationships $ 15,472 15.0 15.0 11.0 %
Bell:
Customer relationships 75,857 15.0 15.0 8.0 %
Packet:
Trade names 1,300 3.0 3.0 8.0 %
Existing technology 5,100 3.0 3.0 8.0 %
Customer relationships 52,100 10.0 10.0 8.0 %
Axtel:
Customer relationships 22,750 15.0 15.0 13.3 %(1) (2)
(1)
(2)
(1)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(1)
(1)
F-24
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
The fair values were estimated by calculating the present value of estimated future operating cash flows generated from
existing customers less costs to realize the revenue. The rates reflect the nature of the assets as they relate to the risk and
uncertainty of the estimated future operating cash flows, as well as the risk of the country within which the acquired business
operates.
The fair value was estimated using the relief from royalty method, with a relief from royalty rate of 1.0%.
The fair value was estimated under the cost approach by projecting the cost to recreate a new asset with an equivalent utility
of the existing technology. The key assumptions include total cost, time to recreate, opportunity cost and functional
obsolescence. The discount rate was utilized for the opportunity cost assumption.
Goodwill
Goodwill represents the excess of the purchase price over the fair value of the net tangible and intangible assets acquired and
liabilities assumed. Goodwill is attributable to the workforce of the acquired business and the projected revenue increase expected
to arise from future customers after these acquisitions. Goodwill from the Bell, Packet, and Axtel acquisitions is attributable to our
Americas region and goodwill from the GPX India Acquisition is attributable to the Asia-Pacific region. Goodwill from the Bell
Acquisition is expected to be deductible for local tax purposes while goodwill from the GPX India, Packet and Axtel Acquisitions are
not deductible for local tax purposes.
Revenues and net income and loss from operations
The operating results of the GPX India Acquisition are reported in the Asia-Pacific region following the date of acquisition.
During the year ended December 31, 2021, our results of operations from the GPX India Acquisition included $6.9 million of
revenues and an insignificant amount of net income from operations.
Transaction costs
During the year ended December 31, 2021, the transaction costs for the GPX India Acquisition were insignificant.
2019 Acquisition
On April 18, 2019, we completed the acquisition of Switch Datacenters' AMS1 data center business in Amsterdam, Netherlands,
for a cash purchase price of approximately €30.6 million or approximately $34.3 million, at the exchange rate in effect on April 18,
2019.
4.    Earnings Per Share
The following table sets forth the computation of basic and diluted earnings per share ("EPS") for the years ended December 31
(in thousands, except per share amounts):
2021 2020 2019
Net income $ 499,728 $ 370,074 $ 507,245 
Net (income) loss attributable to non-controlling interests 463 (297) 205 
Net income attributable to Equinix $ 500,191 $ 369,777 $ 507,450 
Weighted-average shares used to calculate basic EPS 89,772 87,700 84,140 
Effect of dilutive securities:
Employee equity awards 637 710 539 
Weighted-average shares used to calculate diluted EPS 90,409 88,410 84,679 
EPS attributable to Equinix:
Basic EPS $ 5.57 $ 4.22 $ 6.03 
Diluted EPS $ 5.53 $ 4.18 $ 5.99 (1)
(2)
(3)
F-25
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
The following table sets forth potential shares of common stock that are not included in the diluted EPS calculation above
because to do so would be anti-dilutive for the years ended December 31 (in thousands):
2021 2020 2019
Common stock related to employee equity awards 206 19 21 
Total 206 19 21 
5.    Assets Held for Sale
In October 2021, we entered into an agreement to form a joint venture in the form of a limited liability partnership with PGIM
Real Estate ("PGIM"), to develop and operate xScale data centers in Asia-Pacific (the "Asia-Pacific 2 Joint Venture"). xScale data
centers are engineered to meet the technical and operational requirements and price points of core hyperscale workload
deployments and also offer access to our comprehensive suite of interconnection and edge services. Upon closing, PGIM will
contribute cash in exchange for an 80% partnership interest in the Asia-Pacific 2 Joint Venture. We agreed to sell the Sydney 9
("SY9") data center site in exchange for a 20% partnership interest in the Asia-Pacific 2 Joint Venture and cash proceeds. The
assets and liabilities of the SY9 data center, which are currently included within our Asia-Pacific region, were classified as held for
sale as of September 30, 2021 and remained held for sale as of December 31, 2021.
In June 2021, we entered into an agreement to form another joint venture in the form of a limited liability partnership with GIC,
Singapore's sovereign wealth fund ("GIC"), to develop and operate additional xScale data centers in Europe and the Americas (the
“EMEA 2 Joint Venture”). The assets and liabilities of the data center sites expected to be sold to the EMEA 2 Joint Venture within a
year were classified as held for sale as of June 30, 2021. The transaction was structured to close in phases over the course of two
years, pending regulatory approval and other closing conditions. The first phase of the transaction, comprised of data center sites
located in Frankfurt, Helsinki, Madrid, Milan and Paris, closed in September 2021. Upon closing, we sold these data center sites in
exchange for a total consideration of $144.0 million, which is comprised of $106.4 million of net cash proceeds, a 20% partnership
interest in the EMEA 2 Joint Venture with a fair value of $30.4 million, and $7.2 million of receivables. During the year ended
December 31, 2021, we recognized an insignificant gain on the sale of these xScale data center facilities. In October 2021, we
completed the sale of the Sao Paulo 5 ("SP5") data center to the EMEA 2 Joint Venture in exchange for a total consideration of
$34.3 million. During the year ended December 31, 2021, we recognized an insignificant loss on the sale of the SP5 data center.
The assets and liabilities of the Warsaw 4 ("WA4") data center site, which is currently included within our EMEA region and is
expected to be sold to the EMEA 2 Joint Venture in a future phase, were classified as held for sale as of June 30, 2021 and
remained held for sale as of December 31, 2021.
Additionally, we entered negotiations to sell the Mexico 3 ("MX3") data center site in connection with the formation of a new joint
venture with GIC (the "AMER 1 Joint Venture"). Given that the key terms of the sale had been substantially agreed upon as of
September 30, 2021, the assets and liabilities of the MX3 data center, which are currently included within our Americas region, were
classified as held for sale as of September 30, 2021 and remained held for sale as of December 31, 2021.
In May 2021, we entered into an agreement to sell the Dublin 5 ("DB5") data center site to the EMEA 1 Joint Venture (as
defined in Note 6 below). The assets and liabilities of the DB5 data center, which were included within our EMEA region, were
classified as held for sale as of June 30, 2021. In July 2021, we sold the DB5 data center in exchange for a total consideration of
$77.9 million. During the year ended December 31, 2021, we recognized a total gain of $15.8 million on the sale of the DB5 data
center.
All assets and liabilities classified as held for sale are reported at the lower of their carrying amounts or fair values less costs to
sell. The following table summarizes the assets and liabilities that were classified as assets and liabilities held for sale in the
consolidated balance sheet as of December 31, 2021 (in thousands):TM
F-26
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
December 31, 2021
Operating lease right-of-use assets $ 12,835 
Property, plant and equipment 260,182 
Other assets 3,178 
Total assets held for sale $ 276,195 
Accounts payable and accrued expenses $ 510 
Current portion of operating lease liabilities 2,039 
Operating lease liabilities, less current portion 348 
Accrued property, plant and equipment 18,127 
Total liabilities held for sale $ 21,024 
Liabilities held for sale were included within other current liabilities on the consolidated balance sheet.
Sale of xScale™ data center facilities in Europe in 2020
In September 2020, we entered into an agreement to sell its Paris 9 ("PA9") data center to the EMEA 1 Joint Venture. The
assets and liabilities of the PA9 data center, which were included within our EMEA region, were classified as held for sale as of
September 30, 2020. On December 15, 2020, we closed the transaction for a total consideration of $131.5 million, which is
comprised of 1) cash proceeds of $124.6 million, 2) a contract asset with a fair value of $5.6 million and 3) an insignificant amount
of contingent consideration that is receivable upon completion of certain performance milestones. During the year ended December
31, 2020, we recognized an insignificant loss on the sale of the PA9 data center. In connection with this transaction, we have a
commitment with the EMEA 1 Joint Venture to complete a residual portion of the PA9 data center for an estimated cost of
$17.7 million on December 31, 2020, reimbursable upon completion.
The contingent consideration recognized on the EMEA 1 Joint Venture transaction noted above, along with the 2019 EMEA 1
Joint Venture transaction, are considered derivatives and are remeasured at fair value each reporting period using inputs such as
probabilities of payment, discount rates, foreign currency forward rates and projected payment dates. The fair value measurements
were based on significant inputs that are not observable in the market and thus represent Level 3 measurements. As of
December 31, 2021 and 2020, the total fair value of the contingent consideration was $5.3 million and $44.2 million, respectively,
which was included in other current assets and other assets on the consolidated balance sheet. Changes in the fair value of the
contingent consideration were recorded in gain (loss) on asset sales on the consolidated statement of operations.
Sale of xScale™ data center facilities in Asia-Pacific in 2020
In April 2020, we entered into an agreement to form a joint venture in the form of a limited liability partnership with GIC to
develop and operate xScale™ data centers in Asia-Pacific (the “Asia-Pacific 1 Joint Venture”), with ownership upon close for GIC
and our company being established at 80% and 20%, respectively. The assets and liabilities of three Japan xScale™ data center
sites, the Osaka 2, Tokyo 12, and Tokyo 14 development sites, which were included within our Asia-Pacific region, were classified
as held for sale as of June 30, 2020. In the third quarter of 2020, we recorded an impairment charge of $7.3 million, reducing the
carrying value of the development site assets to the estimated fair value less cost to sell. On December 17, 2020, we closed the
transaction including the sale of the three development sites to the Asia-Pacific 1 Joint Venture in exchange for $209.8 million of
cash proceeds and $15.6 million of receivables. During the year ended December 31, 2020, we recognized an insignificant gain on
the sale of these xScale™ data center development sites.
Our investments in the EMEA 1 Joint Venture, EMEA 2 Joint Venture and the Asia-Pacific 1 Joint Venture are accounted for
using the equity method of accounting. For further information, see Note 6 below. (1)
(1)
F-27
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
6.    Equity Method Investments
The following table summarizes our equity method investments (in thousands), which were included in other assets on the
consolidated balance sheets as of December 31 (in thousands):
Investee Ownership Percentage 2021 2020
EMEA 1 Joint Venture with GIC 20 %$ 131,516 $ 101,892 
EMEA 2 Joint Venture with GIC 20 % 34,944 — 
Asia-Pacific 1 Joint Venture with GIC 20 % 60,108 43,432 
Other Various 18,481 17,747 
Total $ 245,049 $ 163,071 
Non - Variable Interest Entity (VIE) Joint Venture
EMEA 1 Joint Venture
In 2019, we entered into a joint venture in the form of a limited liability partnership with GIC (the "EMEA 1 Joint Venture"), to
develop and operate xScale data centers in Europe. The EMEA 1 Joint Venture is not a variable interest entity ("VIE") given that
both equity investors' interests have the characteristics of a controlling financial interest and it is sufficiently capitalized to sustain its
operations, requiring additional funding from its partners only when expanding operations. Our share of income and losses of equity
method investments from this joint venture was insignificant for the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020 and was included in
other income (expense) on the consolidated statement of operations.
We committed to make future equity contributions to the EMEA 1 Joint Venture for funding its future development. As of
December 31, 2021, we had future equity contribution commitments of $26.0 million.
VIE Joint Ventures
Asia-Pacific 1 and EMEA 2 Joint Ventures
In 2020, we entered into a second joint venture in the form of a limited liability partnership with GIC (the "Asia-Pacific 1 Joint
Venture") to develop and operate xScale data centers in Asia-Pacific.
In 2021, we entered into another joint venture in the form of a limited liability partnership with GIC (the "EMEA 2 Joint Venture")
to develop and operate additional xScale data centers in Europe and the Americas (see Note 5 above).
For both the Asia-Pacific 1 Joint Venture and the EMEA 2 Joint Venture, we provide certain management services to their
operations and earn fees for the performance of such services. Both joint ventures do not have sufficient funds from operations to
be self-sustaining, thus are considered VIEs. The power to direct the activities of these joint ventures that most significantly impact
economic performance is shared equally between GIC and us. These activities include data center construction and operations,
sales and marketing, financing, and real estate purchases or sales. Decisions about these activities require the consent of both GIC
and us. We concluded that neither party is deemed to have predominant control over the Asia-Pacific 1 Joint Venture and EMEA 2
Joint Venture and neither party is considered to be the primary beneficiary. During the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020,
respectively, our share of income and losses of equity method investments from these joint ventures was insignificant both
individually and in aggregate, and was included in other income (expense) on the consolidated statement of operations.
F-28
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
The following table summarizes our maximum exposure to loss related to the Asia-Pacific 1 Joint Venture and EMEA 2 Joint
Venture as of December 31, 2021 (in thousands):
Asia-Pacific 1
Joint V entureEMEA  2 Joint
Venture
Equity Investment $ 60,108 $ 34,944 
Outstanding Receivables 2,124 26,953 
Future Equity Contribution Commitments 11,424 64,875 
Maximum Future Payments under Debt Guarantees N/A 38,118 
Total $ 73,656 $ 164,890 
The joint ventures' partn ers are required to make additional equity contributions proportionate ly upon certain occurrences, such as a
shortfall in capital necessary to complete certain construction phases or make interest payments on their outstanding debt.
In connectio n with our 20% equity investment in the EMEA  2 Joint Venture, we provided the lenders with our guarantees covering 20% of
all payments of principal and interest due under EMEA  2 Joint V enture's credit facility agreements (see Note 15).
The Asia-Pacific 1 Joint V enture’ s debt is secured by the net assets of the Asia-Pacific 1 Joint V enture without recourse to its partners.1
2 3
(1)
(2)
(3)
F-29
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
7.    Balance Sheet Components
Cash, Cash Equivalents and Short-Term Investments
Cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments consisted of the following as of December 31 (in thousands):
2021 2020
Cash and cash equivalents:
Cash $ 950,677 $ 993,798 
Cash equivalents:
Money market funds 585,681 611,071 
Total cash and cash equivalents 1,536,358 1,604,869 
Short-term investments:
Certificates of deposit — 4,373 
Publicly traded equity securities — 159 
Total short-term investments — 4,532 
Total cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments $ 1,536,358 $ 1,609,401 
As of December 31, 2021 and 2020, cash and cash equivalents included investments which were readily convertible to cash
and had original maturity dates of 90 days or less.
Accounts Receivable
Trade accounts receivable are recorded at the invoiced amount and generally do not bear interest. Accounts receivable, net,
consisted of the following as of December 31 (in thousands):
2021 2020
Accounts receivable $ 693,444 $ 687,415 
Allowance for credit losses (11,635) (10,677)
Accounts receivable, net $ 681,809 $ 676,738 
The following table summarizes the activity of our allowance for credit losses (in thousands):
Balance as of December 31, 2018 $ 15,950 
Provision for doubtful accounts 8,459 
Net write-offs (11,341)
Impact of foreign currency exchange (42)
Balance as of December 31, 2019 13,026 
Adjustments due to adoption of ASU 2016-13 900 
Provision for doubtful accounts 5,069 
Net write-offs (10,050)
Impact of foreign currency exchange 1,732 
Balance as of December 31, 2020 10,677 
Provision for doubtful accounts 10,016 
Net write-offs (8,295)
Impact of foreign currency exchange (763)
Balance as of December 31, 2021 $ 11,635 
F-30
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
Other Current Assets
Other current assets consisted of the following as of December 31 (in thousands):
2021 2020
Prepaid expenses $ 65,224 $ 61,424 
Taxes receivable 128,123 125,614 
Restricted cash, current 12,188 11,135 
Other receivables 59,224 44,333 
Derivative instruments 117,432 8,906 
Contract assets, current 65,392 13,534 
Other current assets 15,156 58,070 
Total other current assets $ 462,739 $ 323,016 
Other current assets included $5.3 million and $44.2 million of the current portion of the fair value of the contingent consideration from the
sale of xSca le™ data center facilities to the EMEA  1 Joint Ventur e as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively . See Note 5 for further
discussion.(1)
(1)
F-31
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
Property, Plant and Equipment, Net
Property, plant and equipment, net consisted of the following as of December 31 (in thousands):
2021 2020
Core systems $10,808,417 $ 9,659,908 
Buildings 7,381,644 6,557,121 
Leasehold improvements 2,022,617 1,946,644 
Construction in progress 967,562 1,363,917 
Personal property 1,551,642 1,207,669 
Land 970,982 944,094 
23,702,864 21,679,353 
Less accumulated depreciation (8,257,089) (7,176,269)
Property, plant and equipment, net $15,445,775 $14,503,084 
Personal property included $1.2 billion and $885.5  million of capitalized internal-use software as of December 31, 2021 and 2020,
respectively .
Goodwill and Other Intangibles
The following table presents goodwill and other intangible assets, net, for the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020 (in
thousands):
2021 2020
Goodwill:
Americas $ 2,210,009 $ 2,212,782 
EMEA 2,472,586 2,611,166 
Asia-Pacific 689,476 648,605 
$ 5,372,071 $ 5,472,553 
Intangible assets, net:
Intangible assets - customer relationships $ 2,841,372 $ 2,891,060 
Intangible assets - trade names 11,471 11,512 
Intangible assets - in-place leases 32,760 33,770 
Intangible assets - licenses 9,697 9,697 
Intangible assets - at-the-money lease contracts 60,455 64,905 
Intangible assets - other 12,546 12,802 
2,968,301 3,023,746 
Accumulated amortization - customer relationships (987,462) (818,370)
Accumulated amortization - trade names (3,207) (2,337)
Accumulated amortization - in-place leases (22,847) (20,037)
Accumulated amortization - licenses (5,821) (6,600)
Accumulated amortization - other (13,697) (5,457)
(1,033,034) (852,801)
Total intangible assets, net $ 1,935,267 $ 2,170,945 
In December 2020, we acquired an at-the-money lease contract intangible asset through an asset acquisition in Amsterdam. This intangible
asset repres ents premiums paid to acquire a land lease at market terms. The lease has a remaining lease term of 12 years with available
renewal options in 50-year  increments. The intangible asset has an estimated amortization period of 12 years. The total purchase
consideration for this asset acquisition was $ 49.4 million and we recorded(1)
(1)
 (1)
(2)
(1) 
F-32
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
$16.1 millio n of deferred tax liability in connection with this purchase. The transaction was accou nted for as an asset acquisition since
substantially all of the fair value of the acquired assets is for the identified at-the-money lease intangible asset.
Accumulated amortization - other includes an insignificant amount of amortization of at-the-money lease contracts.
Changes in the carrying amount of goodwill by geographic regions are as follows (in thousands):
Americas EMEA Asia-Pacific Total
Balance as of December 31, 2019 $1,741,689 $2,426,306 $ 613,863 $4,781,858 
Purchase of Packet 230,620 — — 230,620 
Purchase of Bell 170,548 — — 170,548 
Purchase of Axtel 78,902 — — 78,902 
Sale of xScale data center facilities — — (7,306) (7,306)
Impact of foreign currency exchange (8,977) 184,860 42,048 217,931 
Balance as of December 31, 2020 2,212,782 2,611,166 648,605 5,472,553 
Purchase of GPX — — 77,162 77,162 
Impact of foreign currency exchange (2,773) (138,580) (36,291) (177,644)
Balance as of December 31, 2021 $2,210,009 $2,472,586 $ 689,476 $5,372,071 
Changes in the net book value of intangible assets by geographic regions are as follows (in thousands):
Americas EMEA Asia-Pacific Total
Balance as of December 31, 2018 $1,578,971 $ 543,860 $ 210,465 $2,333,296 
ASC 842 adoption adjustment (108) (20,692) (2,405) (23,205)
Switch AMS1 data center acquisition — 4,889 — 4,889 
Asset sales - NY12 data center (8,412) — — (8,412)
Other — 1,096 472 1,568 
Amortization of intangibles (125,390) (54,432) (16,456) (196,278)
Impact of foreign currency exchange (1,769) (8,157) 457 (9,469)
Balance as of December 31, 2019 1,443,292 466,564 192,533 2,102,389 
Axtel acquisition 22,750 — — 22,750 
Packet acquisition 58,500 — — 58,500 
Bell acquisition 75,631 — — 75,631 
Other asset acquisition — 64,905 — 64,905 
Amortization of intangibles (133,608) (49,417) (16,022) (199,047)
Impact of foreign currency exchange (3,476) 35,975 13,318 45,817 
Balance as of December 31, 2020 1,463,089 518,027 189,829 2,170,945 
GPX acquisition — — 15,472 15,472 
Amortization of intangibles (133,289) (55,807) (16,388) (205,484)
Impact of foreign currency exchange (2,047) (30,278) (13,341) (45,666)
Balance as of December 31, 2021 $1,327,753 $ 431,942 $ 175,572 $1,935,267 
 For further discussion, refer to footnote 1 of the table on the previous page.
Goodwill and intangible assets which are denominated in currencies other than the U.S. Dollar are subject to foreign currency
fluctuations. Our foreign currency translation gains and losses, including goodwill and intangibles, are a component of other
comprehensive income and loss.(2) 
(1)
(1)
F-33
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
Estimated future amortization expense related to these intangibles is as follows (in thousands):
Years ending:
2022 $ 196,744 
2023 195,030 
2024 193,722 
2025 191,158 
2026 190,802 
Thereafter 967,811 
Total $ 1,935,267 
Other Assets
Other assets consisted of the following as of December 31 (in thousands):
2021 2020
Deferred tax assets, net $ 59,816 $ 66,424 
Prepaid expenses 87,758 82,443 
Debt issuance costs, net 2,130 4,261 
Deposits 70,548 69,043 
Restricted cash 908 9,691 
Derivative instruments 59,917 2,793 
Contract assets, non-current 55,486 54,050 
Contract costs 325,510 267,978 
Equity method investments 245,049 163,071 
Other assets 18,944 56,293 
Total other assets $ 926,066 $ 776,047 
Prepaid expenses included $46.0 millio n and $21.1 millio n of capitalized CCA implementation costs, net as of December 31, 2021 and
2020, respectively .
In connectio n with the Metronode Acquisition in 2018, we had indemnification assets of $42.8 million as of December 31, 2020, which
represented the seller's obligation under the purchase agreement to reimburse pre-acquisition tax liabilities settled after the acquisition. The
amount was insignificant as of December 31, 2021.(1)
(2)
(1)
(2)
F-34
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
Accounts Payable and Accrued Expenses
Accounts payable and accrued expenses consisted of the following as of December 31 (in thousands):
2021 2020
Accounts payable $ 84,084 $ 77,705 
Accrued compensation and benefits 364,783 317,117 
Accrued interest 81,893 79,437 
Accrued taxes 117,061 153,804 
Accrued utilities and security 94,251 76,910 
Accrued other 137,072 139,889 
Total accounts payable and accrued expenses $ 879,144 $ 844,862 
Accrued taxes included income taxes payable of $ 51.3 million and $ 59.8 million as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively .
Other Current Liabilities
Other current liabilities consisted of the following as of December 31 (in thousands):
2021 2020
Deferred revenue, current $ 109,736 $ 101,258 
Customer deposits 16,380 17,115 
Derivative instruments 13,373 188,726 
Dividends payable, current 12,027 10,873 
Asset retirement obligations 8,756 3,993 
Other current liabilities 54,247 32,403 
Total other current liabilities $ 214,519 $ 354,368 
Other Liabilities
Other liabilities consisted of the following as of December 31 (in thousands):
2021 2020
Asset retirement obligations $ 108,800 $ 109,776 
Deferred tax liabilities, net 340,287 290,366 
Deferred revenue, non-current 87,495 71,242 
Accrued taxes 124,032 178,371 
Dividends payable, non-current 9,750 7,947 
Customer deposits 1,534 1,088 
Derivative instruments 20,899 211,733 
Other liabilities 70,614 78,476 
Total other liabilities $ 763,411 $ 948,999 (1)
(1)
F-35
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
The following table summarizes the activities of our asset retirement obligation ("ARO") (in thousands):
Asset retirement obligations as of December 31, 2018 $ 96,663 
Additions 6,980 
Adjustments (7,969)
Accretion expense 6,290 
Impact of foreign currency exchange 451 
Asset retirement obligations as of December 31, 2019 102,415 
Additions 5,909 
Adjustments (4,241)
Accretion expense 6,331 
Impact of foreign currency exchange 3,355 
Asset retirement obligations as of December 31, 2020 113,769 
Additions 7,483 
Adjustments (6,591)
Accretion expense 6,518 
Impact of foreign currency exchange (3,623)
Asset retirement obligations as of December 31, 2021 $ 117,556 
The ARO adjustments are primarily due to lease amendments and acquisition of real estate assets, as well as other adjustments.
8.    Derivatives and Hedging Instruments
Derivatives Designated as Hedging Instruments
Net Investment Hedges. We are exposed to the impact of foreign exchange rate fluctuations on the value of investments in our
foreign subsidiaries whose functional currencies are other than the U.S. Dollar. In order to mitigate the impact of foreign currency
exchange rates, we have entered into various foreign currency debt obligations, which are designated as hedges against our net
investments in foreign subsidiaries. As of December 31, 2021 and 2020, the total principal amounts of foreign currency debt
obligations designated as net investment hedges were $1.5 billion and $1.9 billion, respectively.
We also use cross-currency interest rate swaps, which effectively convert a portion of our U.S. dollar-denominated fixed-rate
debt to foreign currency-denominated fixed-rate debt, to hedge the currency exposure associated with our net investment in our
foreign subsidiaries. As of December 31, 2021 and 2020, we had cross-currency interest rate swaps outstanding with notional
amounts of $4.0 billion and $3.3 billion respectively, with maturity dates ranging through 2026.
From time to time, we use foreign currency forward contracts to hedge against the effect of foreign exchange rate fluctuations
on our net investment in our foreign subsidiaries. As of December 31, 2021 and 2020, the total notional amount of foreign currency
forward contracts designated as net investment hedges were $375.7 million and $355.6 million respectively.(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
F-36
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
The effect of net investment hedges on accumulated other comprehensive income and the consolidated statements of
operations for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 was as follows (in thousands):
Amount of gain or (loss) recognized in accumulated other comprehensive income:
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
Foreign currency debt $ 93,945 $(208,281)$ 47,033 
Cross-currency interest rate swaps (included component) 282,935 (218,843) 15,514 
Cross-currency interest rate swaps (excluded component) (52,517) (347) 10,737 
Foreign currency forward contracts (included component) 2,621 (17,115) — 
Foreign currency forward contracts (excluded component) (2) 32 — 
Total $326,982 $(444,554)$ 73,284 
Amount of gain or (loss) recognized in earnings:
Location of gain or (loss)Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
Cross-currency interest rate swaps (excluded
component) Interest expense$ 44,933 $ 27,196 $ 19,261 
Foreign currency forward contracts (excluded
component) Interest expense242 42 — 
Total $ 45,175 $ 27,238 $ 19,261 
Included component represents foreign exchange spot rates.
Excluded component represents cross-currency basis spread and interest rates.
Excluded component represents foreign currency forward points.
Cash Flow Hedges. We hedge our foreign currency transaction exposure for forecasted revenues and expenses in our EMEA
region between the U.S. Dollar and the British Pound, Euro, Swedish Krona and Swiss Franc. The foreign currency forward and
option contracts that we use to hedge this exposure are designated as cash flow hedges. As of December 31, 2021 and 2020, the
total notional amounts of these foreign exchange contracts were $831.2 million and $912.9 million, respectively.
As of December 31, 2021, our foreign currency cash flow hedge instruments had maturity dates ranging from January 2022 to
December 2023 and we had a net gain of $13.3 million recorded within accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) to be
reclassified to revenues and expenses relating to these cash flow hedges as they mature in the next 12 months. As of
December 31, 2020, our foreign currency cash flow hedge instruments had maturity dates ranging from January 2021 to December
2022 and we had a net loss of $35.4 million recorded within accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) to be reclassified to
revenues and expenses relating to these cash flow hedges as they mature in the next 12 months.
We enter into intercompany hedging instruments ("intercompany derivatives") with our wholly-owned subsidiaries in order to
hedge certain forecasted revenues and expenses denominated in currencies other than the U.S. Dollar. Simultaneously, we enter
into derivative contracts with unrelated third parties to externally hedge the net exposure created by such intercompany derivatives.
We hedge the interest rate exposure created by anticipated fixed rate debt issuances through the use of treasury locks and
swap locks (collectively, interest rate locks), which are designated as cash flow hedges. As of December 31, 2021, the total notional
amount of interest rate locks outstanding was $800.0 million. As of December 31, 2020, we had no interest rate locks outstanding.
During the year ended December 31, 2021, interest rate locks with a combined aggregate notional amount of $1.3 billion were
settled related to the issuance of senior notes during the year. When interest rate locks are settled, any gain or loss from the
transactions is deferred and included as a component of other comprehensive income (loss) and is amortized to interest expense
over the term of the forecasted hedged transaction which is equivalent to the term of the interest rate locks. As of December 31,
2021 and 2020, we had a net loss of $3.9 million and $4.1 million, respectively, recorded within accumulated other comprehensive
income (loss) to be reclassified to interest expense in the next 12 months for interest rate locks.(1)
(2)
(1)
(3)
(2)
(3)
(1)
(2)
(3)
F-37
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
The effect of cash flow hedges on accumulated other comprehensive income and the consolidated statements of operations for
the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 was as follows (in thousands):
Amount of gain or (loss) recognized in accumulated other comprehensive income:
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
Foreign currency forward and option contracts (included component) $ 67,767 $(68,573)$ (9,945)
Foreign currency option contracts (excluded component) 151 1,655 (1,807)
Interest rate locks 9,624 (30,393) 4,972 
Total $ 77,542 $(97,311)$ (6,780)
Amount of gain or (loss) reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive income to income:
Years Ended December 31,
Location of gain or (loss) 2021 2020 2019
Foreign currency forward contracts Revenues $ (39,297)$ 37,198 $ 80,046 
Foreign currency forward contracts Costs and operating expenses 20,496 (19,890) (41,262)
Interest rate locks Interest Expense (4,056) (1,204) 79 
Total $ (22,857)$ 16,104 $ 38,863 
Amount of gain or (loss) excluded from effectiveness testing and included in income:
Years Ended December 31,
Location of gain or (loss) 2021 2020 2019
Foreign currency forward contracts Other income (expense) $ — $ — $ 88 
Foreign currency option contracts (excluded
component) Revenues(244) (1,761) (1,082)
Total $ (244)$ (1,761)$ (994)
Included component represents foreign exchange spot rates.
Excluded component represents option's time value.
Derivatives Not Designated as Hedging Instruments
Embedded Derivatives. We are deemed to have foreign currency forward contracts embedded in certain of our customer
agreements that are priced in currencies different from the functional or local currencies of the parties involved. These embedded
derivatives are separated from their host contracts and carried on our balance sheet at their fair value. The majority of these
embedded derivatives arise as a result of our foreign subsidiaries pricing their customer contracts in U.S. Dollars.
Economic Hedges of Embedded Derivatives. We use foreign currency forward contracts to manage the foreign exchange risk
associated with our customer agreements that are priced in currencies different from the functional or local currencies of the parties
involved ("economic hedges of embedded derivatives"). Foreign currency forward contracts represent agreements to exchange the
currency of one country for the currency of another country at an agreed-upon price on an agreed-upon settlement date.
Foreign Currency Forward Contracts. We also use foreign currency forward contracts to manage the foreign exchange risk
associated with certain foreign currency-denominated monetary assets and liabilities. As a result of foreign currency fluctuations,
the U.S. Dollar equivalent values of our foreign currency-denominated monetary assets and liabilities change. Gains and losses on
these contracts are included in other income (expense), on a net basis, along with the foreign currency gains and losses of the
related foreign currency-denominated monetary assets and liabilities associated with these foreign currency forward contracts. As of
December 31, 2021 and 2020, the total notional amounts of these foreign currency contracts were $3.3 billion and $3.4 billion,
respectively.(1)
(2)
(2)
(1)
(2)
F-38
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
The following table presents the effect of derivatives not designated as hedging instruments in our consolidated statements of
operations (in thousands):
Amount of gain or (loss) recognized in earnings:
Years Ended December 31,
Location of gain or (loss) 2021 2020 2019
Embedded derivatives Revenues $ 3,503 $ (3,043)$ 63 
Economic hedge of embedded derivatives Revenues (5,937) 2,142 550 
Foreign currency forward contracts Other income (expense) 129,496 (127,648) 36,846 
    Total $127,062 $(128,549)$ 37,459 
Fair Value of Derivative Instruments
The following table presents the fair value of derivative instruments recognized in our consolidated balance sheets as of
December 31, 2021 and 2020 (in thousands):
December 31, 2021 December 31, 2020
Assets Liabilities Assets Liabilities 
Designated as hedging instruments:
Cash flow hedges
Foreign currency forward and option contracts $ 22,866 $ 7,618 $ 351 $ 52,804 
Interest rate locks 8,662 — — — 
Net investment hedges
Cross-currency interest rate swaps 56,921 19,441 — 192,939 
Foreign currency forward contracts 156 70 — 17,041 
Total designated as hedging 88,605 27,129 351 262,784 
Not designated as hedging instruments:
Embedded derivatives 3,247 652 3,255 3,858 
Economic hedges of embedded derivatives 2,232 637 4,372 12 
Foreign currency forward contracts 83,265 5,854 3,721 133,805 
Total not designated as hedging 88,744 7,143 11,348 137,675 
Total Derivatives $ 177,349 $ 34,272 $ 11,699 $ 400,459 
As presented in our consolidated balance sheets within other current assets and other assets.
As presented in our consolidated balance sheets within other current liabilities and other liabilities.(1) (2) (1) (2)
(1)
(2)
F-39
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
Offsetting Derivative Assets and Liabilities
We enter into master netting agreements with our counterparties for transactions other than embedded derivatives to mitigate
credit risk exposure to any single counterparty. Master netting agreements allow for individual derivative contracts with a single
counterparty to offset in the event of default. For presentation on the consolidated balance sheets, we do not offset fair value
amounts recognized for derivative instruments or the accrued interest related to cross-currency interest rate swaps under master
netting arrangements. The following table presents information related to these offsetting arrangements as of December 31, 2021
and 2020 (in thousands):
Gross Amounts Offset in
Consolidated Balance Sheet
Gross AmountsGross Amounts
Offset in the
Balance Sheet Net AmountsGross Amounts
not Offset in the
Balance Sheet Net
December 31, 2021
Derivative assets $ 207,037 $ — $ 207,037 $ (47,538)$ 159,499 
Derivative liabilities 49,326 — 49,326 (47,538) 1,788 
December 31, 2020
Derivative assets $ 38,447 $ — $ 38,447 $ (35,100)$ 3,347 
Derivative liabilities 415,628 — 415,628 (35,100) 380,528 
9.     Fair Value Measurements
Valuation Methods
Fair value estimates are made as of a specific point in time based on methods using the market approach valuation
method which uses prices and other relevant information generated by market transactions involving identical or comparable assets
or liabilities or other valuation techniques. These techniques involve uncertainties and are affected by the assumptions used and the
judgments made regarding risk characteristics of various financial instruments, discount rates, estimates of future cash flows, future
expected loss experience and other factors.
Cash Equivalents and Investments. The fair value of our investments in money market funds approximates their face value.
Such instruments are included in cash equivalents. Our money market funds and publicly traded equity securities are classified
within Level 1 of the fair value hierarchy because they are valued using quoted prices for identical instruments in active markets.
The fair value of our other investments, including certificates of deposit, approximates their face value. The fair value of these
investments is priced based on the quoted market price for similar instruments or nonbinding market prices that are corroborated by
observable market data. Such instruments are classified within Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy. We determine the fair values of
our Level 2 investments by using inputs such as actual trade data, benchmark yields, broker/dealer quotes and other similar data,
which are obtained from quoted market prices, custody bank, third-party pricing vendors or other sources. We use such pricing data
as the primary input to make its assessments and determinations as to the ultimate valuation of our investment portfolio and has not
made, during the periods presented, any material adjustments to such inputs. We are responsible for our consolidated financial
statements and underlying estimates.
We use the specific identification method in computing realized gains and losses. Realized gains and losses from the sale of
investments are included within other income (expense) in our consolidated statements of operations. Our investments in publicly
traded equity securities are carried at fair value. Unrealized gains and losses on publicly traded equity securities are reported within
other income (expense) in our consolidated statements of operations.
Derivative Assets and Liabilities. Inputs used for valuations of derivatives are based upon quoted prices for similar instruments
in active markets, quoted prices for identical or similar instruments in markets that are not active, and model-based valuation
techniques for which all significant inputs are observable in the market or can be corroborated by observable market data. The
significant inputs used include spot currency rates and forward points,
F-40
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
interest rate curves, and published credit default swap rates of its foreign exchange trading counterparties and other comparable
companies. We have determined that the inputs used to value its derivatives fall within Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy, therefore
the derivatives are categorized as Level 2.
Other than the assets and liabilities that were classified as held for sale as described in Note 5 above, we did not have any
nonfinancial assets or liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis during the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020.
Our financial assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis as of December 31, 2021 were as follows (in
thousands):
Fair V alue at
December 31,
2021Fair V alue
Measurement Using
Level 1 Level 2
Assets:
Money market and deposit accounts $ 585,681 $ 585,681 $ — 
Derivative instruments 177,349 — 177,349 
$ 763,030 $ 585,681 $ 177,349 
Liabilities:
Derivative instruments $ 34,272 $ — $ 34,272 
Amounts are included within other current asse ts, other assets, other current liabilities and other liabilities in the consolidated balance
sheets.
Our financial assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis at December 31, 2020 were as follows (in
thousands):
Fair V alue at
December 31,Fair V alue
Measurement Using
2020 Level 1 Level 2
Assets:
Money market and deposit accounts $ 611,071 $ 611,071 $ — 
Publicly traded equity securities 159 159 — 
Certificates of deposit 4,373 — 4,373 
Derivative instruments 11,699 — 11,699 
$ 627,302 $ 611,230 $ 16,072 
Liabilities:
Derivative instruments $ 400,459 $ — $ 400,459 
Amounts are included within other current asse ts, other assets, other current liabilities and other liabilities in the consolidated balance
sheets.
We did not have any nonfinancial assets or liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis as of December 31, 2021 and
2020.
Other than the contingent consideration related to the EMEA 1 Joint Venture as described in Note 6 above, we did not have any
Level 3 financial assets or financial liabilities during the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020.(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
F-41
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
10.    Leases
Significant Lease Transactions
The following table summarizes the significant lease transactions during the year ended December 31, 2021 (in thousands):
Renewal/T ermination
Options Excluded Net Incremental 
Lease Quarter Transaction Lease Classification ROU assetsROU
liabilities
Silicon Valley 8
("SV8") data center
lease extended Q1Extended lease term
by 16 yearsTwo 10-year
renewal optionsFinance Lease $98,141 $100,043
Operating Lease (13,685) (15,586)
Hong Kong 3 ("HK3")
data center lease
extended Q1Extended lease by
10 years, which
included a 5-year
renewal optionN/AFinance Lease -
Building 37,987 37,987
Operating Lease -
Land 6,592 6,592
Osaka 3 ("OS3") new
data center and office
leaseQ2New lease-15 year
term2-year renewal
option on a rolling
basisFinance Lease 144,122 144,122
 These  renewal/termination options are not included in determining the lease terms as we are not reasonably certain to exercise them at this
time.
 The net incremental amounts represent the adjustments to the right of use ("ROU") assets and liabilities recorded during the quarter that the
transactions were entered.
 These leases had components previously classified as operating leases.
Lease Expenses
The components of lease expenses are as follows (in thousands):
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020
Finance lease cost
Amortization of right-of-use assets $ 157,057 $ 120,169 
Interest on lease liabilities 117,896 113,699 
Total finance lease cost 274,953 233,868 
Operating lease cost 221,776 217,299 
Variable lease cost 33,066 13,588 
Total lease cost $ 529,795 $ 464,755 
Amortization of right-of-use assets is included within depreciation expense, and is recorded within cost of revenues, sales and marketing and
general and administrative expenses in the consolidated statements of operations. (1)(2)
(3)
(3)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(1)
(1) 
F-42
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
Other Information
Other information related to leases is as follows (in thousands, except years and percent):
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020
Cash paid for amounts included in the measurement of lease liabilities:
Operating cash flows from finance leases $ 113,571 $ 109,558 
Operating cash flows from operating leases 258,719 206,512 
Financing cash flows from finance leases 165,539 115,288 
Right-of-use assets obtained in exchange for lease obligations: 
Finance leases $ 412,214 $ 487,592 
Operating leases 10,446 108,797 
As of December 31,
2021 2020
Weighted-average remaining lease term - finance leases 14 years 14 years
Weighted-average remaining lease term - operating leases 12 years 12 years
Weighted-average discount rate - finance leases 7 % 7 %
Weighted-average discount rate - operating leases 4 % 4 %
Finance lease ROU assets $ 1,875,696 $ 1,688,032 
Represents all non-cash changes in ROU assets.
Includes lease renewal options that are reasonably certain to be exercised.
As of December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020, we recorded accumulated amortization of finance lease assets of $726.4  million and $604.1
million, respectively . Finance lease assets are recorded within property , plant and equipment, net  on the consolidated balance sheets.
Maturities of Lease Liabilities
Maturities of lease liabilities as of December 31, 2021 are as follows (in thousands):
Year ended December 31, Operating Leases Finance Leases Total
2022 $ 181,810 $ 252,670 $ 434,480 
2023 181,480 239,268 420,748 
2024 165,689 240,696 406,385 
2025 155,642 237,107 392,749 
2026 145,578 227,262 372,840 
Thereafter 847,168 1,979,654 2,826,822 
Total lease payments 1,677,367 3,176,657 4,854,024 
Less imputed interest (426,158) (1,039,148) (1,465,306)
Total $ 1,251,209 $ 2,137,509 $ 3,388,718 
We entered into agreements with various landlords primarily to lease data center spaces and ground leases which have not yet
commenced as of December 31, 2021. These leases will commence between year 2022 and 2024, with lease terms of 3 to 27
years and total lease commitments of approximately $915.6 million.(1)
(2)
(2)
(3)
(1) 
(2) 
(3) 
F-43
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
11.    Debt Facilities
Mortgage and Loans Payable
As of December 31, 2021 and 2020, our mortgage and loans payable consisted of the following (in thousands):
2021 2020
Term loans $ 549,697 $ 1,292,067 
Mortgage payable and loans payable 68,691 78,903 
618,388 1,370,970 
Less amount representing unamortized debt discount and debt issuance cost (354) (3,288)
Add amount representing unamortized mortgage premium 1,630 1,861 
619,664 1,369,543 
Less current portion (33,087) (82,289)
$ 586,577 $ 1,287,254 
Senior Credit Facility
In 2017, we entered into a credit agreement with a group of lenders for a $3.0 billion credit facility ("Senior Credit Facility"),
comprised of a $2.0 billion senior unsecured multicurrency revolving credit facility ("Revolving Facility") and an approximately $1.0
billion senior unsecured multicurrency term loan facility (the "Term Loan Facility"). The credit agreement was subsequently
amended to provide an additional senior unsecured term loan in Japanese Yen for approximately $424.7 million at the exchange
rate effective on the transaction date.
On May 17, 2021, using a portion of the net cash proceeds from the 2026 Notes, 2028 Notes, 2031 Notes, and 2052 Notes as
described below, we repaid our outstanding term loans in Swedish Krona and Japanese Yen under our Term Loan Facility for
$285.4 million and $374.5 million in U.S. Dollars, respectively, at the exchange rates in effect on May 17, 2021. As of December 31,
2021 and December 31, 2020, the total amounts outstanding under the Term Loan Facility, net of debt issuance costs, were $549.3
million and $1.3 billion, respectively. This outstanding amount of $549.3 million as of December 31, 2021 was excluded from current
liabilities as we had the ability and intent to refinance this short-term obligation on a long-term basis. See Note 18 Subsequent
Events below.
As of December 31, 2021, we had 41 irrevocable letters of credit totaling $90.2 million issued and outstanding under the
Revolving Facility, with approximately $1.9 billion remaining available to borrow under the Revolving Facility.
Mortgage Payable
In October 2013, as a result of the Frankfurt Kleyer 90 Carrier Hotel Acquisition, we assumed a mortgage payable of
$42.9 million with an effective interest rate of 4.25%. The mortgage payable has monthly principal and interest payments and has
an expiration date of August 2022.
In December 2019, as a result of the TR2 Data Center purchase, we assumed a mortgage payable of $43.8 million with an
effective interest rate of 3.63%. The mortgage payable has monthly principal and interest payments and has an expiration date of
November 2029.
F-44
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
Senior Notes
Our senior notes consisted of the following as of December 31 (in thousands):
2021 2020
Senior Notes Issuance Date Maturity Date AmountEffective
Rate Amount Effective Rate
5.000% Infomart Senior Notes April 2018 April 2021 $ — — %$ 150,000 4.51 %
2.625% Senior Notes due 2024 November 2019 November 2024 1,000,000 2.79 % 1,000,000 2.79 %
1.250% Senior Notes due 2025 June 2020 July 2025 500,000 1.46 % 500,000 1.46 %
1.000% Senior Notes due 2025 October 2020 September 2025 700,000 1.18 % 700,000 1.18 %
2.900% Senior Notes due 2026 November 2019 November 2026 600,000 3.04 % 600,000 3.04 %
2.875% Euro Senior Notes due 2026 December 2017 February 2026 — — % 611,050 3.04 %
1.450% Senior Notes due 2026 May 2021 May 2026 700,000 1.64 % — — %
0.250% Euro Senior Notes due 2027 March 2021 March 2027 569,150 0.45 % — — %
1.800% Senior Notes due 2027 June 2020 July 2027 500,000 1.96 % 500,000 1.96 %
5.375% Senior Notes due 2027 March 2017 May 2027 — — % 1,250,000 5.51 %
1.550% Senior Notes due 2028 October 2020 March 2028 650,000 1.67 % 650,000 1.67 %
2.000% Senior Notes due 2028 May 2021 May 2028 400,000 2.21 % — — %
3.200% Senior Notes due 2029 November 2019 November 2029 1,200,000 3.30 % 1,200,000 3.30 %
2.150% Senior Notes due 2030 June 2020 July 2030 1,100,000 2.27 % 1,100,000 2.27 %
2.500% Senior Notes due 2031 May 2021 May 2031 1,000,000 2.65 % — — %
1.000% Euro Senior Notes due 2033 March 2021 March 2033 682,980 1.18 % — — %
3.000% Senior Notes due 2050 June 2020 July 2050 500,000 3.09 % 500,000 3.09 %
2.950% Senior Notes due 2051 October 2020 September 2051 500,000 3.00 % 500,000 3.00 %
3.400% Senior Notes due 2052 May 2021 February 2052 500,000 3.50 % — — %
11,102,130 9,261,050 
Less amount representing unamortized debt discount and debt issuance cost (117,986) (92,773)
Add amount representing unamortized debt premium — 186 
10,984,144 9,168,463 
Less current portion — (150,186)
$10,984,144 $9,018,277 
0.250% Euro Senior Notes due 2027 and 1.000% Euro Senior Notes due 2033
On March 10, 2021, we issued €500.0 million, or approximately $594.9 million in U.S. dollars, at the exchange rate in effect on
March 10, 2021, aggregate principal amount of 0.250% senior notes due March 15, 2027 (the "2027 Euro Notes") and
€600.0 million, or approximately $713.8 million in U.S. dollars, at the exchange rate in effect on March 10, 2021, aggregate principal
amount of 1.000% senior notes due March 15, 2033 (the "2033 Euro Notes").
Interest on the notes is payable annually in arrears on March 15 of each year, commencing on March 15, 2022. Total debt
issuance costs and debt discounts related to the 2027 Euro Notes and the 2033 Euro Notes were $7.0 million and $14.1 million,
respectively.
Redemption of 2.875% Euro Senior Notes due 2026
On March 24, 2021, using a portion of the net cash proceeds from the 2027 Euro Senior Notes and 2033 Euro Senior Notes,
we redeemed the remaining outstanding 2.875% Euro Senior Notes due 2026 for $590.7 million in
F-45
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
U.S. dollars, at the exchange rate in effect on March 24, 2021. In connection with the redemption, we incurred $13.2 million of loss
on debt extinguishment, including $8.5 million in redemption premium that was paid in cash and $4.7 million related to the write-off
of unamortized debt issuance costs, during the three months ended March 31, 2021.
1.450% Senior Notes due 2026, 2.000% Senior Notes due 2028, 2.500% Senior Notes due 2031 and 3.400% Senior Notes due
2052
On May 17, 2021, we issued $700.0 million aggregate principal amount of 1.450% senior notes due 2026 (the "2026 Notes"),
$400.0 million aggregate principal amount of 2.000% senior notes due 2028 (the "2028 Notes"), $1.0 billion aggregate principal
amount of 2.500% senior notes due 2031 (the "2031 Notes"), and $500.0 million aggregate principal amount of 3.400% senior
notes due 2052 (the "2052 Notes").
Interest on the 2026, 2028 and 2031 notes are payable semi-annually on May 15 and November 15 of each year, commencing
on November 15, 2021. Interest on the 2052 notes are payable semi-annually on February 15 and August 15 of each year,
commencing on February 15, 2022. Total debt issuance costs and debt discounts related to the 2026 Notes, 2028 Notes, 2031
Notes and 2052 Notes were $6.4 million, $5.3 million, $13.0 million and $9.3 million, respectively.
Redemption of 5.375% Senior Notes due 2027
On June 2, 2021, we redeemed all outstanding principal amount under the 5.375% Senior Notes due 2027 with a portion of the
net cash proceeds from the issuance of the 2026 Notes, 2028 Notes, 2031 Notes, and 2052 Notes as described above. In
connection with the redemption, we incurred $100.6 million of loss on debt extinguishment, including $90.7 million redemption
premium that was paid in cash and $9.9 million related to the write-off of unamortized debt issuance costs.
All of our senior notes are unsecured and rank equal in right of payment to our existing or future senior indebtedness and senior
in right of payment to our existing and future subordinated indebtedness. Interest on the senior notes is paid semi-annually in
arrears. The senior notes are effectively subordinated to all of the existing and future secured debt, including debt outstanding
under any bank facility or secured by any mortgage, to the extent of the assets securing such debt. They are also structurally
subordinated to any existing and future indebtedness and other liabilities (including trade payables) of any of our subsidiaries.
Each series of senior notes is governed by an indenture and a supplemental indenture between us and U.S. Bank National
Association, as trustee. These supplemental indentures contain covenants that limit our ability and the ability of our subsidiaries to,
among other things:
•incur liens;
•enter into sale-leaseback transactions; and
•merge or consolidate with any other person.
As of December 31, 2021, we are in compliance with all covenants. Subject to compliance with the limitations described above,
we may issue an unlimited principal amount of additional notes at later dates under the same indenture as the senior notes.
We are not required to make any mandatory redemption with respect to the senior notes; however, upon the event of a change
in control, we may be required to offer to purchase the senior notes.
Optional Redemption
With respect to the rest of the Notes listed below, we may redeem at our election, at any time or from time to time, some or all
of the notes of any series before they mature. The redemption price will equal the sum of (1) an amount equal to one hundred
percent (100%) of the principal amount of the notes being redeemed plus accrued and unpaid interest up to, but not including, the
redemption date and (2) a make-whole premium. If the Notes are
F-46
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
redeemed on or after the First Par Call Date listed in the table below, the redemption price will not include a make-whole premium
for the applicable notes.
Senior Notes Description First Par Call Date
2.625% Senior Notes due 2024 October 18, 2024
1.000% Senior Notes due 2025 August 15, 2025
1.250% Senior Notes due 2025 June 15, 2025
2.900% Senior Notes due 2026 September 18, 2026
1.800% Senior Notes due 2027 May 15, 2027
1.550% Senior Notes due 2028 January 15, 2028
3.200% Senior Notes due 2029 August 18, 2029
2.150% Senior Notes due 2030 April 15, 2030
3.000% Senior Notes due 2050 January 15, 2050
2.950% Senior Notes due 2051 March 15, 2051
0.250% Euro Senior Notes due 2027 January 15, 2027
1.000% Euro Senior Notes due 2033 December 15, 2032
1.450% Senior Notes due 2026 April 15, 2026
2.000% Senior Notes due 2028 March 15, 2028
2.500% Senior Notes due 2031 February 15, 2031
3.400% Senior Notes due 2052 August 15, 2051
Maturities of Debt Instruments
The following table sets forth maturities of our debt, including mortgage and loans payable, and senior notes, gross of debt
issuance costs, debt discounts and debt premiums, as of December 31, 2021 (in thousands):
Years ending:
2022 $ 582,783 
2023 6,664 
2024 1,006,230 
2025 1,204,640 
2026 1,304,770 
Thereafter 7,617,061 
$11,722,148 
Fair Value of Debt Instruments
The following table sets forth the estimated fair values of our mortgage and loans payable and senior notes, including current
maturities, as of December 31 (in thousands):
2021 2020
Mortgage and loans payable $ 621,051 $ 1,379,129 
Senior notes 11,049,834 9,705,486 
The fair values of the mortgage and loans payable, which are not publicly traded, were estimated by considering our credit
rating, current rates available to us for debt of the same remaining maturities and terms of the debt (Level 2). The fair value of the
senior notes, which are traded in the public debt market, was based on quoted market prices (Level 1).
F-47
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
Interest Charges
The following table sets forth total interest costs incurred, and total interest costs capitalized for the years ended December 31
(in thousands):
2021 2020 2019
Interest expense $ 336,082 $ 406,466 $ 479,684 
Interest capitalized 24,505 26,750 32,173 
Interest charges incurred $ 360,587 $ 433,216 $ 511,857 
Total interest paid in cash, net of capitalized interest, during the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 was $401.9
million, $471.7 million and $521.6 million, respectively.
12.    Stockholders' Equity
Our authorized share capital is 300,000,000 shares of common stock and 100,000,000 shares of preferred stock, of which
25,000,000 is designated Series A, 25,000,000 is designated as Series A-1 and 50,000,000 is undesignated. As of December 31,
2021 and 2020, we had no preferred stock issued and outstanding.
Common Stock
In March 2019, we issued and sold 2,985,575 shares of common stock in a public offering pursuant to a registration statement
and a related prospectus and prospectus supplement. We received net proceeds of approximately $1.2 billion, net of underwriting
discounts, commissions and offering expenses. In May 2020, we issued and sold 2,587,500 shares of common stock in a public
offering pursuant to a registration statement and a related prospectus and prospectus supplement. We received net proceeds of
approximately $1.7 billion, net of underwriting discounts, commissions and offering expenses.
In December 2018, we established an "at the market" equity offering program (the "2018 ATM Program"), under which we
could, from time to time, offer and sell shares of our common stock to or through sales agents up to an aggregate of $750.0 million.
For the years ended December 31, 2020, and 2019, we sold 415,512 shares and 903,555 shares, respectively, for approximately
$298.3 million and $447.5 million, respectively, net of payment of commissions to sales agents and other offering expenses, under
the 2018 ATM Program. As of December 31, 2020, no shares remained available for sale under the 2018 ATM Program. In October
2020, we established another ATM program, under which we may, from time to time, offer and sell up to an aggregate of $1.5 billion
of our common stock to or through sales agents in "at the market" transactions (the "2020 ATM Program"). For the year ended
December 31, 2021, we sold 637,617 shares for approximately $497.9 million, net of payment of commissions to sales agents and
other offering expenses, under the 2020 ATM Program. For the year ended December 31, 2020, we did not sell any shares under
the 2020 ATM Program.
As of December 31, 2021, we had reserved the following authorized but unissued shares of common stock for future issuances:
Common stock options and restricted stock units 5,327,514 
Common stock employee purchase plans 2,640,649 
Total 7,968,163 
F-48
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Loss
The changes in accumulated other comprehensive loss, net of tax, by components are as follows (in thousands):
December 31,
2018Net
ChangeDecember 31,
2019Net
ChangeDecember 31,
2020Net
ChangeDecember 31,
2021
Foreign currency translation adjustment
("CTA") gain (loss) $ (998,603)$(58,315)$(1,056,918)$548,503 $ (508,415)$ (559,984)$(1,068,399)
Unrealized gain (loss) on cash flow hedges 19,480 (3,842) 15,638 (82,790) (67,152) 60,562 (6,590)
Net investment hedge CTA gain (loss) 34,325 73,294 107,619 (444,553) (336,934) 326,982 (9,952)
Net actuarial gain (loss) on defined benefit
plans (904) (48) (952) 85 (867) 57 (810)
$ (945,702)$ 11,089 $ (934,613)$ 21,245 $ (913,368)$ (172,383)$(1,085,751)
Refer to Note 8 for a discussion of the amounts reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive loss to net income.
We have a defined benefit pension plan coverin g all employees in two countries where such plans are mandated by law. We do not have
any defined benefit plans in any other countries. The unamortized gain (loss) on defined bene fit plans includes gains or losses resulting
from a change in the value of either the projected benefit obligation or the plan assets resulting from a change in an actuarial assumption,
net of amortization.
Changes in foreign currencies can have a significant impact to our consolidated balance sheets (as evidenced above in our
foreign currency translation loss), as well as its consolidated results of operations, as amounts in foreign currencies are generally
translated into more U.S. dollars when the U.S. dollar weakens or less U.S. dollars when the U.S. dollar strengthens. As of
December 31, 2021, the U.S. dollar was generally stronger relative to certain of the currencies of the foreign countries in which we
operate as compared to December 31, 2020. Because of this, the U.S. dollar had an overall unfavorable impact on our consolidated
financial position because the foreign denominations translated into fewer U.S. dollars as evidenced by an increase in foreign
currency translation loss for the year ended December 31, 2021 as reflected in the above table. The volatility of the U.S. dollar as
compared to the other currencies in which we operate could have a significant impact on our consolidated financial position and
results of operations including the amount of revenue that we report in future periods.(1)
(1)
(2)
(1)
(2)
F-49
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
Dividends
During the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, our Board of Directors declared quarterly dividends whose
treatment for federal income tax purposes were as follows:
Declaration Date Record Date Payment Date Total Distribution Nonqualified Ordinary
Dividend Total Distribution
Amount
(per share) (in thousands)
Fiscal 2021
2/10/2021 2/24/2021 3/17/2021 $ 2.870000  $ 2.870000  $ 256,321  
4/28/2021 5/19/2021 6/16/2021 2.870000  2.870000  257,199  
7/28/2021 8/18/2021 9/22/2021 2.870000  2.870000  257,769  
11/3/2021 11/17/2021 12/15/2021 2.870000  2.870000  258,716  
Total $ 11.480000  $ 11.480000  $ 1,030,005  
Fiscal 2020
2/12/2020 2/26/2020 3/18/2020 $ 2.660000  $ 2.660000  $ 227,386  
5/6/2020 5/20/2020 6/17/2020 2.660000  2.660000  235,449  
7/29/2020 8/19/2020 9/23/2020 2.660000  2.660000  236,424  
10/28/2020 11/18/2020 12/9/2020 2.660000  2.660000  237,010  
Total $ 10.640000  $ 10.640000  $ 936,269  
Fiscal 2019
2/13/2019 2/27/2019 3/20/2019 $ 2.460000  $ 2.460000  $ 198,933  
5/1/2019 5/22/2019 6/19/2019 2.460000  2.460000  207,949  
7/31/2019 8/21/2019 9/18/2019 2.460000  2.460000  209,226  
10/30/2019 11/20/2019 12/11/2019 2.460000  2.460000  209,785  
Total $ 9.840000  $ 9.840000  $ 825,893  
Common stock dividends are characterized for federal income tax purposes as nonqualified ordinary dividend, qualified ordinary dividend,
capital gains  or return of capital. During the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, we did not classify any portion of the
distributions as qualified ordinary dividend, capital gains or return of capital.
All nonqualified ordinary dividends are eligible for the 20% deduction generally allowable to non-corporate shareholders under Internal
Revenue Code Section 199A.
In addition, as of December 31, 2021, for dividends and special distributions attributed to the RSUs, we recorded a short term
dividend payable of $12.0 million and a long term dividend payable of $9.7 million for the RSUs that have not yet vested. As
of December 31, 2020, for dividends and special distributions attributed to the RSUs, we recorded a short term dividend payable of
$10.9 million and a long term dividend payable of $7.9 million for the RSUs that have not yet vested.
13.    Stock-Based Compensation
Equity Compensation Plans
As of December 31, 2021, our equity compensation plans include:
•2000 Equity Incentive Plan: Under the 2000 Equity Incentive Plan, nonstatutory stock options, RSAs, RSUs and stock
appreciation rights may be granted to employees, outside directors and consultants at not less than 85% of the fair value on
the date of grant, and incentive stock options may be granted to employees at not less than 100% of the fair value on the
date of grant. Equity awards granted under the 2000 Equity Incentive Plan generally vest over 4 years. On June 18, 2020,
the 2000 Equity Incentive Plan was terminated and replaced by the 2020 Equity Incentive Plan (the "2020 Equity Incentive
Plan").(1) (2)
(1)
(2)
F-50
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
•2000 Director Option Plan: Under the 2000 Director Option Plan, each non-employee board member who was not
previously an employee would receive an automatic initial nonstatutory stock option grant as well as an annual non-
statutory stock option grant on the date of our regular Annual Meeting of Stockholders. On December 18, 2008, our Board
of Directors passed resolutions eliminating all automatic stock option grant mechanisms under the 2000 Director Option
Plan and replaced them with an automatic RSU grant mechanism under the 2000 Equity Incentive Plan. On June 18, 2020,
the 2000 Director Option Plan was terminated and all shares remaining available under this Plan were retired.
•2001 Supplemental Stock Plan: Under the 2001 Supplemental Stock Plan, non-statutory stock options and RSAs/RSUs
may be granted to consultants and employees who are not executive officers or board members, at not less than 85% of
the fair value on the date of grant. Current stock options granted under the 2001 Supplemental Stock Plan generally vest
over four years. On June 18, 2020, the 2001 Supplemental Stock Plan was terminated and all shares remaining available
under this Plan were retired.
•2004 Employee Stock Purchase Plan (the "2004 Purchase Plan"): The 2004 Purchase Plan permits eligible employees to
purchase common stock on favorable terms via payroll deductions of up to 15% of the employee's cash compensation,
subject to certain share and statutory dollar limits. Two overlapping offering periods commence during each calendar year,
on each February 15 and August 15 or such other periods or dates as determined by the Compensation Committee from
time to time, and the offering periods last up to 24 months with a purchase date every 6 months. The price of each share
purchased is 85% of the lower of a) the fair value per share of common stock on the last trading day before the
commencement of the applicable offering period or b) the fair value per share of common stock on the purchase date.
•2020 Equity Incentive Plan: On April 23, 2020, our Board of Directors approved the 2020 Equity Plan, which provides for
the grant of stock options, including incentive stock options and non-qualified stock options, stock appreciation rights,
RSAs, RSUs, other stock-based incentive awards, dividend equivalents, and cash-based incentive awards. The 2020
Equity Plan's awards may be granted to employees, non-employee members of the Board and consultants. Equity awards
granted under the 2020 Equity Incentive Plan generally vest over four years. The maximum numbers of shares of our
common stock available for issuance under the 2020 Equity Plan is equal to the sum of 4.0 million shares and the shares
transferred from the 2000 Equity Incentive Plan.
The Equity compensation plans are administered by the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors (the
"Compensation Committee"), and the Compensation Committee may terminate or amend these plans, with approval of the
stockholders as may be required by applicable law, at any time. As of December 31, 2021, shares reserved and available for
issuance under the equity compensation plans are as follows:
Shares reserved Shares available for grant
2004 Purchase Plan 5,392,206 2,640,649 
2020 Equity Incentive Plan 4,660,322 3,969,920 
F-51
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
Restricted Stock Units
Since 2008, we primarily grant RSUs to our employees, including executives and non-employee directors, in lieu of stock
options. We generally grant RSUs that have a service condition only or have both a service and performance condition. Each RSU
is not considered issued and outstanding and does not have voting rights until it is converted into one share of our common stock
upon vesting. RSUs activity is summarized as follows:
Number of
Shares
OutstandingWeighted
Average Grant
Date Fair V alue
per ShareWeighted
Average
Remaining
Contractual Life
(Years)Aggregate
Intrinsic V alue 
(Dollars in
Thousands)
RSUs outstanding, December 31, 2018 1,226,787 $ 361.22 
RSUs granted 779,478 448.16 
RSUs released, vested (549,259) 362.66 
Special distribution shares released (1,781) 295.31 
RSUs canceled (142,477) 364.42 
Special distribution shares canceled (23) 297.04 
RSUs outstanding, December 31, 2019 1,312,725 411.99 
RSUs granted 695,383 596.80 
RSUs released, vested (606,250) 426.03 
Special distribution shares released (722) 264.57 
RSUs canceled (63,502) 457.91 
RSUs outstanding, December 31, 2020 1,337,634 499.60 
RSUs granted 776,628 679.59 
RSUs released, vested (633,466) 505.40 
Special distribution shares released (34) 297.03 
RSUs canceled (123,168) 561.34 
RSUs outstanding, December 31, 2021 1,357,594 $ 594.27 1.23$ 1,148,307 
The intrinsic value is calculated based on the market value of the stock as of December 31, 2021.
The total fair value of RSUs vested and released during the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 was $472.9
million, $417.0 million and $269.1 million, respectively.
Employee Stock Purchase Plan
We provide the following disclosures for the 2004 Purchase Plan as of December 31 (dollars, except shares):
2021 2020 2019
Weighted-average purchase price per share $ 467.59 $ 371.71 $ 354.72 
Weighted average grant-date fair value per share of shares purchased $ 138.80 $ 114.08 $ 104.84 
Number of shares purchased 166,023 167,113 146,640 
We use the Black-Scholes option-pricing model to determine the fair value of shares under the 2004 Purchase Plan with the
following assumptions during the years ended December 31:(1)
(1)
F-52
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
2021 2020 2019
Range of dividend yield 1.58 - 1.77% 1.94 - 2.08% 2.07 - 2.09%
Range of risk-free interest rate 0.01 - 0.21% 0.10 - 1.55% 1.55 - 2.58%
Range of expected volatility 25.54 - 41.24% 19.28 - 51.93% 19.27 - 25.55%
Weighted-average expected volatility 34.08 % 32.94 % 22.95 %
Weighted average expected life (in years) 1.18 1.36 1.24
Stock-Based Compensation
The following table presents, by operating expense, our stock-based compensation expense recognized in our consolidated
statement of operations for the years ended December 31 (in thousands):
2021 2020 2019
Cost of revenues $ 38,438 $ 32,893 $ 25,355 
Sales and marketing 79,144 72,895 56,719 
General and administrative 246,192 205,232 154,465 
Total $ 363,774 $ 311,020 $ 236,539 
Our stock-based compensation recognized in the consolidated statement of operations was comprised of the following types of
equity awards for the years ended December 31 (in thousands):
2021 2020 2019
RSUs $ 330,077 $ 289,426 $ 217,541 
RSAs 10,067 8,289 — 
Employee stock purchase plan 23,630 13,305 18,998 
Total $ 363,774 $ 311,020 $ 236,539 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, we awarded 48,799  shares of RSAs. See Note 1 for further discussion.
During the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, we capitalized $27.7 million, $20.3 million and $9.1 million,
respectively, of stock-based compensation expense as construction in progress in property, plant and equipment.
As of December 31, 2021, the total stock-based compensation cost related to unvested equity awards not yet recognized, net of
estimated forfeitures, totaled $629.4 million which is expected to be recognized over a weighted-average period of 2.10 years.
14.    Income Taxes
Income before income taxes is attributable to the following geographic locations for the years ended December 31, (in
thousands):
2021 2020 2019
Domestic $ 137,492 $ 18,395 $ 328,806 
Foreign 471,460 497,830 363,791 
Income before income taxes $ 608,952 $ 516,225 $ 692,597 (1)
(1) 
F-53
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
The tax benefit (expenses) for income taxes consisted of the following components for the years ended December 31, (in
thousands):
2021 2020 2019
Current:
Federal $ 7,753 $ 4,552 $ (17,906)
State and local (156) 1,597 (4,624)
Foreign (76,450) (171,092) (135,356)
Subtotal (68,853) (164,943) (157,886)
Deferred:
Federal 11,060 16,553 (7,459)
State and local (1,411) 704 (1,775)
Foreign (50,020) 1,535 (18,232)
Subtotal (40,371) 18,792 (27,466)
Income tax expense $ (109,224)$ (146,151)$ (185,352)
State and foreign taxes not based on income are included in general and administrative expenses and the aggregate amounts
were not significant for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019.
The fiscal 2021, 2020, and 2019 income tax benefit (expenses) differed from the amounts computed by applying the U.S.
federal income tax rate of 21% to pre-tax income as a result of the following for the years ended December 31 (in thousands):
2021 2020 2019
Federal tax at statutory rate $ (127,880)$ (109,906)$ (145,445)
State and local tax (expense) benefit (1,513) 2,071 (5,852)
Deferred tax assets generated in current year not benefited (19,703) (12,852) (5,398)
Foreign income tax rate differential (18,918) (16,364) (11,610)
Non-deductible expenses (10,579) (4,427) (1,021)
Stock-based compensation expense (1,385) (954) (2,105)
Change in valuation allowance (595) 390 (2,870)
Foreign financing activities (4,805) (11,743) (18,738)
Loss on divestments — — (3,277)
Uncertain tax positions reserve 50,059 (38,014) (35,724)
Tax adjustments related to REIT 39,164 50,107 63,614 
Change in deferred tax adjustments (1,251) (136) (10,574)
Effect of tax rate change on deferred tax assets (12,297) — — 
Other, net 479 (4,323) (6,352)
Total income tax expense $ (109,224)$ (146,151)$ (185,352)
Of the unrecognized tax benefits being realized in the year ended December 31, 2021, approximately $32.0 million is related to
the uncertain tax position inherited from the Metronode Acquisition in 2018, which is related to an outstanding income tax audit at
the time of the acquisition. The uncertain tax position was covered by an indemnification agreement with the Seller. The income tax
audit was settled during 2021, as such, the realization of the unrecognized tax benefits resulted in an impairment of the
indemnification asset for the same amount, which has been included in Other Income (Expense) on the Consolidated Statements of
Operations for the year ended December 31, 2021.
Our accounting policy is to treat any tax on Global Intangible Low-Taxed Income ("GILTI") inclusions as a current period cost
included in the tax expense in the year incurred. We believe the GILTI inclusion provision will
F-54
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
result in no material financial statement impact provided we satisfy our REIT distribution requirement with respect to the GILTI
inclusions.
As a result of our conversion to a REIT effective January 1, 2015, it is no longer our intent to indefinitely reinvest undistributed
foreign earnings. However, no deferred tax liability has been recognized to account for this change because the expected recovery
of the basis difference will not result in material U.S. taxes in the post-REIT conversion periods due to the fact that the majority of
our foreign subsidiaries are either QRSs or owned directly by our REIT and QRSs, and the foreign withholding tax effect would be
immaterial. We continue to assess the foreign withholding tax impact of our current policy and do not believe the distribution of our
foreign earnings would trigger any significant foreign withholding taxes, as the majority of the foreign jurisdictions where we operate
do not impose withholding taxes on dividend distributions to a corporate U.S. parent.
The types of temporary differences that give rise to significant portions of our deferred tax assets and liabilities are set out
below as of December 31 (in thousands):
2021 2020 
Deferred tax assets:
Stock-based compensation expense $ 9,057 $ 5,583 
Net unrealized losses — 17,268 
Operating lease liabilities 225,261 187,912 
Capital lease liabilities 13,927 26,655 
Deferred revenue 14,429 10,785 
Loss carryforwards and tax credits 201,132 117,150 
Others, net 7,257 4,296 
Gross deferred tax assets 471,063 369,649 
Valuation allowance (100,746) (82,344)
Total deferred tax assets, net 370,317 287,305 
Deferred tax liabilities:
Net unrealized gains (1,462) — 
Property, plant and equipment (262,532) (145,314)
Right-of-use assets (233,199) (201,714)
Deferred income (33,052) (31,538)
Intangible assets (120,543) (132,681)
Total deferred tax liabilities (650,788) (511,247)
Net deferred tax liabilities $ (280,471)$ (223,942)
 The prior year amounts presented in the table above have been reclassified to conform with the current year presentation.
The tax basis of REIT assets, excluding investments in TRSs, is greater than the amounts reported for such assets in the
accompanying consolidated balance sheet by approximately $2.2 billion as of December 31, 2021.
Our accounting for deferred taxes involves weighing positive and negative evidence concerning the realizability of our deferred
tax assets in each taxing jurisdiction. After considering evidence such as the nature, frequency and severity of current and
cumulative financial reporting losses, the sources of future taxable income, taxable income in carryback years permitted by the tax
laws and tax planning strategies, we concluded that valuation allowances were required in certain jurisdictions. The operations in
most of the jurisdictions for which a valuation allowance has been established have a history of significant losses as of
December 31, 2021. As such, we do not believe these operations have established a sustained history of profitability and that a
valuation allowance is, therefore, necessary. We also provided a valuation allowance against certain gross deferred tax assets in
certain taxing jurisdictions as these deferred tax assets are not expected to be realizable in the foreseeable future.(1)
(1)
F-55
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
Changes in the valuation allowance for deferred tax assets for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 are as
follows (in thousands):
2021 2020 2019
Beginning balance $ 82,344 $ 57,812 $ 57,003 
Amounts from acquisitions 964 5,777 (2,707)
Divested balances — — (351)
Amounts recognized into income 595 (390) 2,870 
Current increase 19,539 15,044 697 
Impact of foreign currency exchange (2,696) 4,101 300 
Ending balance $ 100,746 $ 82,344 $ 57,812 
Our NOL carryforwards for federal, state and foreign tax purposes which expire, if not utilized, at various intervals from 2022,
are outlined below (in thousands):
Expiration Date Federal State Foreign Total
2022 $ 20,808 $ — $ 754 $ 21,562 
2023 to 2025 26,838 112 25,876 52,826 
2026 to 2028 12,186 — 12,560 24,746 
2029 to 2031 — 767 32,849 33,616 
2032 to 2034 394 822 — 1,216 
2035 to 2037 6,739 2,491 3,838 13,068 
Thereafter 437,683 80,613 488,897 1,007,193 
$ 504,648 $ 84,805 $ 564,774 $ 1,154,227 
The total amount of NOL carryforwards that will not be available to offset our future taxable income after the dividends paid deduction due
to Section 382 limitations was $ 56.7 million for federal.
In certain jurisdictions, the net operating loss carryforwards can only be used to of fset a percentage of taxable income in a given year .
If certa in substantial changes in the entity's owne rship occur or have determined to have occurre d, there may be a limitation on the amount
of the carryforwards that can be utilized.
As of December 31, 2021, we had tax credit carryforwards of $7.2 million, which expire, if not utilized, from 2022 to 2031. We
also had capital losses of $8.0 million, which can be carried forward indefinitely.
The beginning and ending balances of our unrecognized tax benefits are reconciled below for the years ended December 31 (in
thousands):
2021 2020 2019
Beginning balance $ 207,759 $ 173,726 $ 150,930 
Gross increases related to prior year tax positions 4,547 14,732 — 
Gross decreases related to prior year tax positions (58,356) — (1,160)
Gross increases related to current year tax positions 10,000 29,149 31,332 
Decreases resulting from expiration of statute of limitation (10,561) (6,518) (2,112)
Decreases resulting from settlements (5,089) (3,330) (5,264)
Ending balance $ 148,300 $ 207,759 $ 173,726 
We recognize interest and penalties related to unrecognized tax benefits within income tax expense in the consolidated
statements of operations. We accrued $13.6 million, $21.3 million, and $14.2 million for interest and penalties as of December 31,
2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively.(1) (2) (3)
(1)
(2)
(3)
F-56
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
The unrecognized tax benefits of $148.3 million as of December 31, 2021, of which $3.4 million is subject to an indemnification
agreement, if subsequently recognized, will affect our effective tax rate favorably at the time when such a benefit is recognized.
Due to various tax years open for examination and the ongoing tax audits and inquiries by the tax authorities in different
jurisdictions, it is reasonably possible that the balance of unrecognized tax benefits could significantly increase or decrease over the
next 12 months as we may be subject to either examination by tax authorities, tax audit settlements, or a lapse in statute of
limitations. We are currently unable to estimate the range of possible adjustments to the balance of unrecognized tax benefits.
In general, our income tax returns for the years from 2018 through the current year remain open to examination by federal and
state taxing authorities. In addition, our tax years of 2005 through current year remain open and subject to examination by local tax
authorities in certain foreign jurisdictions in which we have major operations.
15.    Commitments and Contingencies
Purchase Commitments
As a result of our various IBX data center expansion projects, as of December 31, 2021, we were contractually committed for
approximately $1.0 billion of unaccrued capital expenditures, primarily for IBX infrastructure equipment not yet delivered and labor
not yet provided, in connection with the work necessary to open these IBX data centers and make them available to our customers
for installation. We also had numerous other, non-capital purchase commitments in place as of December 31, 2021, such as
commitments to purchase power in select locations through 2022 and thereafter, and other open purchase orders for goods, or
services to be delivered or provided during 2022 and thereafter. Such other miscellaneous purchase commitments totaled
approximately $1.3 billion as of December 31, 2021. For further information on our equity method investments contribution
commitments and lease commitments, see Notes 6 and Note 10, respectively, above.
Contingent Liabilities
We estimate our exposure on certain liabilities, such as indirect and property taxes, based on the best information available at
the time of determination. With respect to real and personal property taxes, we record what we can reasonably estimate based on
prior payment history, assessed value by the assessor's office, current landlord estimates or estimates based on current or
changing fixed asset values in each specific municipality, as applicable. However, there are circumstances beyond our control
whereby the underlying value of the property or basis for which the tax is calculated on the property may change, such as a landlord
selling the underlying property of one of our IBX data center leases or a municipality changing the assessment value in a jurisdiction
and, as a result, our property tax obligations may vary from period to period. Based upon the most current facts and circumstances,
we make the necessary property tax accruals for each of our reporting periods. However, revisions in our estimates of the potential
or actual liability could materially impact our financial position, results of operations or cash flows.
Our indirect and property tax filings in various jurisdictions are subject to examination by local tax authorities. Although we
believe that we have adequately assessed and accounted for our potential tax liabilities, and that our tax estimates are reasonable,
there can be no certainty that additional taxes will not be due upon audit of our tax returns or as a result of further changes to the
tax laws and interpretations thereof. For example, we are currently undergoing an audit and appealing the tentative assessment in
Brazil. The final settlement of the audit and the outcomes of the appeal are uncertain and may not be resolved in our favor. We
regularly assess the likelihood of adverse outcomes resulting from these examinations and appeals that would affect the adequacy
of our tax accruals for each of the reporting periods. If any issues arising from the tax examinations and appeals are resolved in a
manner inconsistent with our expectations, the revision of the estimates of the potential or actual liabilities could materially impact
the financial position, results of operations, or cash flows.
From time to time, we may have certain contingent liabilities that arise in the ordinary course of our business activities.
Contingent liabilities are accrued when it is probable that future expenditures will be made and such expenditures can be
reasonably estimated. In the opinion of management, there are no pending claims for which
F-57
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
the outcome is expected to result in a material adverse effect in the financial position, results of operations or cash flows.
Employment Agreements
We have entered into a severance agreement with certain of our executive officers that provides for a severance payment equal
to 100% of the executive officer's annual base salary and maximum bonus in the event his or her employment is terminated for any
reason other than cause or he or she voluntarily resigns under certain circumstances as described in the agreement, or 200% of the
executive officer's annual base salary and maximum bonus in the event this occurs after a change-in-control of our company. For
certain other executive officers, these benefits are only triggered after a change-in-control of our company, in which case the officer
is entitled to 200% of the executive officer's annual base salary and maximum bonus. In addition, under these agreements, the
executive officer is entitled to the payment of his or her monthly health care premiums under the Consolidated Omnibus Budget
Reconciliation Act for up to 24 months.
Indemnification and Guarantor Arrangements
As permitted under Delaware law, we have agreements whereby we indemnify our officers and directors for certain events or
occurrences while the officer or director is, or was serving, at our request in such capacity. The term of the indemnification period is
for the officer's or director's lifetime. The maximum potential amount of future payments we could be required to make under these
indemnification agreements is unlimited; however, we have a director and officer insurance policy that could limit our exposure and
enable us to recover a portion of any future amounts paid. As a result of our insurance policy that could limit our exposure and
enable us to recover some or all of amounts paid, our estimated fair value of these indemnification agreements is minimal. We have
no liabilities recorded for these agreements as of December 31, 2021.
We enter into standard indemnification agreements in the ordinary course of business. Pursuant to these agreements, we
indemnify, hold harmless, and agree to reimburse the indemnified party for losses suffered or incurred by the indemnified party,
generally our business partners or customers, in connection with any U.S. patent, or any copyright or other intellectual property
infringement claim by any third party with respect to our offerings. The term of these indemnification agreements is generally
perpetual any time after execution of the agreement. The maximum potential amount of future payments we could be required to
make under these indemnification agreements is unlimited; however, we have never incurred material costs to defend lawsuits or
settle claims related to these indemnification agreements. As a result, our estimated fair value of these agreements is minimal. We
have no liabilities recorded for these agreements as of December 31, 2021.
We enter into arrangements with our business partners, whereby the business partner agrees to provide services as a
subcontractor for our installations. Accordingly, we enter into standard indemnification agreements with our customers, whereby we
indemnify them for other acts, such as personal property damage, of our subcontractors. The maximum potential amount of future
payments we could be required to make under these indemnification agreements is unlimited; however, we have general and
umbrella insurance policies that could enable us to recover a portion of any amounts paid. We have never incurred material costs to
defend lawsuits or settle claims related to these indemnification agreements. As a result, our estimated fair value of these
agreements is minimal. We do not have significant liabilities recorded for these agreements as of December 31, 2021.
We have service level commitment obligations to certain of our customers. As a result, service interruptions or significant
equipment damage in our IBX data centers, whether or not within our control, could result in service level commitments to these
customers. Our liability insurance may not be adequate to cover those expenses. In addition, any loss of services, equipment
damage or inability to meet our service level commitment obligations could reduce the confidence of our customers and could
consequently impair our ability to obtain and retain customers, which would adversely affect both our ability to generate revenues
and our operating results. We generally have the ability to determine such service level credits prior to the associated revenue
being recognized. We do not have significant liabilities in connection with service level credits as of December 31, 2021.
F-58
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
Concurrent with the closing of the EMEA 2 Joint Venture, the EMEA 2 Joint Venture entered into credit facility agreements with
a group of lenders under which it could borrow up to approximately $1.4 billion in total at the exchange rate in effect on December
31, 2021, with such facilities maturing in 2025 and 2026. In connection with our 20% equity investment in the EMEA 2 Joint Venture,
we provided the lenders with guarantees covering 20% of all payments of principal and interest due and payable by the EMEA 2
Joint Venture under these credit facilities, up to a limit of $310.8 million in total at the exchange rate in effect on December 31, 2021.
As of December 31, 2021, the maximum potential amount of our future payments under these guarantees was approximately
$38.1 million, at the exchange rates in effect on that date. Our estimated fair value of these guarantees is minimal as the likelihood
of making a payout under the guarantees is low.
16.    Related Party Transactions
Joint Venture Related Party Transactions
We have lease arrangements and provide various services to the EMEA 1 Joint Venture, Asia-Pacific 1 Joint Venture and
EMEA 2 Joint Venture (the "Joint Ventures") through multiple agreements, including sales and marketing, development
management, facilities management, and asset management services. These transactions are generally considered to have been
negotiated at arm's length. The following table presents the revenues and expenses from these arrangements with the Joint
Ventures in our consolidated statements of operations (in thousands):
Years Ended December 31,
Related Party Nature of T ransaction 2021 2020 2019
EMEA 1 Joint Venture Revenues $ 42,387 $ 21,306 $ 3,707 
EMEA 1 Joint Venture Expenses 8,303 14,935 2,076 
Asia-Pacific 1 Joint Venture Revenues 21,223 588 — 
EMEA 2 Joint Venture Revenues 7,097 — — 
We have a sub-lease agreement with the EMEA  1 Joint Venture to sub-lease a portion of Londo n ("LD") 10-2 data center or former LD10
data center , for a total of 15 years. Balances primarily consist of rent expenses for the LD10-2 data center .
The following table presents the assets and liabilities from related party transactions with the Joint Ventures in our consolidated
balance sheets (in thousands):
As of December 31,
Related Party Balance Sheet Line Item 2021 2020
EMEA 1 Joint Venture Receivables $ 32,077 $ 6,459 
Contract Assets 54,503 5,614 
Finance Lease Right of Use  Assets 118,817 127,197 
Other Liabilities and Payables 2,483 17,646 
Other Liabilities and Payables - construction obligation39,382 55,607 
Deferred Revenue 16,886 — 
Finance Lease Right of Use  Liabilities 124,918 130,756 
Asia- Pacific 1 Joint Venture Receivables 2,124 16,936 
Payables 121 — 
EMEA 2 Joint Venture Receivables 26,953 — 
Contract Assets 1,492 — 
Payables 1,755 — (1)
(1)
(1)
(2)
(3)
F-59
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
A portion of the EMEA  1 Joint Venture contract asset balance relates to commitments to complete a residual portion of the Paris 9 data
center sold to the EMEA  1 Joint V enture, which is reimbursable in full upon completion.
Balance as of Decembe r 31, 2021 primarily pertained to commercial service agreements. Balan ce as of December 31, 2020 pertained to
the lease agreement in place for the construction of the Frankfurt 9 xScale data center . As of December 31, 2021 the lease has
commenced and was accounted as a sale-type lease.
Balances primarily relate to obligations to pay for future construction for certain sites sold as a part of the EMEA  1 Joint Venture
transaction. The prior year amounts presented in the table above have been reclassified to conform with the current year presentation.
We have also sold certain data center facilities to our Joint Ventures and recognized gains or losses on asset sales; for more
information refer to Note 5 above.
Other Related Party Transactions
We have several significant stockholders and other related parties that are also customers and/or vendors. Our activity of other
related party transactions was as follows (in thousands):
Years ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
Revenues $ 140,947 $ 95,264 $ 25,905 
Costs and services 5,337 10,849 15,844 
As of December 31,
2021 2020
Accounts receivable $ 27,997 $ 6,519 
Accounts payable 20 — 
17.    Segment Information
While we have one primary line of business, which is the design, build-out and operation of IBX data centers, we have
determined that we have three reportable segments comprised of our Americas, EMEA and Asia-Pacific geographic regions. Our
chief operating decision-maker evaluates performance, makes operating decisions and allocates resources based on our revenues
and adjusted EBITDA performance both on a consolidated basis and based on these three reportable segments. Intercompany
transactions between segments are excluded for management reporting purposes.
The following tables present revenue information disaggregated by product lines and geographic areas (in thousands):
Year Ended December 31, 2021
Americas EMEA Asia-Pacific Total
Colocation $2,002,253 $1,597,830 $1,042,131 $4,642,214 
Interconnection 678,677 259,538 223,287 1,161,502 
Managed infrastructure 168,577 124,937 87,343 380,857 
Other 12,430 19,626 3,856 35,912 
Recurring revenues 2,861,937 2,001,931 1,356,617 6,220,485 
Non-recurring revenues 159,814 153,285 101,953 415,052 
Total $3,021,751 $2,155,216 $1,458,570 $6,635,537 
Includes some leasing and hedging activities.(1)
(2)
(3)
(1)
(1)
(1)    
F-60
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
Year Ended December 31, 2020
Americas EMEA Asia-Pacific Total
Colocation $1,820,709 $1,504,770 $ 933,522 $4,259,001 
Interconnection 622,327 213,490 187,441 1,023,258 
Managed infrastructure 120,159 127,722 89,464 337,345 
Other 19,605 18,738 83 38,426 
Recurring revenues 2,582,800 1,864,720 1,210,510 5,658,030 
Non-recurring revenues 124,958 131,669 83,888 340,515 
Total $2,707,758 $1,996,389 $1,294,398 $5,998,545 
Includes some leasing and hedging activities.
Year Ended December 31, 2019
Americas EMEA Asia-Pacific Total
Colocation $1,769,654 $1,395,544 $ 857,009 $4,022,207 
Interconnection 576,709 161,552 155,328 893,589 
Managed infrastructure 90,262 113,631 88,735 292,628 
Other 19,743 10,019 — 29,762 
Recurring revenues 2,456,368 1,680,746 1,101,072 5,238,186 
Non-recurring revenues 131,359 125,698 66,897 323,954 
Total $2,587,727 $1,806,444 $1,167,969 $5,562,140 
Includes some leasing and hedging activities.
Total revenues attributed to the U.S. were $2.6 billion, $2.5 billion and $2.4 billion for the year ended December 31, 2021, 2020,
and 2019, respectively. There is no country outside of the U.S. from which we derived revenues that exceeded 10% of our total
revenues during any of these periods. No single customer accounted for 10% or greater of our accounts receivable or revenues for
the year ended December 31, 2021, 2020, and 2019.
We define adjusted EBITDA as income from operations excluding depreciation, amortization, accretion, stock-based
compensation expense, restructuring charges, impairment charges, transaction costs and gain or loss on asset sales as presented
below for the years ended December 31 (in thousands):
2021 2020 2019
Adjusted EBITDA:
Americas $ 1,326,460 $ 1,186,022 $ 1,237,622 
EMEA 1,033,333 974,246 827,980 
Asia-Pacific 784,591 692,630 622,125 
Total adjusted EBITDA 3,144,384 2,852,898 2,687,727 
Depreciation, amortization and accretion expense (1,660,524) (1,427,010) (1,285,296)
Stock-based compensation expense (363,774) (311,020) (236,539)
Transaction costs (22,769) (55,935) (24,781)
Impairment charges — (7,306) (15,790)
Gain on asset sales 10,845 1,301 44,310 
Income from operations $ 1,108,162 $ 1,052,928 $ 1,169,631 (1)
(1)
(1)    
(1)
(1)
(1)    
F-61
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
We also provide the following segment disclosures related to our operations as follows for the years ended December 31 (in
thousands):
2021 2020 2019
Depreciation and amortization:
Americas $ 865,910 $ 729,611 $ 669,498 
EMEA 455,651 389,332 353,765 
Asia-Pacific 334,729 304,426 261,574 
Total $ 1,656,290 $ 1,423,369 $ 1,284,837 
Capital expenditures:
Americas $ 970,217 $ 866,989 $ 805,360 
EMEA 1,049,279 888,239 733,326 
Asia-Pacific 732,016 527,276 540,835 
Total $ 2,751,512 $ 2,282,504 $ 2,079,521 
Our long-lived assets, including property, plant and equipment, net and operating lease right-of-use assets, are located in the
following geographic areas as of December 31 (in thousands):
2021 2020
Americas $ 6,777,174 $ 6,429,861 
EMEA 5,125,341 5,002,271 
Asia-Pacific 3,543,260 3,070,952 
Total Property, plant and equipment, net $15,445,775 $14,503,084 
Includes $5.4 billion and $5.2 billion, respectively , of property , plant and equipment, net attributed to the U.S. as of December 31, 2021 and
2020.
2021 2020
Americas $ 297,300 $ 363,515 
EMEA 470,330 547,547 
Asia-Pacific 514,788 563,995 
Total Operating lease right-of-use assets $ 1,282,418 $ 1,475,057 
Includes $271.0  million and $334.7  million of operating lease ROU assets attribut ed to the U.S. as of December 31, 2021 and 2020,
respectively .(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
F-62
Table of Contents
EQUINIX, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS - (Continued)
18.    Subsequent Events
Declaration of dividends
On February 16, 2022, we declared a quarterly cash dividend of $3.10 per share, which is payable on March 23, 2022 to our
common stockholders of record as of the close of business on March 7, 2022.
Credit Facility Refinancing
On January 7, 2022, we closed our new credit facility, consisting of a $4.0 billion Revolving Credit Facility, which replaces our
existing 2017 $2.0 billion Revolving Credit Facility, and a £500.0 million Term Loan. Proceeds from the £500.0 million Term Loan
were used to repay our existing £406.3 million Term Loan, whereby we received a total net proceeds, net of the repayment and
transaction expenses, of approximately £88.0 million, or $119.5 million at the exchange rate on that date.
Asia-Pacific 3 Joint Venture ("APAC 3") Signing
On January 27, 2022, we entered into an agreement to form a $525.0 million joint venture in the form of a limited liability
partnership with GIC Private Limited, Singapore's sovereign wealth fund ("GIC"), to develop and operate two xScale data centers in
Seoul, Korea.
F-63
Table of Contents
EQUINIX INC.
SCHEDULE III - SCHEDULE OF REAL ESTATE AND ACCUMULATED DEPRECIATION
DECEMBER 31, 2021
(Dollars in Thousands)
Initial Costs to Company Costs Capitalized
Subsequent to
Acquisition or Lease Total Costs
Encumbrances LandBuildings and
ImprovementsLandBuildings and
ImprovementsLandBuildings and
ImprovementsAccumulated
DepreciationDate of
Acquisition
or Lease 
Americas:
AT1 ATLANTA (METRO) $— $— $— $— $151,612 $— $151,612 $(82,544) 2010
AT2 ATLANTA (METRO) — — — — 38,799 — 38,799 (28,723) 2010
AT3 ATLANTA (METRO) — — — — 4,453 — 4,453 (3,348) 2010
AT4 ATLANTA (METRO) — 5,400 20,209 — 20,446 5,400 40,655 (13,506) 2017
AT5 ATLANTA (METRO) — — 5,011 — 2,207 — 7,218 (5,101) 2017
BG1 BOGOTÁ (METRO),
COLOMBIA — — 8,779 749 5,408 749 14,187(5,040) 2017
BG2 BOGOTÁ (METRO),
COLOMBIA — 4,815 — — 10,730 4,815 10,730— 2021
BO1 BOSTON (METRO) — — — — 6,128 — 6,128 (6,128) 2010
BO2 BOSTON (METRO) — 2,500 30,383 — 36,598 2,500 66,981 (16,486) 2017
CH1 CHICAGO (METRO) — — — — 162,703 — 162,703 (108,670) 1999
CH2 CHICAGO (METRO) — — — — 118,498 — 118,498 (63,074) 2005
CH3 CHICAGO (METRO) — 9,759 — 351 354,558 10,110 354,558 (155,151) 2006
CH4 CHICAGO (METRO) — — — — 22,911 — 22,911 (14,761) 2009
CH7 CHICAGO (METRO) — 670 10,564 — 8,164 670 18,728 (6,185) 2017
CL1 CALGARY (METRO),
CANADA — — 11,572 — 2,719 — 14,291(3,419) 2020
CL2 CALGARY (METRO),
CANADA — — 14,145 — 5,223 — 19,368(4,293) 2020
CL3 CALGARY (METRO),
CANADA — 7,910 69,334 395 15,473 8,304 84,807(9,371) 2020
CU1 CULPEPER (METRO) — 1,019 37,581 — 5,734 1,019 43,315 (17,847) 2017
CU2 CULPEPER (METRO) — 1,244 48,000 — 12,546 1,244 60,546 (19,028) 2017
CU3 CULPEPER (METRO) — 1,088 37,387 — 3,104 1,088 40,491 (14,112) 2017
CU4 CULPEPER (METRO) — 1,372 27,832 — 34,983 1,372 62,815 (12,897) 2017
DA1 DALLAS (METRO) — — — — 69,250 — 69,250 (42,245) 2000
DA2 DALLAS (METRO) — — — — 81,911 — 81,911 (34,463) 2010
DA3 DALLAS (METRO) — — — — 97,996 — 97,996 (45,222) 2010
DA4 DALLAS (METRO) — — — — 16,789 — 16,789 (9,588) 2010
DA6 DALLAS (METRO) — — 20,522 — 174,231 — 194,753 (48,576) 2012
DA7 DALLAS (METRO) — — — — 30,709 — 30,709 (16,356) 2015
DA9 DALLAS (METRO) — 610 15,398 — 6,868 610 22,265 (7,481) 2017
DA11 DALLAS (METRO) — — — — 175,787 — 175,787 (13,565) 2018
INFOMART BUILDING DALLAS
(METRO)— 24,380 337,643 3,293 26,974 27,673 364,617 (42,321) 2018
DC1 WASHINGTON, DC
(METRO) — — — — 5,477 — 5,477(2,251) 1999
DC2 WASHINGTON, DC
(METRO) — — — 5,047 126,667 5,047 126,667(98,822) 1999
DC3 WASHINGTON, DC
(METRO) — — 37,451 — 50,459 — 87,910(55,075) 2004(1)
(2) (2) (2) (3) (4)
F-64
Table of Contents
Initial Costs to Company Costs Capitalized
Subsequent to
Acquisition or Lease Total Costs
Encumbrances LandBuildings and
ImprovementsLandBuildings and
ImprovementsLandBuildings and
ImprovementsAccumulated
DepreciationDate of
Acquisition
or Lease 
DC4 WASHINGTON, DC
(METRO) — 1,906 7,272 — 74,265 1,906 81,537(59,399) 2005
DC5 WASHINGTON, DC
(METRO) — 1,429 4,983 — 93,177 1,429 98,160(70,435) 2005
DC6 WASHINGTON, DC
(METRO) — 1,429 5,082 — 92,783 1,429 97,865(55,372) 2005
DC7 WASHINGTON, DC
(METRO) — — — — 19,080 — 19,080(14,401) 2010
DC10 WASHINGTON, DC
(METRO) — — 44,601 — 88,492 — 133,093(99,617) 2011
DC11 WASHINGTON, DC
(METRO) — 1,429 5,082 — 187,604 1,429 192,686(72,664) 2005
DC12 WASHINGTON, DC
(METRO) — — 101,783 — 81,604 — 183,387(37,732) 2017
DC13 WASHINGTON, DC
(METRO) — 5,500 25,423 — 21,656 5,500 47,079(16,183) 2017
DC14 WASHINGTON, DC
(METRO) — 2,560 33,511 — 15,726 2,560 49,237(14,491) 2017
DC15 WASHINGTON, DC
(METRO) — 1,965 — 1,965 170,776 3,929 170,776(12,708) 2018
DC21 WASHINGTON, DC
(METRO) — 1,507 — — 100,804 1,507 100,804(6,622) 2019
DC97 WASHINGTON, DC
(METRO) — — 2,021 — 847 — 2,867(1,564) 2017
DE1 DENVER (METRO) — — — — 9,849 — 9,849 (8,845) 2010
DE2 DENVER (METRO) — 5,240 23,053 — 31,064 5,240 54,116 (17,837) 2017
HO1 HOUSTON (METRO) — 1,440 23,780 — 33,281 1,440 57,060 (18,065) 2017
KA1 KAMLOOPS (METRO),
CANADA — 2,991 46,983 149 6,768 3,140 53,751(5,537) 2020
LA1 LOS ANGELES (METRO) — — — — 110,808 — 110,808 (75,153) 1999
LA2 LOS ANGELES (METRO) — — — — 10,582 — 10,582 (9,250) 2000
LA3 LOS ANGELES (METRO) — — 34,727 3,959 17,368 3,959 52,095 (43,042) 2005
LA4 LOS ANGELES (METRO) — 19,333 137,630 — 58,351 19,333 195,981 (102,469) 2009
LA7 LOS ANGELES (METRO) — 7,800 33,621 — 56,409 7,800 90,030 (17,280) 2017
MI1 MIAMI (METRO) — 18,920 127,194 — 112,732 18,920 239,925 (74,698) 2017
MI2 MIAMI (METRO) — — — — 22,677 — 22,677 (15,028) 2010
MI3 MIAMI (METRO) — — — — 33,886 — 33,886 (20,458) 2012
MI6 MIAMI (METRO) — 4,750 23,017 — 9,848 4,750 32,865 (13,768) 2017
MO1 MONTERREY (METRO),
MEXICO — — 2,572 — 4,557 — 7,129(909) 2020
MT1 MONTREAL (METRO),
CANADA — — 76,932 — 12,745 — 89,678(13,974) 2020
MX1 MEXICO CITY (METRO),
MEXICO — 1,090 53,980 — 35,428 1,090 89,409(8,341) 2020
MX2 MEXICO CITY (METRO),
MEXICO — 1,090 16,061 — 52,318 1,090 68,379(1,979) 2020
NY1 NEW YORK (METRO) — — — — 71,716 — 71,716 (47,232) 1999
NY2 NEW YORK (METRO) — — — 17,859 207,035 17,859 207,035 (135,182) 2000
NY4 NEW YORK (METRO) — — — — 364,176 — 364,176 (211,873) 2006
NY5 NEW YORK (METRO) — — — — 296,054 — 296,054 (99,005) 2010
NY6 NEW YORK (METRO) — — — — 95,441 — 95,441 (18,988) 2010
NY7 NEW YORK (METRO) — — 24,660 — 172,048 — 196,708 (142,718) 2010
NY9 NEW YORK (METRO) — — — — 50,109 — 50,109 (38,190) 2010
NY11 NEW YORK (METRO) — 2,050 58,717 — 24,588 2,050 83,305 (26,847) 2017
NY13 NEW YORK (METRO) — — 31,603 8,300 6,583 8,300 38,187 (18,342) 2017(1)
(2) (2) (2) (3) (4)
F-65
Table of Contents
Initial Costs to Company Costs Capitalized
Subsequent to
Acquisition or Lease Total Costs
Encumbrances LandBuildings and
ImprovementsLandBuildings and
ImprovementsLandBuildings and
ImprovementsAccumulated
DepreciationDate of
Acquisition
or Lease 
OT1 OTTAWA (METRO),
CANADA — 1,586 39,128 75 4,490 1,661 43,618(5,397) 2020
PH1 PHILADELPHIA (METRO) — — — — 44,638 — 44,638 (21,454) 2010
RJ1 RIO DE JANEIRO (METRO),
BRAZIL — — — — 18,064 — 18,064(13,455) 2011
RJ2 RIO DE JANEIRO (METRO),
BRAZIL— — 2,012 1,181 55,254 1,181 57,266 (19,885) 2012
SE2 SEATTLE (METRO) — — — — 31,109 — 31,109 (24,939) 2010
SE3 SEATTLE (METRO) — — 1,760 — 101,258 — 103,018 (63,601) 2011
SE4 SEATTLE (METRO) — 4,000 12,903 — 37,022 4,000 49,925 (11,090) 2017
SJ1 SAINT JOHN (METRO),
CANADA — 162 14,276 8 1,428 170 15,703(1,861) 2020
SP1 SÃO PAULO (METRO),
BRAZIL — — 10,188 — 14,870 — 25,058(18,478) 2011
SP2 SÃO PAULO (METRO),
BRAZIL — — — 2,874 48,068 2,874 48,068(35,184) 2011
SP3 SÃO PAULO (METRO),
BRAZIL — 7,222 72,997 — 42,690 7,223 115,688(37,026) 2017
SP4 SÃO PAULO (METRO),
BRAZIL — — 22,027 — 57,782 — 79,809(15,875) 2017
SV1 SILICON VALLEY (METRO) — — — 15,545 144,829 15,545 144,829 (100,483) 1999
SV2 SILICON VALLEY (METRO) — — — — 157,926 — 157,926 (100,979) 2003
SV3 SILICON VALLEY (METRO) — — — — 77,334 — 77,334 (41,552) 1999
SV4 SILICON VALLEY (METRO) — — — — 102,684 — 102,684 (26,207) 2005
SV5 SILICON VALLEY (METRO) — 6,238 98,991 — 101,852 6,238 200,843 (91,142) 2010
SV6 SILICON VALLEY (METRO) — — 15,585 — 30,329 — 45,914 (42,339) 2010
SV8 SILICON VALLEY (METRO) — — — — 157,147 — 157,147 (42,067) 2010
SV10 SILICON VALLEY
(METRO) — 12,646 123,594 — 93,742 12,646 217,336(42,743) 2017
SV11 SILICON VALLEY
(METRO) — — — — 147,118 — 147,118(3,081) 2019
SV12 SILICON VALLEY
(METRO) — 20,313 — — 8,586 20,313 8,586— 2015
SV13 SILICON VALLEY
(METRO) — — 3,758 — — — 3,758(3,225) 2017
SV14 SILICON VALLEY
(METRO) — 3,638 5,503 — 3,782 3,638 9,285(3,044) 2017
SV15 SILICON VALLEY
(METRO) — 7,651 23,060 — 9,875 7,651 32,934(11,023) 2017
SV16 SILICON VALLEY
(METRO) — 4,271 15,018 — 5,056 4,271 20,074(6,506) 2017
SV17 SILICON VALLEY
(METRO) — — 17,493 — 3,368 — 20,862(14,966) 2017
TR1 TORONTO (METRO),
CANADA — — — — 92,608 — 92,608(38,106) 2010
TR2 TORONTO (METRO),
CANADA — — 21,113 107,044 142,753 107,044 163,865(32,874) 2015
TR4 TORONTO (METRO),
CANADA — — 13,985 — 4,014 — 17,999(5,308) 2020
TR5 MARKHAM (METRO),
CANADA — — 24,913 — 2,594 — 27,507(5,928) 2020
TR6 BRAMPTON (METRO),
CANADA — 9,386 58,704 3,316 — 12,702 58,704(6,151) 2020
TR7 BRAMPTON (METRO),
CANADA — 9,855 71,966 — 18,170 9,854 90,136(13,019) 2020
VA1 BURNABY (METRO),
CANADA — — 4,668 — 2,233 — 6,901(1,048) 2020
WI1 WINNIPEG (METRO),
CANADA — — 57,234 — 4,976 — 62,210(2,379) 2020
OTHERS — 76,482 52,099 — 122,301 76,482 174,400 (21,468) Various
EMEA:(1)
(2) (2) (2) (3) (4)
(5)
F-66
Table of Contents
Initial Costs to Company Costs Capitalized
Subsequent to
Acquisition or Lease Total Costs
Encumbrances LandBuildings and
ImprovementsLandBuildings and
ImprovementsLandBuildings and
ImprovementsAccumulated
DepreciationDate of
Acquisition
or Lease 
AD1 ABU DHABI (METRO),
UNITED ARAB EMIRATES— — — — 75,587 — 75,587 (11,797) 2017
AM1 AMSTERDAM (METRO),
THE NETHERLANDS— — — — 98,785 — 98,785 (52,871) 2008
AM2 AMSTERDAM (METRO),
THE NETHERLANDS— — — — 83,244 — 83,244 (34,928) 2008
AM3 AMSTERDAM (METRO),
THE NETHERLANDS— — 27,099 — 134,758 — 161,857 (70,989) 2011
AM4 AMSTERDAM (METRO),
THE NETHERLANDS— — — — 223,115 — 223,115 (36,326) 2016
AM5 AMSTERDAM (METRO),
THE NETHERLANDS— — 92,199 — 16,153 — 108,352 (37,422) 2016
AM6 AMSTERDAM (METRO),
THE NETHERLANDS— 6,616 50,876 539 92,063 7,155 142,938 (32,929) 2016
AM7 AMSTERDAM (METRO),
THE NETHERLANDS— — 7,397 — 139,860 — 147,257 (25,536) 2016
AM8 AMSTERDAM (METRO),
THE NETHERLANDS— — — — 11,692 — 11,692 (6,119) 2016
AM11 AMSTERDAM (METRO),
THE NETHERLANDS— — 6,405 416 13,007 416 19,412 (2,761) 2019
BA1 BARCELONA (METRO),
SPAIN— — 9,443 — 16,468 — 25,911 (9,654) 2017
BX1 BORDEAUX (METRO),
FRANCE— 1,916 3,507 118 31,230 2,034 34,737 (778) 2020
DB1 DUBLIN (METRO), IRELAND — — — — 5,393 — 5,393 (4,455) 2016
DB2 DUBLIN (METRO), IRELAND — — 12,460 — 9,493 — 21,953 (10,735) 2016
DB3 DUBLIN (METRO), IRELAND — 3,334 54,387 271 20,819 3,605 75,206 (24,039) 2016
DB4 DUBLIN (METRO), IRELAND — — 26,875 — 19,088 — 45,963 (10,977) 2016
DU1 DÜSSELDORF (METRO),
GERMANY— — — 8,235 33,389 8,235 33,389 (19,657) 2000
DX1 DUBAI (METRO), UNITED
ARAB EMIRATES— — — — 93,205 — 93,205 (41,746) 2008
DX2 DUBAI (METRO), UNITED
ARAB EMIRATES— — — — 667 — 667 (339) 2017
DX3 DUBAI (METRO), UNITED
ARAB EMIRATES— 6,737 — — 5,460 6,737 5,460 (376) 2020
EN1 ENSCHEDE (METRO), THE
NETHERLANDS— — — — 32,914 — 32,914 (24,331) 2008
FR2 FRANKFURT (METRO),
GERMANY— — — 20,843 545,921 20,843 545,921 (171,728) 2007
FR4 FRANKFURT (METRO),
GERMANY— 11,578 9,307 943 103,983 12,521 113,290 (39,794) 2009
FR5 FRANKFURT (METRO),
GERMANY30,310 — — 14,210 224,488 14,210 224,488 (59,488) 2012
FR6 FRANKFURT (METRO),
GERMANY— — — — 140,753 — 140,753 (33,382) 2016
FR7 FRANKFURT (METRO),
GERMANY— — 43,634 — 37,353 — 80,987 (31,181) 2016
FR8 FRANKFURT (METRO),
GERMANY— 20,430 58,199 — 48,445 20,430 106,644 (1,119) 2020
FR11x FRANKFURT (METRO),
GERMANY— — — — 31,566 — 31,566 (154) 2020
FR13 FRANKFURT (METRO),
GERMANY— — — — 3,218 — 3,218 — 2021(1)
(2) (2) (2) (3) (4)
F-67
Table of Contents
Initial Costs to Company Costs Capitalized
Subsequent to
Acquisition or Lease Total Costs
Encumbrances LandBuildings and
ImprovementsLandBuildings and
ImprovementsLandBuildings and
ImprovementsAccumulated
DepreciationDate of
Acquisition
or Lease 
GN1 GENOA (METRO), ITALY — — 1,988 — 2,772 — 4,760 (51) 2020
GV1 GENEVA (METRO),
SWITZERLAND— — — — 26,319 — 26,319 (9,864) 2004
GV2 GENEVA (METRO),
SWITZERLAND— — — — 44,778 — 44,778 (22,820) 2009
HE1 HELSINKI (METRO),
FINLAND— — — — 4,008 — 4,008 (3,554) 2016
HE3 HELSINKI (METRO),
FINLAND— — — — 15,371 — 15,371 (10,364) 2016
HE4 HELSINKI (METRO),
FINLAND— — 29,092 — 7,063 — 36,155 (20,133) 2016
HE5 HELSINKI (METRO),
FINLAND— — 7,564 — 19,633 — 27,197 (7,027) 2016
HE6 HELSINKI (METRO),
FINLAND— — 17,204 1,594 30,980 1,594 48,185 (15,811) 2016
HE7 HELSINKI (METRO),
FINLAND— 7,348 6,946 1,141 51,331 8,488 58,277 (5,421) 2018
HH1 HAMBURG (METRO),
GERMANY— 3,612 5,360 610 47,875 4,222 53,235 (4,466) 2018
IL2 ISTANBUL (METRO),
TURKEY— 14,460 39,289 — 41,641 14,460 80,930 (10,234) 2017
LD3 LONDON (METRO), UNITED
KINGDOM— — — — 15,380 — 15,380 (14,747) 2000
LD4 LONDON (METRO), UNITED
KINGDOM— — 23,044 — 137,786 — 160,831 (59,443) 2007
LD5 LONDON (METRO), UNITED
KINGDOM— — 16,412 — 189,336 — 205,748 (107,560) 2010
LD6 LONDON (METRO), UNITED
KINGDOM— — — — 151,375 — 151,375 (45,283) 2013
LD7 LONDON (METRO), UNITED
KINGDOM— — — 2,271 271,256 2,271 271,256 (16,921) 2018
LD8 LONDON (METRO), UNITED
KINGDOM— — 107,544 — 88,016 — 195,560 (59,180) 2016
LD9 LONDON (METRO), UNITED
KINGDOM— — 181,431 — 176,718 — 358,149 (100,677) 2016
LD10 LONDON (METRO),
UNITED KINGDOM— — 40,251 — 108,488 — 148,739 (22,593) 2017
LS1 LISBON (METRO),
PORTUGAL— — 7,374 3,517 11,379 3,517 18,753 (4,690) 2017
MA1 MANCHESTER (METRO),
UNITED KINGDOM— — — — 15,457 — 15,457 (9,016) 2016
MA2 MANCHESTER (METRO),
UNITED KINGDOM— — — — 10,606 — 10,606 (9,336) 2016
MA3 MANCHESTER (METRO),
UNITED KINGDOM— — 44,931 — 9,721 — 54,652 (31,547) 2016
MA4 MANCHESTER (METRO),
UNITED KINGDOM— — 6,697 — 6,576 — 13,272 (9,222) 2016
MA5 MANCHESTER (METRO),
UNITED KINGDOM— 3,706 6,874 407 73,093 4,113 79,967 (328) 2020
MD1 MADRID (METRO), SPAIN — — 7,917 7,825 7,236 7,825 15,153 (5,701) 2017
MD2 MADRID (METRO), SPAIN — — 40,952 — 70,588 — 111,540 (35,723) 2017
ML2 MILAN (METRO), ITALY — — — — 24,112 — 24,112 (15,321) 2016
ML3 MILAN (METRO), ITALY — — — 3,616 44,350 3,616 44,350 (15,565) 2016
ML4 MILAN (METRO), ITALY — — — — 9,293 — 9,293 (7,720) 2016
ML5 MILAN (METRO), ITALY — 6,894 20,952 — 74,033 6,894 94,985 (1,903) 2019
MU1 MUNICH (METRO),
GERMANY— — — — 39,084 — 39,084 (19,432) 2007
MU3 MUNICH (METRO),
GERMANY— — — — 5,909 — 5,909 (2,714) 2010
MU4 MUNICH (METRO),
GERMANY— 12,127 35,120 — 51,418 12,127 86,538 (15) 2020
PA1 PARIS (METRO), FRANCE — — — — 20,946 — 20,946 (16,853) 2007(1)
(2) (2) (2) (3) (4)
F-68
Table of Contents
Initial Costs to Company Costs Capitalized
Subsequent to
Acquisition or Lease Total Costs
Encumbrances LandBuildings and
ImprovementsLandBuildings and
ImprovementsLandBuildings and
ImprovementsAccumulated
DepreciationDate of
Acquisition
or Lease 
PA2 & PA3 PARIS (METRO),
FRANCE— — 29,615 23,608 326,618 23,608 356,233 (144,908) 2007
PA4 PARIS (METRO), FRANCE — 1,598 9,503 5,516 246,653 7,114 256,156 (88,191) 2011
PA5 PARIS (METRO), FRANCE — — 16,554 — 11,829 — 28,383 (8,143) 2016
PA6 PARIS (METRO), FRANCE — — — — 73,366 — 73,366 (38,093) 2016
PA7 PARIS (METRO), FRANCE — — — — 23,419 — 23,419 (11,932) 2016
PA10 PARIS (METRO), FRANCE — — 100,933 — — — 100,933 — 2021
SA1 SEVILLE (METRO), SPAIN — — 1,567 — 1,572 — 3,139 (2,162) 2017
SK1 STOCKHOLM, (METRO),
SWEDEN— — 15,495 — 41,282 — 56,777 (11,370) 2016
SK2 STOCKHOLM, (METRO),
SWEDEN— — 80,148 3,914 81,981 3,914 162,129 (39,960) 2016
SK3 STOCKHOLM, (METRO),
SWEDEN— — — — 23,857 — 23,857 (6,546) 2016
SO1 SOFIA (METRO), BULGARIA — — 5,236 — 4,470 — 9,706 (3,191) 2016
SO2 SOFIA (METRO), BULGARIA — 2,719 — 39 18,118 2,758 18,118 (2,099) 2017
WA1 WARSAW (METRO),
POLAND— — 5,950 — 25,321 — 31,271 (9,228) 2016
WA2 WARSAW (METRO),
POLAND— — 4,709 — 9,337 — 14,046 (5,436) 2016
WA3 WARSAW (METRO),
POLAND— 2,647 — — 64,414 2,648 64,414 (2,873) 2017
ZH2 ZURICH (METRO),
SWITZERLAND— — — — 3,915 — 3,915 (2,748) 2002
ZH4 ZURICH (METRO),
SWITZERLAND— — 11,284 — 39,677 — 50,961 (28,110) 2009
ZH5 ZURICH (METRO),
SWITZERLAND— — — 8,075 225,653 8,075 225,653 (35,657) 2009
ZW1 ZWOLLE (METRO), THE
NETHERLANDS— — — — 10,518 — 10,518 (8,976) 2008
OTHERS — 59,811 18,309 17,398 32,642 77,209 50,951 (9,560) Various
Asia-Pacific:
AE1 ADELAIDE (METRO),
AUSTRALIA— 2,654 1,015 96 2,149 2,749 3,164 (994) 2018
BR1 BRISBANE (METRO),
AUSTRALIA— 3,159 1,053 114 2,968 3,273 4,021 (845) 2018
CA1 CANBERRA (METRO),
AUSTRALIA— — 18,410 — 8,454 — 26,864 (3,369) 2018
HK1 HONG KONG (METRO),
CHINA— — — — 301,395 — 301,395 (122,088) 2003
HK2 HONG KONG (METRO),
CHINA— — — — 243,358 — 243,358 (177,462) 2010
HK3 HONG KONG (METRO),
CHINA— — — — 182,078 — 182,078 (90,545) 2012
HK4 HONG KONG (METRO),
CHINA— — — — 95,305 — 95,305 (20,654) 2012
HK5 HONG KONG (METRO),
CHINA— — 70,002 — 40,919 — 110,921 (26,895) 2017
MB1 MUMBAI (METRO), INDIA — 573 28,457 — 484 573 28,941 (658) 2021
MB2 MUMBAI (METRO), INDIA — — 56,725 — 1,315 — 58,040 (1,331) 2021
ME1 MELBOURNE (METRO),
AUSTRALIA— 14,926 — 538 93,006 15,464 93,006 (29,361) 2013
ME2 MELBOURNE (METRO),
AUSTRALIA— — — — 102,610 — 102,610 (7,310) 2018
ME4 MELBOURNE (METRO),
AUSTRALIA— 3,425 84,175 124 15,526 3,549 99,701 (23,979) 2018
ME5 MELBOURNE (METRO),
AUSTRALIA— 6,655 4,094 240 4,754 6,895 8,847 (2,882) 2018
OS1 OSAKA (METRO), JAPAN — — 14,876 — 104,213 — 119,089 (42,667) 2013
OS3 OSAKA (METRO), JAPAN — — — — 199,271 — 199,271 (7,274) 2020(1)
(2) (2) (2) (3) (4)
(5)
F-69
Table of Contents
Initial Costs to Company Costs Capitalized
Subsequent to Acquisition
or Lease Total Costs
Encumbrances LandBuildings and
ImprovementsLandBuildings and
ImprovementsLandBuildings and
ImprovementsAccumulated
DepreciationDate of
Acquisition
or Lease 
PE1 PERTH (METRO),
AUSTRALIA— 1,347 1,337 49 2,100 1,396 3,437 (596) 2018
PE2 PERTH (METRO),
AUSTRALIA— — 16,327 — 17,390 — 33,717 (8,124) 2018
PE3 PERTH (METRO),
AUSTRALIA— — — — 56,004 — 56,004 (4) 2020
SG1 SINGAPORE (METRO) — — — — 291,489 — 291,489 (133,905) 2003
SG2 SINGAPORE (METRO) — — — — 339,887 — 339,887 (232,450) 2008
SG3 SINGAPORE (METRO) — — 34,844 — 239,648 — 274,492 (71,579) 2013
SG4 SINGAPORE (METRO) — — 54,602 — 146,113 — 200,715 (17,748) 2019
SG5 SINGAPORE (METRO) — — — — 197,620 — 197,620 (4,016) 2019
SH2 SHANGHAI (METRO),
CHINA— — — — 7,290 — 7,290 (3,562) 2012
SH3 SHANGHAI (METRO),
CHINA— — 7,066 — 14,596 — 21,662 (8,140) 2012
SH5 SHANGHAI (METRO),
CHINA— — 11,284 — 24,662 — 35,946 (17,322) 2012
SH6 SHANGHAI (METRO),
CHINA— — 16,545 — 37,873 — 54,418 (6,124) 2017
SL1 SEOUL (METRO), SOUTH
KOREA— — 29,236 — 37,580 — 66,816 (12,612) 2019
SY1 SYDNEY (METRO),
AUSTRALIA— — — 86,206 38,251 86,206 38,251 (24,756) 2003
SY2 SYDNEY (METRO),
AUSTRALIA— — 3,080 — 28,268 — 31,348 (24,941) 2008
SY3 SYDNEY (METRO),
AUSTRALIA— — 8,712 — 150,497 — 159,209 (91,013) 2010
SY4 SYDNEY (METRO),
AUSTRALIA— — — — 184,417 — 184,417 (55,173) 2014
SY5 SYDNEY (METRO),
AUSTRALIA— 82,091 — 2,948 246,519 85,039 246,519 (15,090) 2018
SY6 SYDNEY (METRO),
AUSTRALIA— 8,860 64,197 319 15,492 9,179 79,689 (13,191) 2018
SY7 SYDNEY (METRO),
AUSTRALIA— 2,745 47,350 99 6,844 2,844 54,194 (9,078) 2018
SY8 SYDNEY (METRO),
AUSTRALIA— — 1,073 — 500 — 1,573 (1,149) 2018
TY1 TOKYO (METRO), JAPAN — — — — 35,993 — 35,993 (22,284) 2000
TY2 TOKYO (METRO), JAPAN — — — — 93,532 — 93,532 (66,919) 2006
TY3 TOKYO (METRO), JAPAN — — — — 77,305 — 77,305 (44,811) 2010
TY4 TOKYO (METRO), JAPAN — — — — 78,446 — 78,446 (36,604) 2012
TY5 TOKYO (METRO), JAPAN — — 102 — 61,821 — 61,923 (20,456) 2014
TY6 TOKYO (METRO), JAPAN — — 37,941 — 17,821 — 55,762 (37,344) 2015
TY7 TOKYO (METRO), JAPAN — — 13,175 — 6,280 — 19,455 (14,370) 2015
TY8 TOKYO (METRO), JAPAN — — 53,848 — 12,625 — 66,472 (30,152) 2015
TY9 TOKYO (METRO), JAPAN — — 106,710 — 23,644 — 130,354 (83,055) 2015
TY10 TOKYO (METRO), JAPAN — — 69,881 — 15,220 — 85,102 (28,348) 2015
TY11 TOKYO (METRO), JAPAN — — 22,099 — 221,004 — 243,103 (19,907) 2018
OTHERS — — 1,733 — 17,921 — 19,654 (9,964) Various
TOTAL LOCATIONS $30,310 $598,614 $4,687,056 $387,949 $16,232,443 $986,560 $20,919,495$(7,274,860)
     The initial cost was $ 0 if the lease of the respective IBX was classified as an operating lease.
    Building and improvements include all fixed assets except for land.
     Buildings and improvements are depreciated on a straight line basis over estimated useful live as described under described in Note 1 within
the Consolidated Financial Statements.(1)
(2) (2) (2) (3) (4)
(5)
(1)
(2)
(3)
F-70
Table of Contents
     Date of lease or acquisition represents the date we leased the facility or acquired the facility through purchase or acquisition.
    Includes various IBXs that are under initial development and costs incurred at certain central locations supporting various IBX functions.
The aggregate gross cost of our properties for federal income tax purpose approximated $29.1 billion (unaudited) as of
December 31, 2021.
The following table reconciles the historical cost of our properties for financial reporting purposes for each of the years in the
three-year period ended December 31, 2021 (in thousands).
Gross Fixed Assets:
2021 2020 2019
Balance, beginning of period $20,161,785 $16,927,332 $15,020,198 
ASC 842 adoption impact — — (276,671)
Additions (including acquisitions and improvements) 2,977,992 3,110,907 2,632,472 
Disposals (648,516) (446,864) (463,485)
Foreign currency transaction adjustments and others (585,206) 570,410 14,818 
Balance, end of year $21,906,055 $20,161,785 $16,927,332 
Accumulated Depreciation:
2021 2020 2019
Balance, beginning of period $(6,399,477)$(5,329,182)$(4,517,016)
ASC 842 adoption impact — — (7,846)
Additions (depreciation expense) (1,224,874) (1,036,452) (926,046)
Disposals 149,231 109,230 128,352 
Foreign currency transaction adjustments and others 200,260 (143,073) (6,626)
Balance, end of year $(7,274,860)$(6,399,477)$(5,329,182)
     Upon the adoption of Topic 842 on January 1, 2019, we de-recognized certain fixed assets under built-to-suite leases due to the conversion
of certain build-to-suit leases to operating leases. See Note 1 within the Consolidated Financial Statements.(4)
(5)
(1)
(1)
(1)
F-71
